EFFECTS  OF  CLIMATE  CHANGE  AND  OCEAN 

ACIDIFICATION  ON  LIVING  MARINE  ORGANISMS 

S.  HRG.  110–1210 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, 

FISHERIES, AND COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  10,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

79–908 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director,  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  OCEANS,  ATMOSPHERE,  FISHERIES,  AND  COAST 

GUARD 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

...............................................................................
Hearing held on May 10, 2007 
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Prepared statement of Hon. Olympia J. Snowe, U.S. Senator from Maine  ........
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Conover,  Ph.D.,  David  O.,  Dean  and  Director,  Marine  Sciences  Research 
Center, Stony Brook University  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Doney,  Ph.D.,  Scott  C.,  Senior  Scientist,  Department  of  Marine  Chemistry 
and Geochemistry, Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Feely,  Ph.D.,  Richard  A.,  Supervisory  Chemical  Oceanographer,  Pacific  Ma-
rine Environmental Laboratory, NOAA, U.S. Department of Commerce  .......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hansen,  Dr.  Lara  J.,  Chief  Scientist,  Climate  Change  Program,  World  Wild-
life Fund  ................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kruse,  Ph.D.,  Gordon  H.,  President’s  Professor  of  Fisheries  and  Oceanog-
raphy,  School  of  Fisheries  and  Ocean  Sciences,  University  of  Alaska  Fair-
banks  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Watkins,  James  D.,  Admiral  (Ret.),  U.S.  Navy;  Chairman,  U.S.  Commission 
on Ocean Policy; Co-Chair, Joint Ocean Commission Initiative  ......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
1 
5 
3 
4 

19 
20 

6 
7 

13 
15 

24 
25 

33 
35 

43 
45 

65 

65 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Lautenberg,  Hon.  Frank  R.,  U.S.  Senator  from  New  Jersey,  prepared  state-
......................................................................................................................

ment 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

Scott C. Doney, Ph.D.  .......................................................................................
Richard A. Feely, Ph.D.  ....................................................................................
Dr. Lara J. Hansen  ...........................................................................................
James D. Watkins 

66 
82 
93 
............................................................................................ 100 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Scott C. Doney, Ph.D.  .......................................................................................
Richard A. Feely, Ph.D.  ....................................................................................
Dr. Lara J. Hansen  ...........................................................................................
James D. Watkins 
............................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Scott C. Doney, Ph.D.  .......................................................................................
Richard A. Feely, Ph.D.  ....................................................................................

66 
77 
92 
94 

69 
84 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

EFFECTS  OF  CLIMATE  CHANGE  AND  OCEAN 

ACIDIFICATION  ON  LIVING  MARINE 

ORGANISMS 

THURSDAY,  MAY  10,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, FISHERIES, 
AND COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:22 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Good  morning.  The  Senate  Committee  on 
Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  and  the  Oceans,  Atmos-
phere, Fisheries, and Coast Guard Subcommittee hearing will come 
to  order.  I  thank  the  witnesses  for  their  indulgence.  The  Senate 
had a vote and some of my colleagues I am sure will be joining us 
shortly.  But  I  thought  that  we  should  go  ahead  and  get  started.  I 
thank you very much for being here. 

I  know  that  we  have  a  distinguished  set  of  witnesses:  Dr.  Scott 

‘‘DONN-ey,’’ is that right? 
Dr. DONEY. ‘‘DOE-ney.’’ 
Senator CANTWELL. ‘‘DOE-ney.’’ Thank you very much. 
Dr. Richard Feely; is that correct? I should know that, given your 
presence  in  the  Pacific  Northwest.  Dr.  David  Conover,  Dr.  Lara 
Hansen,  Dr.  Gordon  Kruse,  and  Admiral  James  Watkins.  Thank 
you for returning to the Committee and for your steadfast involve-
ment in this issue. 

I  know  that  some  of  you  have  PowerPoint  presentations  and  we 
will  try  to  accommodate  you  this  morning  on  that  and  give  you  a 
few  extra  minutes  and,  as  I  said,  as  my  colleagues  arrive  we  will 
also give them time to make opening statements. 

I would like to again welcome each of you to this important Com-
mittee to talk about the impact of climate change and ocean acidifi-
cation on our living marine resources. Today you represent some of 
the  top  experts  in  the  field  of  ocean  and  climate  change  and  I 
would  like  to  thank  each  of  you  for  your  testimony  and  for  your 
leadership in this area. 

Since  the  start  of  the  Industrial  Revolution  200  years  ago,  hu-
mans have released over 1.5 trillion tons of carbon dioxide into the 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

2 

atmosphere  and  only  now  are  we  beginning  to  understand  the  im-
plications  of  this.  When  scientists  first  started  raising  questions 
about  our  carbon  dioxide  emissions  in  the  1950s,  very  little  was 
known  about  the  possible  consequences.  Some  predicted  that  car-
bon dioxide would accumulate in the atmosphere. Others predicted 
it  would  be  absorbed  by  the  world’s  oceans.  Today  we  know  that 
both of those were correct. 

Human-caused  emissions  have  increased  the  global  atmospheric 
carbon  dioxide  concentration  by  35  percent.  In  addition,  over  half 
a trillion tons of carbon dioxide have been absorbed by our oceans. 
We  are  already  seeing  the  impacts  of  this  on  our  oceans  and  our 
coastal ecosystems. If we continue with business as usual, the eco-
logical,  social,  and  economic  consequences  are  likely  to  be  severe. 
After  extensive  scientific  research,  climate  scientists  now  know 
that  global  warming  is  happening  and  it  is  happening  because  of 
human  use  of  fossil  fuel.  We  are  seeing  more  results  of  global 
warming  every  day.  Year  after  year,  our  polar  ice  caps  are  reced-
ing,  glaciers  are  shrinking  rapidly,  even  disappearing,  and,  to  give 
one  example  from  my  home  state,  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on 
Climate  Change  recently  reported  that  the  mountain  snow  pack 
that feeds the Columbia River system is shrinking away, producing 
less and less water for the rivers every year. 

While these easy-to-see impacts of global warming are highly dis-
turbing,  we  are  here  today  to  examine  the  impacts  that  are  not 
quite as visible, but yet just as severe: those that occur beneath the 
surface of our oceans. The impact of climate change on coastal com-
munities  from  sea  level  rise  and  increased  storm  intensity  have 
been  the  focus  of  much  attention.  But  climate  change  also  poses 
risks  to  our  Nation’s  multibillion  dollar  fishing  industry.  In  fact, 
global warming could threaten the very integrity of our oceans’ eco-
system,  possibly  wiping  out  more  vulnerable  ecosystems  like  coral 
reefs. 

These  are  frightening  possibilities,  but  very  real  ones.  While  it 
may not be easy to see the impacts of global warming in the ocean, 
it  is  vital  that  we  examine  it.  If  we  wait  until  these  problems  are 
too  painful  or  too  obvious  to  ignore,  it  will  be  far  too  late.  While 
carbon  dioxide  is  accumulating  in  our  atmosphere,  it  also  is  being 
absorbed  by  oceans,  and  approximately  one-third  of  carbon  dioxide 
emissions end up in the oceans. 

For  decades  we  assumed  that  the  oceans  would  absorb  these 
greenhouse gases to the benefit of our atmosphere, with no side ef-
fects  for  our  seas.  Emerging  science  now  shows  we  were  wrong. 
Thanks in no small part to the work of our panelists; we now know 
that  the  absorption  of  carbon  dioxide  actually  changes  the  very 
chemistry of our oceans. Sea water becomes more acidic and begins 
to withhold the basic chemical building blocks needed by many ma-
rine organisms. Coral reefs, the rain forests of the sea, cannot build 
their skeletons, and in colder waters, scientists predict, more acidic 
oceans  can  dissolve  the  shells  of  tiny  organisms  that  make  up  the 
base of the ocean’s food chain. 

When  it  comes  to  ocean  acidification,  we  risk  not  just  damaging 
the oceans’ ecosystem; we are threatening its very foundation. The 
social  and  economic  costs  to  the  world’s  fisheries  and  fishery-de-
pendent  communities  are  incalculable.  Managers  at  the  State  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

3 

local  and  regional  levels  must  be  able  to  anticipate  and  develop 
strategies to address these threats. 

The  danger  of  global  climate  change  and  ocean  acidification  can 
be  illustrated  with  one  example  from  my  home  state  of  Wash-
ington. Washington is home to a very important salmon population. 
Salmon  are  a  $330  million  industry  in  the  Pacific  Northwest  and 
certainly  a  cultural  icon.  As  I  mentioned  earlier,  the  global  warm-
ing will continue to reduce the snowpack that feeds our rivers will 
continue  to  have  impacts.  As  these  waters  become  less,  the  waters 
will  become  warmer.  Salmon  rely  on  a  predictable,  steady  flow  for 
their survival. 

Every  coastal  State  can  point  to  examples  like  these,  and  these 
examples are far too important to ignore. Both global warming and 
ocean acidification have the same cause and the same solution—we 
must  reduce  our  emissions  of  carbon  dioxide.  If  we  fail  to  address 
the  potential  impact  of  global  climate  change  and  ocean  acidifica-
tion,  we  can  be  jeopardizing  all  we  have  fought  so  hard  for  on 
ocean  conservation  and  the  gains  that  have  already  been  made. 
These are difficult words to hear, I think, but reflect a difficult re-
ality. 

Again, I want to thank all of you for joining us and for your hard 
work  on  this  very  important  issue.  We  look  forward  to  your  testi-
mony. 

I  know  I  have  been  joined  by  Senator  Stevens,  the  Ranking 
Member of the full Committee, and I invite him to make any open-
ing  comment,  and  to  note  that  Senator  Snowe  is  unable  to  join  us 
today because of a conflict, but is reviewing the testimony and will 
be  very  involved  in  any  further  steps  and  will  look  forward  to  see-
ing the testimony of the witnesses. But I thank Senator Stevens for 
his participation and his presence here this morning. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Snowe follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Thank  you,  Madam  Chair,  for  calling  this  critical  hearing  to  discuss  how  climate 
change  may  affect  the  future  of  our  oceans  and  their  living  marine  resources.  I  am 
pleased  that  this  committee  is  so  actively  investigating  the  burgeoning  issue  of 
ocean acidification—a topic that in just a few short years has developed from a rel-
atively  unknown  theory  into  what  is  potentially  one  of  the  most  disconcerting  as-
pects of ocean-related climate science. 

Lost  in  much  of  the  discussion  of  climate  change  has  been  its  potential  impacts 
on the oceans’ corals, fish, and other species. Recent research—much of it conducted 
by  members  of  our  esteemed  panel  of  witnesses—has  indicated  that  as  a  direct  re-
sult of the precipitous increase in carbon dioxide in our atmosphere, our oceans are 
warming  and  becoming  more  acidic.  If  we  continue  to  allow  emissions  of  carbon  di-
oxide  to  increase,  we  could  see  drastic,  worldwide  impacts  in  our  oceans,  from  spe-
cies migration and coral bleaching to widespread extinctions. 

The oceans drive much of our Nation’s economy, as well as that of my home state 
of  Maine.  Throughout  our  state’s  history,  stewardship  of  our  marine  resources  has 
pervaded  our  maritime  activities.  Nowhere  is  this  more  evident  than  in  our  lobster 
fishery, which for generations has engaged in self-imposed, sustainable fishing prac-
tices. The result of that stewardship is a robust industry that landed over $270 mil-
lion  worth  of  lobster  in  2006.  Today,  that  fishery  faces  potential  danger.  Not  from 
the  activities  of  our  lobstermen,  but  from  the  potential  effects  of  global  climate 
change. 

In  1999,  the  lobstermen  of  Long  Island  Sound  began  pulling  up  pots  full  of  dead 
lobster. According to a study by Connecticut’s Sea Grant program, that fall, commer-
cial landings from western Long Island Sound plummeted an astounding 99 percent 
from  the  previous  year.  Nearly  three-quarters  of  the  Sound’s  lobstermen  lost  all  of 
their income. The study concluded that, ‘‘the physiology of the lobsters was severely 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

4 

stressed  by  sustained,  hostile  environmental  conditions,  driven  by  above  average 
water  temperatures.’’  In  other  words,  warming  ocean  temperatures  created  condi-
tions that killed these lobsters and decimated the fishery. 

The lobster industry’s collapse in Long Island Sound may be a harbinger for other 
fisheries.  Evidence  is  mounting  that  anthropogenic  emissions  of  greenhouse  gas-
ses—carbon  dioxide  in  particular—are  disrupting  the  forces  that  drive  our  climate 
and in turn, our oceans. Approximately a third to a half of global manmade carbon 
dioxide emissions have already been absorbed into the world’s oceans. This amount 
will double by 2050, and all indications are that this will increase the acidity of the 
oceans’  surface  and  could  initiate  the  largest  change  in  pH  to  occur  in  as  many  as 
200  million  years.  Clearly,  the  consequences  of  such  a  shift  could  be  catastrophic. 
Which  is  why  my  colleague  Senator  Kerry  and  I  introduced  S.  485,  the  Global 
Warming  Reduction  Act  of  2007.  This  legislation  is  the  only  introduced  climate  bill 
that  specifically  calls  for  research  to  address  the  vulnerability  of  marine  organisms 
throughout the food chain to increased carbon dioxide emissions. It also requires an 
assessment  of  probability  that  such  a  change  will  cost  us  more  than  40  percent  of 
our  coral  reefs—delicate  ecosystems  that  are  especially  vulnerable  to  both  ocean 
acidification and warming. 

And coral reefs are just as integral to the economy and heritage of tropical states 
such  as  Florida  and  Hawaii  as  fisheries  are  to  Maine.  In  order  to  protect  these  re-
sources,  we  must  understand  what  is  happening  to  them.  The  final  report  of  the 
U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy, chaired by Admiral Watkins who is testifying be-
fore  us  today,  calls  for  development  and  implementation  of  a  sustained  Integrated 
Ocean  Observing  System  to  provide  the  data  necessary  to  understand  the  complex 
oceanic  and  atmospheric  systems—including  pH,  temperature,  salinity  and  the 
speed  and  direction  of  currents—that  comprise  our  oceans.  I  know  the  scientists 
here today also support that initiative, and I support it as well. 

In each of the past two Congresses, I have introduced a bill to authorize an Inte-
grated  Ocean  Observing  System  and  develop  a  national  framework  to  oversee  and 
our  numerous,  successful,  independent  regional  observing  systems.  Twice  this  bill 
has passed the Senate unanimously, but failed to pass the House. I have introduced 
a new version of this bill—the Coastal and Ocean Observation Systems Act of 2007, 
S. 950—in the 110th Congress, with sixteen bi-partisan co-sponsors, and I am work-
ing  closely  with  members  from  both  chambers  to  ensure  that  this  bill  becomes  law 
as soon as possible. 

Mounting evidence linking carbon emissions to potentially devastating changes in 
the  hydrology  of  our  oceans  compels  us  to  act  now  to  protect  the  future  of  the  irre-
placeable resources found beneath the waves. I will continue to do everything in my 
power  to  provide  our  scientists  with  the  requisite  tools  to  carry  our  their  research 
and ensure that we prevent further damage to these vital ecosystems. I thank Doc-
tors Feely, Conover, Doney, Kruse, and Hansen and Admiral Watkins for taking the 
time  to  engage  in  what  I  believe  will  be  a  fruitful  and  fascinating  discussion,  and 
I look forward to hearing all of your testimony. 

Thank you, Madam Chair. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
To maintain our sustainable fisheries, it is important that we try 
to  understand  how  changes  to  the  oceans’  environment  affect  our 
fish  stocks.  Much  of  the  focus  on  Capitol  Hill  and  in  the  media  is 
centered  on  how  climate  change  will  affect  life  on  land  through 
higher temperatures, storms, and sea levels. What many do not re-
alize  is  that  the  oceans  may  change  as  well  and,  as  the  chair-
woman has said, if the predictions are accurate these changes could 
have economic and serious consequences. 

Warm  ocean  temperatures  are  causing  widespread  coral  bleach-
ing  in  the  Caribbean.  In  Alaska  some  species  are  moving  north. 
There  is  concern  about  how  these  changes  will  affect  the  fisheries 
off our shores—half the coastline of the United States is in Alaska. 
We  know  very  little  about  these  changes.  We  do  not  know  how 
much  this  change  is  due  to  natural  variations  and  how  much  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

5 

manmade.  In  Alaska  our  fisheries  have  been  impacted  in  the  past 
due  to  natural  variations  in  ocean  temperature  caused  by  the  Pa-
cific Decadal Oscillation shifts in ocean currents. Some fisheries in 
Alaska  have  flourished  due  to  warmer  temperatures.  Others  have 
seen temporary declines. 

I  am  pleased  to  see  these  panelists  here  today,  Madam  Chair-
man.  What  we  have  been  witnessing  could  have  serious  con-
sequences  for  marine  life  and  fisheries  worldwide,  and  I  know 
these  panelists  can  help  the  Committee  identify  some  of  the  cur-
rent  gaps  in  our  knowledge.  We  need  to  make  sure  the  Federal 
agencies  have  the  resources  in  the  right  places  to  study  ocean 
acidification and climate change. 

I thank the panelists. I do particularly thank Dr. Gordon Kruse, 
who has traveled all the way from Juneau to participate in today’s 
hearing.  Dr.  Kruse  has  studied  fisheries  in  Alaska  for  decades, 
most  recently  serving  as  Chair  of  the  Scientific  and  Statistical 
Committee  of  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council. 
Their  Committee  plays  a  vital  role  in  what  the  Pew  Commission 
has stated is the best managed fishery in the world, thanks to the 
science that Dr. Kruse and others have given us. 

Let  me  welcome  Admiral  Watkins.  It  is  always  a  pleasure  to 
have  him  back  because  we  have  followed  his  thoughts  on  ocean 
policies for some time. I look forward to the testimony. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Senator Stevens. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  Thank  you  for 
all of you coming. I am the Senator from Minnesota. I am the only 
member  of  the  Committee  without  an  ocean.  But  I  am  pleased  to 
be  here,  of  course,  because  of  the  Great  Lakes  and  how  important 
that is to our way of life in Minnesota, with Lake Superior, as well 
as  our  economy  in  Minnesota.  I  will  tell  you  that  the  lake  levels 
in  the  Great  Lakes  continue  to  drop  and  we  are  seeing  an  impact 
on the economy. 

We  are  also  seeing  an  impact  of  climate  change  on  our  10,000 
lakes  that  we  are  so  proud  of  in  Minnesota.  That  is  what  our  li-
cense plate says and it is something we are proud of. But we have 
fishermen  who  cannot  put  their  icehouses  out  for  a  month.  We 
have all kinds of issues that are coming up with our wetlands. 

So  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  this  panel  and  thank  you  for 

coming today. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  With  that,  we  will  go  ahead  and  get  started 
with our witnesses. Mr. Doney, you are first. As I said, I think we 
are  asking  people  if  they  could  keep  their  comments  to  5  minutes, 
knowing that some of you who have slide presentations might take 
a  little  longer  just  to  get  through  that.  But  thank  you  very  much 
for being here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

6 

STATEMENT OF SCOTT C. DONEY, PH.D., SENIOR SCIENTIST, 
DEPARTMENT OF MARINE CHEMISTRY AND GEOCHEMISTRY, 

WOODS HOLE OCEANOGRAPHIC INSTITUTION 

Dr.  DONEY.  Thank  you.  Good  morning,  Madam  Chair,  Ranking 
Member  Stevens,  and  other  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  My 
name is Scott Doney and I am a Senior Scientist at the Woods Hole 
Oceanographic Institution, and I want to thank you—for the oppor-
tunity  to  talk  to  you  about  ocean  acidification  and  climate  change. 
There  is  a  broad  U.S.  scientific  consensus  that  human  activities 
are increasing atmospheric carbon dioxide, altering our planet’s cli-
mate  and  acidifying  the  ocean.  Climate  change  and  acidification 
will increasingly impact fisheries, coral reefs, coastal environments, 
and  the  important  economic  and  ecosystem  functions  delivered  by 
the  ocean.  We  have  an  opportunity  to  limit  the  negative  impacts 
of ocean acidification and climate change, but only if we take delib-
erate and immediate action. 

Atmospheric carbon dioxide has increased by 35 percent over the 
last 2 centuries, mostly due to fossil fuel combustion. Carbon diox-
ide  is  a  greenhouse  gas  that  traps  heat  near  the  Earth’s  surface. 
Climate  processes  amplify  the  impact  of  elevated  carbon  dioxide 
and  other  greenhouse  gases  and  lead  to  warming  of  the  land  and 
the  ocean,  melting  of  glaciers,  retreat  of  sea  ice,  and  rising  sea 
level. 

Global  warming  should  really  be  called  ocean  warming,  as  more 
than  80  percent  of  the  increased  heat  actually  ends  up  in  the 
ocean.  Measurements  show  that  ocean  warming  is  extending  from 
the  surface  down  to  a  depth  of  at  least  10,000  feet  and  over  the 
last  several  decades  there  has  been  a  retreat  of  Arctic  sea  ice  by 
15  to  20  percent  over  the  summer  and  some  models  predict  that 
we will have ice-free conditions in the Arctic by the year 2040. 

But  warming  is  not  the  only  impact  of  carbon  dioxide.  Elevated 
carbon  dioxide  also  alters  ocean  chemistry.  The  ocean  absorbs 
about  one-third  of  fossil  fuel  carbon  emissions  and  once  in  the 
ocean carbon dioxide combines with water to form an acid, leading 
to more acidic conditions. The physical chemistry of this process is 
well known and well understood. 

Climate  change  and  ocean  acidification  are  confirmed  by  real 
world  observations  and  are  supported  by  both  models  and  theory. 
Unless greenhouse gas emissions are curbed, these trends will only 
accelerate  over  the  next  several  decades.  Atmospheric  carbon  diox-
ide is already higher than at any time in the last half million years 
and  may  double  again  in  concentration  by  the  end  of  this  century. 
Warming  and  acidification  affect  ocean  plants  and  animals  both 
directly and via changes in the ecosystems which they depend upon 
for food and habitat. Some broad trends can be identified. These in-
clude  reduced  biological  productivity  in  low  and  mid  latitudes, 
polar shifts in warm-water species, and declines in corals and other 
shell-forming plants and animals. 

From  historical  data  we  know  that  commercially  important  spe-
cies  such  as  salmon  are  sensitive  to  climate-driven  changes  in  the 
base  of  the  ocean  food  chain.  Of  particular  concern  is  if  there  are 
climatic  tipping  points  in  the  future  that  may  induce  rapid  and 
dramatic  alterations  in  ocean  ecosystems.  My  fellow  panelists  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

7 

discuss  in  more  detail  some  of  the  changes  we  are  already  seeing 
and what we might expect to see in the future. 

For fisheries, climate and acidification impacts will likely exacer-
bate  other  problems,  including  overfishing,  pollution,  excess  nutri-
ents,  and  habitat  destruction.  Marine  life  has  survived  large  vari-
ations  in  the  past,  but  the  current  rates  of  climate  change  and 
ocean acidification are much faster than experienced in most of ge-
ological  history.  The  reality  of  climate  change  and  ocean  acidifica-
tion is now clear. Less clear is the total extent of the repercussions 
that we face. 

First  and  foremost,  we  need  to  control  and  reduce  the  emissions 
of  carbon  dioxide  and  other  greenhouse  gases  that  are  the  root  of 
the problem. 

Second,  we  need  enhanced  investment  in  an  effort  to  monitor 
ocean changes, understand biological responses, and convey this in-
formation to stakeholders. 

Third  and  finally,  we  need  a  comprehensive  ocean  management 
strategy  that  explicitly  addresses  the  need  to  adapt  to  climate 
change and acidification that are now unavoidable. 

Thank  you  for  giving  me  this  opportunity  to  address  the  Sub-

committee and I look forward to your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Doney follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SCOTT C.  DONEY,  PH.D.,  SENIOR SCIENTIST,  DEPARTMENT 
OF MARINE CHEMISTRY AND GEOCHEMISTRY,  WOODS HOLE OCEANOGRAPHIC 
INSTITUTION 1 

Introduction 

Good morning Madame Chair, Ranking Member Snowe and members of the Sub-
committee.  Thank  you  for  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today  on 
global climate change, ocean acidification and the resulting impacts on fisheries and 
living  marine  resources.  My  name  is  Scott  Doney,  and  I  am  a  Senior  Scientist  at 
the  Woods  Hole  Oceanographic  Institution  in  Woods  Hole,  Massachusetts.  My  re-
search  focuses  on  interactions  among  climate,  the  ocean  and  global  carbon  cycles, 
and marine ecosystems. I have published more than 90 peer-reviewed scientific jour-
nal  articles  and  book  chapters  on  these  and  related  subjects.  I  serve  on  the  U.S. 
Carbon  Cycle  Science  Program  Scientific  Steering  Group  and  the  U.S.  Community 
Climate  System  Model  Scientific  Steering  Committee,  and  I  am  Chair  of  the  U.S. 
Ocean  Carbon  and  Climate  Change  Scientific  Steering  Group  and  the  U.S.  Ocean 
Carbon and Biogeochemistry Scientific Steering Committee. 

For  today’s  hearing,  you  have  asked  me  to  discuss  the  mechanisms  by  which 
greenhouse  gases  impact  the  ocean,  coastal  environment,  and  living  marine  re-
sources,  gaps  in  our  current  scientific  understanding,  and  implications  for  resource 
management  including  adaptation  and  mitigation  strategies.  My  comments  are 
based  on  a  broad  scientific  consensus  as  represented  in  the  current  scientific  lit-
erature  and  in  community  assessments  such  as  the  2007  Intergovernmental  Panel 
on Climate Change (IPCC) reports (IPCC, 2007a; 2007b; 2007c). 

Over the past two centuries, human activities have resulted in dramatic increases 
in atmospheric carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases. There is broad scientific 
consensus  that  these  excess  greenhouse  gases  are  altering  our  planet’s  climate  and 
acidifying  the  ocean.  These  findings  are  confirmed  by  real-world  observations  and 
supported by theory and numerical models. Climate change and acidification trends 
will accelerate over the next several decades unless there is deliberate action to curb 
greenhouse  emissions.  Rising  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  and  climate  change 
produce  upper-ocean  warming,  sea-ice  retreat,  sea-level  rise,  ocean  acidification,  al-
tered freshwater distributions, and maybe even stronger storms. 

Growing evidence suggests that these human-driven climate change and acidifica-
tion will strongly impact ocean ecosystems as well. Further pressure will be put on 
living  marine  resources,  such  as  fisheries  and  coral  reefs  that  we  depend  upon  for 

1 The  views  expressed  here  do  not  necessarily  represent  those  of  the  Woods  Hole  Oceano-

graphic Institution. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

8 

food,  tourism  and  other  economic  and  aesthetic  benefits.  We  have  an  opportunity 
now  to  limit  the  negative  impact  of  climate  change  and  acidification  in  the  future. 
This will require a comprehensive ocean management strategy that incorporates sci-
entific understanding of climate change and acidification from the start. This strat-
egy  will  also  require  a  balance  between  adaptation  to  climate  change  and  acidifica-
tion that are unavoidable, and mitigation to reduce the rise in greenhouse gases and 
resulting impacts. 
Greenhouse Gases and Climate Change 

At  the  most  basic  level,  the  balance  between  incoming  sunlight  and  outgoing  in-
frared  radiation  (i.e.,  heat)  determines  Earth’s  climate.  The  greenhouse  gas  carbon 
dioxide  (CO2)  plays  a  key  role  by  absorbing  infrared  radiation  and  thus  trapping 
heat  near  the  Earth’s  surface  much  like  a  blanket.  Other  trace  greenhouse  gases 
such  as  methane  (CH4),  nitrous  oxide  (N2O),  and  chlorofluorocarbons  (CFCs)  are 
also important to warming, equivalent to about half of that from carbon dioxide, be-
cause  molecule  for  molecule  they  absorb  more  infrared  radiation  than  carbon  diox-
ide.  Other  factors  involved  in  human-driven  climate  change  include  aerosols  and 
land vegetation. 

Over  the  last  two  centuries,  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  has  increased  by  more 
than  30  percent,  from  280  to  380  ppm  (part  per  million)  by  2007.  The  main  source 
is fossil-fuel combustion with contributions from cement production, agriculture and 
deforestation.  Many  economic  and  climate  models  predict  atmospheric  carbon  diox-
ide values as high as 700 to 1,000 ppm, about triple preindustrial levels, by the end 
of the twenty-first century. The Earth has not experienced carbon dioxide levels that 
high for the past several million years. Other trace greenhouse gas levels are grow-
ing  as  well  due  to  land-use,  agriculture  and  industrial  practices.  These  greenhouse 
gases persist in the atmosphere for years to decades, meaning that they will remain 
and  accumulate  in  the  atmosphere,  impacting  the  global  climate  for  a  long  time  to 
come.  In  contrast,  aerosols  in  the  lower  atmosphere  are  removed  on  time-scales  of 
a  few  days  to  weeks,  and  their  climatic  impacts,  mostly  cooling,  are  concentrated 
near their sources. 

Greenhouse  gases  dominate  over  other  human-driven  climate  perturbations,  and 
the  increased  heating  translates  into  changes  in  climate  properties  such  as  surface 
temperature,  rainfall,  sea-level  and  storm  frequency  and  strength.  The  climate 
change  resulting  from  an  increase  in  greenhouse  gases  can  be  amplified  by  other 
climate  processes.  For  example,  ocean  warming  leads  to  a  large  retreat  in  Arctic 
sea-ice,  which  further  strengthens  warming  because  the  dark  water  surface  can 
then  absorb  more  sunlight  than  the  highly  reflective  ice.  The  largest  unknowns  at 
present arise from cloud dynamics. Numerical model climate projections for this cen-
tury show global mean surface temperature increasing, with a range of +1.1 to 6.4° 
C  (+2.0  to  11.5°  F)  above  late  20th  century  levels.  This  large  temperature  range  is 
somewhat  misleading  as  a  significant  fraction  of  the  variation  depends  on  human 
behavior,  specifically  how  much  carbon  dioxide  and  other  gases  we  emit  to  the  at-
mosphere  in  the  future.  The  lowest  temperature  projections  occur  only  when  emis-
sions are reduced sharply over the next few decades. 

The  largest  projected  temperature  changes  are  concentrated  over  the  continents 
and  at  higher  latitudes  during  the  winter  season,  but  some  level  of  warming  will 
occur globally, over the ocean, and year-round. Sea-level is estimated to rise due to 
thermal  warming  and  melting  glaciers  and  ice  sheets  by  an  additional  +0.18  to 
0.59m (+0.6 to 1.9 feet) by 2,100. Many simulations suggest a general strengthening 
of  the  water  cycle,  with  increased  precipitation  in  the  tropics  and  high  latitudes, 
drier  conditions  in  the  subtropics,  and  an  increased  frequency  of  extreme  droughts 
and floods. Other common features of a warmer climate are more El Nin˜ o-like condi-
tions in the Equatorial Pacific, a melt back of polar sea-ice and glaciers, and a slow-
down in the formation of ocean deep water at high latitudes. 
The Changing Ocean Environment 

Global  warming  should  be  called  ocean  warming,  as  more  than  80  percent  of  the 
added  heat  resides  in  the  ocean.  Clear  alterations  to  the  ocean  have  already  been 
detected  from  observations.  The  magnitude  and  patterns  of  these  changes  are  con-
sistent  with  an  attribution  to  human  activities  and  not  explained  by  natural  varia-
bility alone. Global average land and ocean surface temperatures increased at a rate 
of  about  0.2°  C/decade  over  the  last  few  decades  (Hansen  et  al.,  2006),  and  ocean 
temperatures  down  to  3,000  m  (10,000  feet)  depth  are  also  on  the  rise.  Averages 
rates of sea-level rise over the last several decades were 1.8±0.5 mm/y, with an even 
larger  rate  (3.1±0.7  mm/y)  over  the  most  recent  decade.  Higher  precipitation  rates 
are  observed  at  mid  to  high  latitude  and  lower  rates  in  the  tropics  and  subtropics. 
Corresponding  changes  have  been  measured  in  surface  water  salinities.  One  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

9 

most  striking  trends  is  the  decline  in  Arctic  sea-ice  extent,  particularly  over  the 
summer. September Arctic ice-cover from 2002–2006 was 18 percent lower than pre- 
1980  ice-cover  (http://www.arctic.noaa.gov/detect/ice-seaice.shtml),  and  some  mod-
els  predict  near  ice-free  conditions  by  2040.  Recent  studies  of  the  Greenland  ice 
sheet  highlight  an  alarming  increase  in  surface  melting  over  the  summer,  and  per-
colation  of  that  melt  water  to  the  base  of  the  ice  sheet  where  the  melt-water  could 
lubricate ice flow and potentially greatly accelerate ice loss and sea-level rise. These 
new findings have not been full incorporated into projected sea-level rise estimates, 
which thus may be underestimated. 

Over  half  of  human  carbon  dioxide  emissions  to  the  atmosphere  are  absorbed  by 
the ocean and land biospheres (Sarmiento and Gruber, 2002), and the excess carbon 
absorbed by the ocean results in increased ocean acidity. The physical and chemical 
mechanisms  by  which  this  occurs  are  well  understood.  Once  carbon  dioxide  enters 
the  ocean,  it  combines  with  water  to  form  carbonic  acid  and  a  series  of  acid-base 
products,  resulting  in  a  lowering  of  pH  values.  The  amount  and  distribution  of 
human-generated  carbon  in  the  oceans  are  well  determined  from  an  international 
ocean survey conducted in the late 1980s and early 1990s (Sabine et al., 2004). The 
rate  of  ocean  carbon  uptake  is  controlled  by  ocean  circulation.  Most  of  the  excess 
carbon  is  found  in  the  upper  few  hundred  meters  of  the  ocean  (upper  1,200  feet) 
and in high-latitude regions, where cold dense waters sink into the deep ocean. Sur-
face  water  pH  values  have  already  dropped  by  about  0.1  pH  units  from 
preindustrial  levels  and  are  expected  to  drop  by  an  additional  0.14–0.35  units  by 
the end of the 21st century (Orr et al., 2005). 
Climate Change and Ocean Acidification Impacts on Marine Ecosystems 

Climate change and ocean acidification will exacerbate other human influences on 
fisheries and marine ecosystems such as over-fishing, habitat destruction, pollution, 
excess nutrients, and invasive species. Thermal effects arise both directly, via effects 
of  elevated  temperature  and  lower  pH  on  individual  organisms,  and  indirectly  via 
changes  to  the  ecosystems  on  which  they  depend  for  food  and  habitat.  Acidification 
harms  shell-forming  plants  and  animals  including  surface  and  deep-water  corals, 
many  plankton,  pteropods  (marine  snails),  mollusks  (clams,  oysters),  and  lobsters 
(Orr  et  al.,  2005).  Many  of  these  organisms  provide  critical  habitat  and/or  food 
sources  for  other  organisms.  Emerging  evidence  suggests  that  larval  and  juvenile 
fish  may  also  be  susceptible  to  pH  changes.  Marine  life  has  survived  large  climate 
and  acidification  variations  in  the  past,  but  the  projected  rates  of  climate  change 
and  ocean  acidification  over  the  next  century  are  much  faster  than  experienced  by 
the  planet  in  the  past  except  for  rare,  catastrophic  events  in  the  geological  record. 
One concern is that climate change will alter the rates and patterns of ocean pro-
ductivity.  Small,  photosynthetic  phytoplankton  grow  in  the  well-illuminated  upper 
ocean,  forming  the  base  of  the  marine  food  web,  supporting  the  fish  stocks  we  har-
vest,  and  underlying  the  biogeochemical  cycling  of  carbon  and  many  other  key  ele-
ments  in  the  sea.  Phytoplankton  growth  depends  upon  temperature  and  the  avail-
ability of light and nutrients, including nitrogen, phosphorus, silicon and iron. Most 
of  the  nutrient  supply  to  the  surface  ocean  comes  from  the  mixing  and  upwelling 
of  cold,  nutrient  rich  water  from  below.  An  exception  is  iron,  which  has  an  impor-
tant  additional  source  from  mineral  dust  swept  off  the  desert  regions  of  the  con-
tinents and transported off-shore from coastal ocean sediments. The geographic dis-
tribution of phytoplankton and biological productivity is determined largely by ocean 
circulation  and  upwelling,  with  the  highest  levels  found  along  the  Equator,  in  tem-
perate and polar latitudes and along the western boundaries of continents. 

Key  climate-plankton  linkages  arise  through  changes  in  nutrient  supply  and 
ocean  mixed  layer  depths,  which  affect  the  light  availability  to  surface  phytoplank-
ton.  In  the  tropics  and  mid-latitudes,  there  is  limited  vertical  mixing  because  the 
water  column  is  stabilized  by  thermal  stratification;  i.e.,  light,  warm  waters  overlie 
dense, cold waters. In these areas, surface nutrients are typically low, which directly 
limits phytoplankton growth. Climate warming will likely further inhibit mixing, re-
ducing  the  upward  nutrient  supply  and  thus  lowering  biological  productivity.  The 
nutrient-driven  productivity  declines  even  with  warmer  temperatures,  which  pro-
mote  faster  growth.  At  higher  latitudes,  phytoplankton  often  have  access  to  abun-
dant  nutrients  but  are  limited  by  a  lack  of  sunlight.  In  these  areas,  warming  and 
reduced mixed layer depths can increase productivity. 

A  synthesis  of  climate-change  simulations  shows  broad  patterns  with  declining 
low-latitude  productivity,  somewhat  elevated  high-latitude  productivity,  and  pole- 
ward  migration  of  marine  ecosystem  boundaries  as  the  oceans  warm;  simulated 
global productivity increased by up to 8.0 percent (Sarmiento et al., 2004). While not 
definitive proof of future trends, similar relationships of ocean stratification and pro-
ductivity have been observed in year to year variability of satellite ocean color data, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

10 

a proxy for surface phytoplankton (Beherenfeld et al., 2006); satellite data for 1997– 
2005  from  GeoEYE  and  NASA’s  Sea-Viewing  Wide  Field-of-View  Sensor  (SeaWiFS) 
show that phytoplankton declined in the tropics and subtropics during warm phases 
of the El Nin˜ o-Southern Oscillation (ENSO) marked by higher sea surface tempera-
tures  and  ocean  stratification.  Ecosystem  dynamics  are  complex  and  non-linear, 
however, and new and unexpected phenomena may arise as the planet enters a new 
warmer  and  unexplored  climate  state.  Ocean  nitrogen  fixation,  for  example,  is  con-
centrated  in  warm,  nutrient  poor  surface  waters,  and  it  may  increase  under  future 
more stratified conditions, enhancing overall productivity. 

Changes in total biological productivity are only part of the story, as most human 
fisheries  exploit  particular  marine  species,  not  overall  productivity.  The  distribu-
tions  and  population  sizes  of  individual  species  are  more  sensitive  to  warming  and 
altered  ocean  circulation  than  total  productivity.  Temperature  effects  arise  through 
altered  organism  physiology  and  ecological  changes  in  food  supplies  and  predators. 
Warming  and  shifts  in  seasonal  temperature  patterns  will  disrupt  predator-prey 
interactions;  this  is  especially  important  for  survival  of  juvenile  fish,  which  often 
hatch  at  a  particular  time  of  year  and  depend  up  on  immediate,  abundant  source 
of  prey.  Temperature  changes  will  also  alter  the  spread  of  diseases  and  parasites 
in both natural ecosystems and marine aquaculture. Warming impacts will interact 
and  perhaps  exacerbate  other  problems  including  over-fishing  and  habitat  destruc-
tion. 

Food-web interactions are often complicated, and we should expect that some spe-
cies  will  suffer  under  climate  change  while  others  will  benefit.  Broadly  speaking 
though,  warm-water  species  are  expected  to  shift  poleward,  which  already  appears 
to  be  occurring  in  some  fisheries  (Brander,  2006).  Biological  transitions,  however, 
may  be  abrupt  rather  than  smooth.  Large-scale  regime  shifts  have  been  observed 
in  response  to  past  natural  variability.  Regime  shifts  involve  wholesale  reorganiza-
tions of biological food-webs and can have large consequences from plankton to fish, 
marine mammals and sea-birds. Thus, rather subtle climate changes or ocean acidi-
fication may have the potential to disrupt commercially important species for either 
fisheries  or  tourism.  Decadal  time-scale  regime  shifts  have  been  documented  in  the 
North  Pacific,  and  in  the  Southern  Ocean  observations  show  a  large-scale  replace-
ment  of  krill,  a  food  source  for  mammals  and  penguin,  by  gelatinous  zooplankton 
called salps. 

A  number  of  other  factors  also  need  to  be  considered.  Species  that  spend  part  of 
their life-cycle in coastal waters will be impacted by degradation of near-shore nurs-
ery environments, such as mangrove forests, marshes and estuaries, because of sea- 
level  rise,  pollution  and  habitat  destruction.  Rainfall  and  river  flow  perturbations 
will  alter  coastal  freshwater  currents,  affecting  the  transport  of  eggs  and  larvae. 
Some of the largest fisheries around the world, for example off Peru and west coast 
of  Africa,  occur  because  of  wind-driven  coastal  upwelling,  which  may  be  sensitive 
to climate change. Warming will reduce gas solubility and thus increases the likeli-
hood of low oxygen or anoxia events already seen in some estuaries and coastal re-
gions, such as off the Mississippi River in the Gulf of Mexico. 
Knowledge Gaps and Ocean Research Priorities 

Accurate  projections  of  climate  change  and  ocean  acidification  impacts  on  living 
marine  resources  hinge  on  several  key  questions:  (1)  how  will  greenhouse  gas  and 
aerosol  emissions  and  atmospheric  composition  evolve  in  the  future?  (2)  how  sen-
sitive  are  regional-scale  ocean  physics  and  chemistry  to  these  changes  in  atmos-
pheric composition? and (3) how will individual species and whole-ocean ecosystems 
respond? Fossil fuels are deeply intertwined in the modern global economy, and car-
bon  dioxide  emissions  depend  upon  changing  social  and  economic  factors  that  are 
not well known: global population, per capita energy use, technological development, 
national and international policy decisions, and deliberate climate mitigation efforts. 
Future  projections  of  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  levels  are  also  relatively  sensitive 
to  assumptions  about  the  behavior  of  land  and  ocean  carbon  sinks,  which  are  ex-
pected  to  change  due  to  saturation  effects  and  responses  to  the  modified  physical 
climate (Fung et al., 2005). Climate change on local and regional scales is more rel-
evant  for  people  and  ecosystems  than  global  trends.  While  progress  is  being  made, 
improved and better-validated regional ocean climate forecasts remain a major need 
for future research. 

Even  when  predictions  about  the  physical  environment  are  well  known,  signifi-
cant knowledge gaps exist about ocean ecology, hindering the creation of the skillful 
forecasts needed to guide ocean management decisions. While not precluding taking 
action now to address climate change and ocean acidification, better scientific under-
standing  will  help  refine  ocean  management  in  the  long-term.  Several  elements 
need  to  be  pursued  in  parallel:  improved  on-going  monitoring  of  ocean  climate  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

11 

biological  trends;  laboratory  and  field  process  studies  to  quantify  biological  climate 
sensitivities; historical and paleoclimate studies of past climate events; and incorpo-
ration  of  the  resulting  scientific  insights  into  an  improved  hierarchy  of  numerical 
ocean models from species to ecosystems. 

Rapid  advances  in  in  situ  sensors  and  autonomous  platforms,  such  as  moorings, 
floats  and  gliders,  are  revolutionizing  ocean  measurements,  and  ocean  observing 
networks  are  being  constructed  for  coastal  and  open  ocean  regions  (e.g.,  Gulf  of 
Maine  Ocean  Observing  System  http://www.gomoos.org/;  Pacific  Coast  Ocean  Ob-
serving  System  http://www.pacoos.org/;  National  Science  Foundation  Ocean  Ob-
serving  Initiative  http://www.ooi.org).  The  number  of  historical,  multi-decadal 
ocean time series is limited, but their scientific utility is almost unrivalled. Federal 
commitment is needed for continued, long-term investment in ocean monitoring and 
enhanced coordination across observing networks. 

In  a  similar  vein,  satellite  measurements  provide  an  unprecedented  view  of  the 
temporal variations in ocean climate and ecology. The ocean is vast, and the limited 
number of research ships move at about the speed of a bicycle, too slow to map the 
ocean  routinely  on  ocean  basin  to  global  scales.  By  contrast,  a  satellite  can  observe 
the entire globe, at least the cloud free areas, in a few days. The detection of grad-
ual climate-change trends is challenging, and the on-going availability of high-qual-
ity, climate data records is not assured during the transition of many satellite ocean 
measurements  from  NASA  research  to  the  NOAA/DOD  operational  NPOESS  pro-
gram. For example, the present NASA satellite ocean color sensors, needed to deter-
mine ocean plankton, are nearing the end of their service life, and the replacement 
sensors  on  NPOESS  may  not  be  adequate  for  the  climate  community.  Further,  re-
focusing of NASA priorities away from Earth science may dramatically limit or fully 
preclude new ocean satellite missions needed to characterize ocean climate and bio-
logical dynamics. 

We  need  to  know  if  there  are  climatic  tipping  points  or  thresholds  beyond  which 
climate  change  may  induce  rapid  and  dramatic  regime  shifts  in  ocean  ecosystems. 
Many  current  scientific  studies  examine  climate  sensitivities  of  species  in  isolation; 
the  next  step  involves  examining  responses  of  species  populations,  communities  of 
multiple  interacting  species,  and  entire  ecosystems  to  realistic  size  perturbations. 
Experiments  on  plankton  and  benthic  communities  can  be  conducted  under  rel-
atively  controlled  conditions  in  mesocosms  (large  enclosed  volumes  such  as  aquar-
ium  or  floating  bags  deployed  at  sea)  or  by  deliberate  open-water  perturbations 
studies.  Both  approaches  will  benefit  from  further  directed  technological  develop-
ments.  Larger  mobile  species  require  different  approaches  such  as  using  past  cli-
mate events as analogues for human-driven climate change. Biology models are piv-
otal  to  ocean  management.  They  are  being  improved  progressively  by  incorporating 
new  information  from  laboratory  and  field  experiments  and  by  comparing  model 
forecasts with real-world data. It is often as important to identify where the models 
do  poorly  as  where  they  do  well  because  research  can  then  be  focused  on  resolving 
these model errors. 
Climate Adaptation, Mitigation, and Ocean Management 

Given  the  potential  for  significant  negative  impacts  of  climate  change  and  ocean 
acidification on living marine resources, we need to develop comprehensive local, na-
tional and international ocean management strategies that fully incorporate climate 
change  and  acidification  trends  and  uncertainties.  The  strategies  should  follow  a 
precautionary  approach  that  accounts  for  the  fact  that  ocean  biological  thresholds 
are unknown. The strategies should include improved scientific information for deci-
sion-support,  adaptation  to  reduce  negative  climate  change  and  acidification  im-
pacts, and mitigation to decrease the magnitude of future climate change and acidi-
fication. 

Currently  the  United  States  and  other  countries  invest  significant  resources  in 
monitoring  the  ocean  and  improving  scientific  understanding  on  many  of  the  phys-
ical,  chemical  and  biological  processes  relevant  to  climate  change  and  acidification. 
However, this wealth of data and information is typically not in a form that is easily 
accessible by ocean resource managers and other stakeholders, ranging from private 
citizens  and  small-businesses  to  large  corporations,  NGO’s  and  national  govern-
ments.  For  example,  even  state-of-the-art  climate  projections  typically  resolve  cli-
mate  patterns  at  relatively  coarse  spatial  resolutions  and  include  either  relatively 
simple ocean biology or no ocean biology at all. In contrast, decisionmakers need in-
formation  tailored  to  specific  local  fisheries  and  ecosystems.  The  national  climate 
modeling  centers  should  be  encouraged  to  create  on  a  routine  basis  targeted  ocean 
biological-physical  forecasts  on  seasonal  to  decadal  time-scales,  building  on  nested 
regional  models,  probabilistic  and  ensemble  modeling  of  uncertainties,  and 
downscaling  methods  developed  for  related  applications  (e.g.,  agriculture,  water-re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

12 

sources).  The  utility  of  such  forecasts  and  their  uncertainties  will  be  maximized  if 
stakeholders  are  involved  in  their  design  from  the  onset  and  if  the  model  results 
are  translated  into  more  accessible  electronic  forms  that  are  widely  distributed  to 
the public. 

A  second  challenge  is  to  create  more  adaptive  ocean  management  strategies  that 
emphasize complete and transparent discussion on the risks and uncertainties from 
climate change and ocean acidification. Some amount of climate change and acidifi-
cation  is  unavoidable  because  of  past  greenhouse  emissions,  and  even  under  rel-
atively optimistic scenarios for the future, substantial further ocean impacts should 
be  expected  at  least  through  mid-century  and  beyond.  Decisions  will  need  to  be 
made  in  the  face  of  uncertainty,  relying  on  for  example  the  precautionary  principle 
to  limit  future  risk.  Climate  change  trends  are  growing  in  magnitude,  but  will  still 
be  gradual  compared  with  natural  interannual  variability;  management  policies 
must  include  both  types  of  variations  and  uncertainties.  Empirical  approaches  de-
veloped from historical data cannot be used in isolation because climate change will 
shift  the  baseline  for  ocean  biological  systems.  Serious  efforts  should  be  directed  at 
reducing  other  human  factors  such  as  overfishing  and  habitat  destruction  to  allow 
more  time  for  ecosystems  and  social  systems  to  adapt.  Mechanisms  such  as  marine 
reserves,  that  protect  specified  geographical  locations,  need  to  account  for  the  fact 
that  ecosystem  boundaries  will  shift  under  climate  change.  Procedures  also  need  to 
be in place to monitor over time the effectiveness of ocean conservation and manage-
ment policies, and that information and improved future climate forecasts should be 
used to modify and adapt management approaches. 

The  third  challenge  is  to  pursue  climate  mitigation  approaches  that  limit  the 
emissions  of  carbon  dioxide  and  other  greenhouse  gases  to  the  atmosphere  or  that 
remove  fossil-fuel  carbon  dioxide  that  is  already  in  the  atmosphere.  Stabilizing  fu-
ture atmospheric carbon dioxide at moderate levels to minimize climate change im-
pacts  will  require  a  mix  of  approaches,  and  no  single  mechanism  will  solve  the  en-
tire  problem.  Emissions  of  carbon  dioxide  can  be  reduced  through  energy  conserva-
tion  and  transition  to  alternative,  non-fossil  fuel  based  energy  sources  (wind,  solar, 
nuclear,  biofuels).  Attention  also  needs  to  be  placed  in  the  near-term  on  limiting 
other  greenhouse  gases  such  as  chlorofluorocarbons,  which  may  provide  additional 
time to tackle the more challenging issues associated with carbon. Progress is being 
made  on  approaches  that  would  remove  carbon  dioxide  at  power  plants  so  that  it 
can  be  sequestered  in  subsurface  geological  reservoirs  (e.g.,  old  oil  and  gas  fields, 
salt domes). 

Mitigation  approaches  have  also  been  proposed  using  ocean  biology,  but  these 
methods  should  only  be  pursued  if  critical  questions  are  resolved  on  their  effective-
ness and environmental consequences. Biological mitigation strategies are based on 
the fact that plants and some marine microbes naturally convert carbon dioxide into 
organic  matter  during  photosynthesis.  Enhancing  biological  carbon  removal  can  re-
duce  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  if  the  additional  organic  matter  is  stored  away 
from  the  atmosphere  for  multiple  decades  to  a  century  or  longer.  The  deep-ocean 
is  one  such  reservoir  because  it  exchanges  only  slowly  with  the  surface  and  atmos-
phere. Thus one potential mitigation method would be to fertilize the surface ocean 
phytoplankton  so  that  they  produce  and  export  more  organic  carbon  into  the  deep 
ocean. In many areas of the ocean, phytoplankton growth is limited by the trace ele-
ment  iron,  which  is  very  low  in  surface  waters  away  from  continents  and  dust 
sources.  About  a  dozen  scientific  experiments  have  been  conducted  successfully 
showing  that  adding  iron  to  the  surface  ocean  causes  a  phytoplankton  bloom  and 
temporary drawdown in surface water carbon dioxide. But there remain outstanding 
scientific  questions  about  whether  iron  resulted  in  any  enhanced  long-term  carbon 
storage in the ocean. 

As  with  any  other  mitigation  approach  on  land  or  in  the  sea,  the  scientific  and 
policy  communities  need  to  work  closely  to  assure  that  the  following  questions  are 
answered  for  large-scale  commercial  ocean  fertilization.  Is  the  method  effective  in 
removing  carbon  from  the  atmosphere,  can  the  removal  be  validated,  and  how  long 
will  it  remain  sequestered?  Could  the  method  result  in  unintended  consequences 
such  as  enhanced  emissions  of  other,  more  powerful  greenhouse  gases  (in  the  case 
of  iron  fertilization  potentially  nitrous  oxide  and  perhaps  methane)?  What  are  the 
broad  ecological  consequences,  and  could  carbon  mitigation  efforts  conflict  with 
maintaining  living  marine  resources  and  fisheries?  Systematic  approaches  to  verify 
effectiveness  and  environmental  impacts  need  to  be  put  in  place  to  assure  a  level 
playing field for commercial mitigation and carbon credit trading systems. 
Conclusions 

Over the past two centuries, human activities have resulted in the buildup in the 
atmosphere of excess carbon dioxide, other greenhouse gases and aerosols. There is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

13 

now significant evidence that these changes in atmospheric composition are altering 
the planet’s climate. Human-driven climate change is expected to accelerate over the 
next  several  decades,  leading  to  extensive  global  warming,  sea-ice  retreat,  sea-level 
rise,  ocean  acidification,  and  alterations  in  the  freshwater  cycle.  As  the  reality  of 
climate  change  is  becoming  clearer,  the  emphasis  shifts  toward  understanding  the 
impact  of  these  climate  perturbations  on  society  and  on  natural  and  managed  eco-
systems. 

Marine  fisheries  and  ocean  ecosystems  are  susceptible  to  global  warming  and 
ocean acidification. While ocean biological responses will vary from region to region, 
some broad trends can be identified including poleward shifts in warm-water species 
and reduced formation of calcium carbonate by corals and other shell-forming plants 
and animals. For fisheries, climate change impacts will interact and perhaps exacer-
bate  other  problems  including  over-fishing  and  habitat  destruction.  Management 
strategies are needed balancing adaptation to an evolving climate and mitigation to 
reduce  the  magnitude  of  future  climate  change  and  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide 
growth.  Decision  support  tools  should  be  developed  for  marine  resource  managers 
that  incorporate  the  emerging  scientific  understanding  on  climate  change,  focusing 
on  impacts  over  the  next  several  decades.  Systematic  testing  is  required  on  the  ef-
fectiveness  and  environmental  consequences  of  climate  mitigation  approaches,  such 
as deliberate iron fertilization, designed to sequester additional carbon in the ocean. 
Thank  you  for  giving  me  this  opportunity  to  address  this  Subcommittee,  and  I 

look forward to answering your questions. 
Selected References 

Brander,  K.  (2006)  Assessment  of  Possible  Impacts  of  Climate  Change  on  Fish-
eries.  Externe  Expertise  fu¨ r  das  WBGU-Sondergutachten  ‘‘Die  Zukunft  der  Meere— 
zu warm, zu hoch, zu sauer,’’ Berlin WBGU, 27 pp. 

Fung,  I.,  S.C.  Doney,  K.  Lindsay,  and  J.  John,  2005:  Evolution  of  carbon  sinks 
in a changing climate, Proc. Nat. Acad. Sci. (USA), 102, 11201–11206, doi: 10.1073/ 
pnas.0504949102. 

Hansen,  J.,  M.  Sato,  R.  Ruedy,  K.  Lo,  D.W.  Lea,  and  M.  Medina-Elizade,  2006: 
Global  temperature  change,  Proc.  Nat.  Acad.  Sci.  USA,  103,  14288–14293,  10.1073/ 
pnas.0606291103. 

IPCC,  (2007a)  The  Physical  Science  Basis,  Summary  for  Policymakers,  Contribu-
tions of Working Group I to the Fourth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental 
Panel on Climate Change, 18 pp., (http://www.ipcc.ch/). 

IPCC, (2007b) Impacts, Adaptation and Vulnerability, Summary for Policymakers, 
Contributions of Working Group II to the Fourth Assessment Report of the Intergov-
ernmental Panel on Climate Change, 22pp., (http://www.ipcc.ch/). 

IPCC,  (2007c)  Mitigation  of  Climate  Change,  Summary  for  Policymakers,  Con-
tributions  of  Working  Group  III  to  the  Fourth  Assessment  Report  of  the  Intergov-
ernmental Panel on Climate Change, 36 pp., (http://www.ipcc.ch/). 

Orr,  J.C.,  V.J.  Fabry,  O.  Aumont  et  al.,  (2005)  Anthropogenic  ocean  acidification 
over the twenty-first century and its impact on marine calcifying organisms, Nature, 
437, 681–686, doi: 10.1038/nature04095. 

Sabine,  C.L.,  R.A.  Feely,  N.  Gruber  et  al.,  (2004)  The  oceanic  sink  for  anthropo-

genic CO2, Science, 305, 367–371. 

Today, August, 30–36. 

Sarmiento,  J.L.  and  N.  Gruber  (2002)  Sinks  for  anthropogenic  carbon,  Physics 

Sarmiento,  J.L.,  et  al.,  (2004)  Response  of  ocean  ecosystems  to  climate  warming, 

Global Biogeochem. Cycles, 18, GB3003, doi: 10.1029/2003GB002134. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Dr.  Feely,  thank  you  very  much  for  being  here.  We  are  very 
proud,  obviously,  of  the  Pacific  Marine  Environmental  Laboratory 
in the Northwest and we appreciate you being here as NOAA’s rep-
resentative today. 

STATEMENT OF RICHARD A. FEELY, PH.D., SUPERVISORY 

CHEMICAL OCEANOGRAPHER, PACIFIC MARINE 

ENVIRONMENTAL LABORATORY, NOAA, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Dr.  FEELY.  Thank  you  very  much.  Good  morning,  Madam  Chair 
Cantwell,  Ranking  Member  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  My  name  is  Richard  Feely  and  I  am  a  Supervisory 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

14 

Oceanographer  at  NOAA’s  Pacific  Marine  Environmental  Labora-
tory  in  Seattle.  Part  of  NOAA’s  mission  is  to  understand  and  pre-
dict  changes  in  Earth’s  environment.  My  area  of  expertise  and  the 
focus of my research is that of the study of the ocean’s carbon cycle 
and  its  effect  on  marine  life.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  today  to 
provide  my  insights  on  ocean  acidification  and  its  effects  on  living 
marine resources. 

Over  the  past  200  years  the  release  of  carbon  dioxide  from  our 
collective  industrial  and  agricultural  activities  has  resulted  in  at-
mospheric  CO2 concentration  increases  of  about  100  parts  per  mil-
lion.  During  this  period  the  oceans  have  absorbed  525  billion  tons 
of  carbon  dioxide  from  the  atmosphere.  This  is  about  one-third  of 
human-generated  carbon  dioxide  emissions.  The  oceans’  daily  up-
take  of  22  million  tons  of  carbon  dioxide  is  now  starting  to  have 
a significant impact on the chemistry and biology of the oceans. 

Hydrographic  surveys  and  modeling  studies  reveal  the  chemical 
changes  that  have  taken  place.  We  see  change  in  the  lowering  of 
the  pH.  This  pH  is  a  measure  of  the  acidity  and  the  acidity  of  our 
oceans has changed by 30 percent since the beginning of the Indus-
trial  Revolution.  Our  projections  through  the  end  of  the  century 
suggest  that  the  acidity  may  change  by  as  much  as  150  percent  if 
we follow CO2 emissions scenarios based on the IPCC IS92a projec-
tions. 

This  process  of  acidification  of  the  oceans  is  causing  a  lowering 
of the carbonate ion concentration levels as well. The carbonate ion 
plays  an  important  role  in  shell  formation  for  a  number  of  marine 
organisms,  such  as  corals,  marine  plankton,  and  shellfish.  Many 
marine organisms which use carbonate ions to produce calcium car-
bonate shells experience detrimental effects due to these increasing 
CO2 levels. 

For  example,  ocean  acidification  is  shown  to  significantly  affect 
coral  reefs.  It  reduces  the  ability  of  rebuilding  corals  to  produce 
their  skeletons,  affecting  growth  of  individual  corals  and  making 
the  reefs  more  vulnerable  to  erosion.  Some  estimates  indicate  that 
by  the  end  of  this  century  coral  reefs  may  erode  faster  than  they 
can  be  rebuilt.  This  could  compromise  the  long-term  viability  of 
these  ecosystems  and  perhaps  affect  the  thousands  of  species  that 
depend on this particular habitat. 

In  long-term  experiments,  corals  grown  under  the  most  acidic 
conditions for periods more than 1 year have not shown the ability 
to adapt their calcification rates to these higher CO2 levels. In fact, 
a recent study has shown that projected CO2 increase in the oceans 
is  sufficient  to  dissolve  the  calcium  carbonate  skeletons  of  some 
coral reef species. 

Ongoing  research  has  shown  that  the  increase  in  acidity  may 
have deleterious impacts on commercially important fish and shell-
fish  larvae.  Both  king  crab  and  silver  seabream  larvae  exhibit  a 
very high mortality rate in CO2-rich waters. The calcification rates 
of the edible mussel and Pacific oyster of the Pacific Northwest re-
gion  decline  linearly  with  increasing  CO2 levels.  Squid  are  espe-
cially  sensitive  to  ocean  acidification  because  it  directly  affects 
their  blood  oxygen  transport  and  respiration.  Scientists  have  been 
seeing  a  reduced  ability  of  marine  algae,  free-floating  plants  and 
animals to produce their protective calcium carbonate shells. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

15 

One  of  these  free-swimming  mollusks  is  called  a  pteropod. 
Pteropods are eaten by organisms ranging from krill to whales and 
are a major food source for North Pacific juvenile salmon and serve 
as  food  for  mackerel,  pollock,  herring,  and  cod.  Ocean  acidification 
is one of the most significant and far-reaching consequences of the 
buildup of human-generated carbon dioxide in the atmosphere and 
the oceans. Results from laboratory, field, and modeling studies, as 
well  as  evidence  from  the  geological  record,  clearly  indicate  that 
many  ecosystems  are  highly  susceptible  to  changes  in  ocean  CO2 
and  the  corresponding  decrease  in  pH  and  increase  in  acidity.  Be-
cause  of  the  very  clear  potential  for  ocean-wide  effects  of  ocean 
acidification  at  all  levels  of  the  marine  ecosystem  from  the  tiniest 
phytoplankton  to  the  zooplankton  to  fish  and  shellfish,  we  can  ex-
pect  to  see  significant  effects  that  are  immensely  important  for 
mankind. 

Ocean  acidification  is  an  emerging  scientific  issue  and  much  re-
search is needed before all the species and ecosystem responses are 
well  understood.  However,  to  the  limit  that  the  scientific  commu-
nity  understands  this  issue  right  now,  the  potential  for  environ-
mental,  economic,  and  societal  risk  is  quite  high.  Ocean  acidifica-
tion demands serious and immediate attention. 

For  these  reasons,  the  national  and  technological  scientific  com-
munities  have  recommended  a  coordinated  research  program  with 
four  major  themes:  carbon  system  monitoring,  calcification  and 
physiological response studies under both laboratory and field con-
ditions,  environmental  and  ecosystem  modeling  studies,  and  socio-
economic  risk  assessments.  This  research  will  provide  resource 
managers  with  the  basic  information  they  need  to  develop  strate-
gies for protection of species, habitats, and ecosystems. 

I  am  deeply  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  this  issue 

with you and look forward to answering your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Feely follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD A.  FEELY,  PH.D.,  SUPERVISORY CHEMICAL 
OCEANOGRAPHER,  PACIFIC MARINE ENVIRONMENTAL LABORATORY,  NOAA, 
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Good morning, Chairman Cantwell and members of the Subcommittee. Thank you 
for  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today  on  the  short-  and  long-term 
impacts of ocean acidification on marine resources. My name is Richard Feely, I am 
a  Supervisory  Chemical  Oceanographer  at  the  Pacific  Marine  Environmental  Lab-
oratory of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) in Seattle, 
WA.  My  personal  area  of  research  is  the  study  of  the  oceanic  carbon  cycle  and  its 
impact  on  marine  organisms.  I  have  worked  for  NOAA  for  more  than  32  years  and 
have  published  more  than  160  peer-reviewed  scientific  journal  articles,  book  chap-
ters  and  technical  reports.  I  serve  on  the  U.S.  Carbon  Cycle  Science  Program  Sci-
entific  Steering  Group  and  I  am  the  co-chair  of  the  U.S.  Repeat  Hydrography  Pro-
gram  Scientific  Oversight  Committee.  For  today,  you  have  asked  me  to  provide  my 
insights  on  ocean  acidification  and  its  effect  on  living  marine  ecosystems.  Most  of 
my comments below are derived from the Royal Society Report, ‘‘Ocean Acidification 
Due  to  Increasing  Atmospheric  Carbon  Dioxide’’  (Raven  et  al.,  2005)  and  the  recent 
U.S.  report,  derived  from  a  workshop  held  jointly  by  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion  (NSF),  NOAA,  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey,  entitled  ‘‘Impacts  of  Ocean 
Acidification on Coral Reefs and Other Marine Calcifiers ‘’ (Kleypas et al., 2006). 
Ocean Acidification 

Over  the  past  200  years  the  release  of  carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  from  our  collective 
industrial  and  agricultural  activities  has  resulted  in  atmospheric  CO2 concentra-
tions  that  have  increased  by  about  100  parts  per  million  (ppm).  The  atmospheric 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

16 

concentration  of  CO2 is  now  higher  than  experienced  on  Earth  for  at  least  the  last 
800,000 years, and is expected to continue to rise, leading to significant temperature 
increases in the atmosphere and oceans by the end of this century. The oceans have 
absorbed  approximately  525  billion  tons  of  carbon  dioxide  from  the  atmosphere,  or 
about  one-third  of  the  anthropogenic  carbon  emissions  released  during  this  period 
(Sabine  and  Feely,  2007).  This  natural  process  of  absorption  has  benefited  human-
kind  by  significantly  reducing  the  greenhouse  gas  levels  in  the  atmosphere  and 
minimizing  some  of  the  impacts  of  global  warming.  However,  the  ocean’s  daily  up-
take  of  22  million  tons  of  carbon  dioxide  is  starting  to  have  a  significant  impact  on 
the  chemistry  and  biology  of  the  oceans.  For  more  than  25  years,  NOAA  and  NSF 
have  co-sponsored  repeat  hydrographic  and  chemical  surveys  of  the  world  oceans, 
documenting  the  ocean’s  response  to  increasing  amounts  of  carbon  dioxide  being 
emitted  to  the  atmosphere  by  human  activities.  These  surveys  have  confirmed  that 
the  oceans  are  absorbing  increasing  amounts  of  carbon  dioxide.  Both  the  hydro-
graphic surveys and modeling studies reveal that the chemical changes in seawater 
resulting  from  the  absorption  of  carbon  dioxide  are  lowering  seawater  pH  (Feely  et 
al.,  2004;  Orr  et  al.,  2005;  Caldeira  and  Wickett,  2005;  Feely  et  al.,  in  press).  It  is 
now well established that the pH of our ocean surface waters has already fallen by 
about  0.1  units  from  an  average  of  about  8.21  to  8.10  since  the  beginning  of  the 
Industrial Revolution (on the logarithmic pH scale, 7.0 is neutral (e.g., water), with 
points higher on the scale being ‘‘basic’’ and points lower being ‘‘acidic.’’). Estimates 
of future atmospheric and oceanic carbon dioxide concentrations, based on the Inter-
governmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) CO2 emission scenarios and general 
circulation  models,  indicate  that  by  the  middle  of  this  century  atmospheric  carbon 
dioxide levels could reach more than 500 parts per million (ppm), and near the end 
of  the  century  they  could  be  over  800  ppm.  This  would  result  in  a  surface  water 
pH  decrease  of  approximately  0.4  pH  units  as  the  ocean  becomes  more  acidic,  and 
the carbonate ion concentration would decrease almost 50 percent by the end of the 
century  (Orr  et  al.,  2005).  To  put  this  in  historical  perspective,  this  surface  ocean 
pH  decrease  would  result  in  a  pH  that  is  lower  than  it  has  been  for  more  than  20 
million  years  (Feely  et  al.,  2004).  When  CO2 reacts  with  seawater,  fundamental 
chemical  changes  occur  that  cause  a  reduction  in  seawater  pH.  The  interaction  be-
tween CO2 and seawater also reduces the availability of carbonate ions, which play 
an important role in shell formation for a number of marine organisms such as cor-
als,  marine  plankton,  and  shellfish.  This  phenomenon,  which  is  commonly  called 
‘‘ocean  acidification,’’  could  affect  some  of  the  most  fundamental  biological  and  geo-
chemical  processes  of  the  sea  in  coming  decades.  This  rapidly  emerging  issue  has 
created  serious  concerns  across  the  scientific  and  fisheries  resource  management 
communities. 
Effects of Ocean Acidification on Coral Reefs 

Many  marine  organisms  that  produce  calcium  carbonate  shells  studied  thus  far 
have  shown  detrimental  effects  due  to  increasing  carbon  dioxide  levels  in  seawater 
and  the  resulting  decline  in  pH.  For  example,  increasing  ocean  acidification  has 
been shown to significantly reduce the ability of reef-building corals to produce their 
skeletons, affecting growth of individual corals and making the reef more vulnerable 
to  erosion  (Kleypas  et  al.,  2006).  Some  estimates  indicate  that,  by  the  end  of  this 
century,  coral  reefs  may  erode  faster  than  they  can  be  rebuilt.  This  could  com-
promise  the  long-term  viability  of  these  ecosystems  and  perhaps  impact  the  thou-
sands  of  species  that  depend  on  the  reef  habitat.  Decreased  calcification  may  also 
compromise the fitness or success of these organisms and could shift the competitive 
advantage  toward  organisms  that  are  not  dependent  on  calcium  carbonate.  Car-
bonate  structures  are  likely  to  be  weaker  and  more  susceptible  to  dissolution  and 
erosion. In long-term experiments corals that have been grown under lower pH con-
ditions for periods longer than 1 year have not shown any ability to adapt their cal-
cification  rates  to  the  low  pH  levels.  In  fact,  a  recent  study  showed  that  the  pro-
jected  increase  in  CO2 is  sufficient  to  dissolve  the  calcium  carbonate  skeletons  of 
some coral species (Fine and Tchernov, 2007). 
Effects of Ocean Acidification on Fish and Shellfish 

Ongoing research is showing that decreasing pH may also have deleterious effects 
on  commercially  important  fish  and  shellfish  larvae.  Both  king  crab  and  silver 
seabream  larvae  exhibit  very  high  mortality  rates  in  CO2-enriched  waters  (Litzow 
et  al.,  submitted;  Ishimatsu  et  al.,  2004).  Some  of  the  experiments  indicated  that 
other physiological stresses were also apparent. Exposure of fish to lower pH levels 
can  cause  decreased  respiration  rates,  changes  in  blood  chemistry,  and  changes  in 
enzymatic  activity.  The  calcification  rates  of  the  edible  mussel  (Mytilus  edulis)  and 
Pacific oyster (Crassostrea gigas) decline linearly with increasing CO2 levels (Gazeau 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

17 

et  al.,  in  press).  Squid  are  especially  sensitive  to  ocean  acidification  because  it  di-
rectly  impacts  their  blood  oxygen  transport  and  respiration  (Po¨rtner  et  al.,  2005). 
Sea  urchins  raised  in  lower-pH  waters  show  evidence  for  inhibited  growth  due  to 
their  inability  to  maintain  internal  acid-base  balance  (Kurihara  and  Shirayama., 
2004).  Scientists  have  also  seen  a  reduced  ability  of  marine  algae  and  free-floating 
plants  and  animals  to  produce  protective  carbonate  shells  (Feely  et  al.,  2004;  Orr 
et  al.,  2005).  These  organisms  are  important  food  sources  for  other  marine  species. 
One type of free-swimming mollusk called a pteropod is eaten by organisms ranging 
in  size  from  tiny  krill  to  whales.  In  particular,  pteropods  are  a  major  food  source 
for  North  Pacific  juvenile  salmon,  and  also  serve  as  food  for  mackerel,  pollock,  her-
ring,  and  cod.  Other  marine  calcifiers,  such  as  coccolithophores  (microscopic  algae), 
foraminifera  (microscopic  protozoans),  coralline  algae  (benthic  algae),  echinoderms 
(sea  urchins  and  starfish),  and  mollusks  (snails,  clams,  and  squid)  also  exhibit  a 
general  decline  in  their  ability  to  produce  their  shells  with  decreasing  pH  (Kleypas 
et al., 2006). 
Effects on Marine Ecosystems 

Since ocean acidification research is still in its infancy, it is impossible to predict 
exactly  how  the  individual  species  responses  will  cascade  throughout  the  marine 
food  chain  and  impact  the  overall  structure  of  marine  ecosystems.  It  is  clear,  how-
ever, from the existing data and from the geologic record that some coral and shell-
fish  species  will  be  reduced  in  a  high-CO2 ocean.  The  rapid  disappearance  of  many 
calcifying  species  in  past  extinction  events  has  been  attributed,  in  large  part,  to 
ocean  acidification  events  (Zachos  et  al.,  2005).  Over  the  next  century,  if  CO2 emis-
sions  are  allowed  to  increase  as  predicted  by  the  IPCC  CO2 emissions  scenarios, 
mankind  may  be  responsible  for  increasing  oceanic  CO2 and  making  the  oceans 
more corrosive to calcifying organisms than anytime since the last major extinction, 
over 65 million years ago. Thus, the decisions we make about our use of fossil-fuels 
for energy over the next several decades will probably have a profound influence on 
makeup of future marine ecosystems for centuries to millennia. 
Economic Impacts 

The  impact  of  ocean  acidification  on  fisheries  and  coral  reef  ecosystems  could  re-
verberate through the U.S. and global economy. The U.S. is the third largest seafood 
consumer  in  the  world  with  total  consumer  spending  for  fish  and  shellfish  around 
$60  billion  per  year.  Coastal  and  marine  commercial  fishing  generates  upwards  of 
$30  billion  per  year  and  employs  nearly  70,000  people  (NOAA  Fisheries  Office  of 
Science and Technology; http://www.st.nmfs.gov/st1/fus/fus05/index.html). Nearly 
half  of  the  U.S.  fishery  is  derived  from  the  coastal  waters  surrounding  Alaska.  In-
creased  ocean  acidification  may  directly  or  indirectly  influence  the  fish  stocks  be-
cause of large-scale changes in the local ecosystem dynamics. It may also cause the 
dissolution of the newly discovered deepwater corals in the Alaskan Aleutian Island 
region. Many commercially important fish species in this region depend on this par-
ticular habitat for their survival. 

Healthy  coral  reefs  are  the  foundation  of  many  viable  fisheries,  as  well  as  the 
source of jobs and businesses related to tourism and recreation. In the Florida Keys, 
coral  reefs  attract  more  than  $1.2  billion  in  tourism  annually.  In  Hawaii,  reef-re-
lated  tourism  and  fishing  generate  $360  million  per  year,  and  their  overall  worth 
has been estimated at close to $10 billion. In addition, coral reefs provide vital pro-
tection to coastal areas that are vulnerable to storm surges and tsunamis. 
Conclusions 

Ocean  acidification  may  be  one  of  the  most  significant  and  far-reaching  con-
sequences of the buildup of anthropogenic carbon dioxide in the atmosphere. Results 
from laboratory, field and modeling studies, as well as evidence from the geological 
record,  clearly  indicate  that  marine  ecosystems  are  highly  susceptible  to  the  in-
creases in oceanic CO2 and the corresponding decreases in pH. Corals and other cal-
cifying  organisms  will  be  increasingly  affected  by  a  decreased  capability  to  produce 
their shells and skeletons. Other species of fish and shellfish will also be negatively 
impacted in their physiological responses due to a decrease in pH levels of their cel-
lular  fluids.  Because  of  the  very  clear  potential  for  ocean-wide  impacts  of  ocean 
acidification  at  all  levels  of  the  marine  ecosystem,  from  the  tiniest  phytoplankton 
to  zooplankton  to  fish  and  shellfish,  we  can  expect  to  see  significant  impacts  that 
are of immense importance to mankind. Ocean acidification is an emerging scientific 
issue  and  much  research  is  needed  before  all  of  the  ecosystems  responses  are  well 
understood.  However,  to  the  limit  that  the  scientific  community  understands  this 
issue  right  now,  the  potential  for  environmental,  economic  and  societal  risk  is  also 
quite  high,  hence  demanding  serious  and  immediate  attention.  For  these  reasons, 
the  national  and  international  scientific  communities  have  recommended  a  coordi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

18 

nated  scientific  research  program  with  four  major  themes;  (1)  carbon  system  moni-
toring; (2) calcification and physiological response studies under laboratory and field 
conditions; (3) environmental and ecosystem modeling studies; and (4) socioeconomic 
risk assessments. This research will provide resource managers with the basic infor-
mation they need to develop strategies for protection of critical species, habitats and 
ecosystems, similar to what has already been developed for coral reef managers with 
the  publication  of  the  Reef  Manager’s  Guide  by  the  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force  to 
help local and regional reef managers reduce the impacts of coral bleaching to coral 
reef ecosystems. 

Thank  you  for  giving  me  this  opportunity  to  address  this  Subcommittee.  I  look 

forward to answering your questions. 
Selected References 

Caldeira,  K.,  and  M.E.  Wickett,  Ocean  model  predictions  of  chemistry  changes 
from carbon dioxide emissions to the atmosphere and ocean. Journal of Geophysical 
Research (Oceans) 110, C09S04, doi: 10.1029/2004JC002671, 2005. 

Feely,  R.A.,  C.L.  Sabine,  K.  Lee,  W.  Berrelson,  J.  Kleypas,  V.J.  Fabry,  and  F.J. 
Millero,  2004,  Impact  of  anthropogenic  CO2 on  the  CaCO3 system  in  the  oceans, 
Science, 305(5682): 362–366. 

Feely,  R.A.,  J.  Orr,  V.J.  Fabry,  J.A.  Kleypas,  C.L.  Sabine,  and  C.  Landgon  (in 
press): Present and future changes in seawater chemistry due to ocean acidification. 
AGU Monograph on ‘‘The Science and Technology of Carbon Sequestration’’. 

Fine,  M.  and  D.  Tchernov  (2007).  Scleractinian  coral  species  survive  and  recover 

from decalcification, Science (315): 1811. 

Gazeau,  F.,  Quiblier,  C.,  Jeroen  M.  Jansen,  J.M.  Jean-Pierre  Gattuso,  J.-P., 
Middelburg,  J.J.,  and  C.  H.R.  Heip  (in  press)  Impact  of  elevated  CO2 on  shellfish 
calcification, Geophysical Research Letters. 

Ishimatsu,  A.,  Kikkawa,  T.,  Hayashi,  M.,  Lee,  K.-S.,  and  J.  Kita  (2004):  Effects 
of  CO2 on  marine  fish:  Larvae  and  adults,  Journal  of  Oceanography,  Vol.  60,  pp. 
731–741. 

Kleypas,  J.A.,  R.A.  Feely,  V.J.  Fabry,  C.  Langdon,  C.L.  Sabine,  and  L.L.  Robbins 
(2006):  Impacts  of  ocean  acidification  on  coral  reefs  and  other  marine  calcifiers:  A 
guide  to  future  research.  Report  of  a  workshop  held  18–20  April  2005,  St.  Peters-
burg, FL, sponsored by NSF, NOAA, and the U.S. Geological Survey, 88 pp. 

Kurihara, K. and Shirayama, Y. (2004): Impacts of increased atmospheric CO2 on 

sea urchin early development, Mar. Ecol;. Prog. Ser., 274, 161–169. 

Marshall,  P.  and  H.  Schuttenberg  (2006):  A  Reef  Manager’s  Guide  to  Coral 
Bleaching, Great Barrier Ref Marine Park Authority, Townsville, Australia, 139 pp. 
Michael A., Litzow, M.A., Short, J.W., J.W. , Persselin, S.L., Lisa A. Hoferkamp3, 
L.A.  and  S.A.  Payne,  (submitted  for  publication).  Calcite  undersaturation  reduces 
larval survival in a crustacean, Science. 

Orr,  J.C.,  V.J.  Fabry,  O.  Aumont,  L.  Bopp,  S.C.  Doney,  R.A.  Feely,  A. 
Gnanadesikan,  N.  Fruber,  A.  Ishida,  F.  Joos,  R.M.  Key,  K.  Lindsay,  E.  Maier- 
Reimer,  R.  Matear,  P.  Monfray,  A.  Mouchet.  R.G.  Najjar,  G.-K.  Plattner,  K.B.  Rod-
gers,  C.L.  Sabine,  J.L.  Sarmiento,  R.  Schlitzer,  R.D.  Slater,  I.J.  Totterdel,  M.-F. 
Weirig, Y. Yamanaka, and A. Yool, 2005, Anthropogenic ocean acidification over the 
twenty-first  century  and  its  impact  on  calcifying  organisms,  Nature,  437:  681–686. 
Po¨rtner,  H.O.,  M.  Langenbuch,  and  B.  Michaelidis  (2005)  Synergistic  effects  of 
temperature  extremes,  hypoxia,  and  increases  in  CO2 on  marine  animals:  From 
Earth  history  to  global  change,  J.  Geophys.  Res.  110,  C09S10,  doi:  10.1029/ 
2004JC002561. 

Raven,  J.  Caldeira,  K.  Elderfield,  H.  Hoegh-Guldberg,  O.  Liss,  P.  Riebesell,  U. 
Shepherd, J. Turley, C. Watson, A. (2005) Acidification due to increasing carbon di-
oxide.  In  Report  12/05.  London,  T.R.S.o.  (ed.)  London:  The  Royal  Society,  pp.  vii  + 
60. 

Zachos,  J.C.,  U.  Ro¨hl,  S.A.  Schellenberg,  A.  Sluijs,  D.A.  Hodell,  D.C.  Keely,  E. 
Thomas, M. Nicolo, I. Raffi, L.J. Lourens, H. McCarren, and D. Kroon, 2005, Rapid 
acidification  of  the  ocean  during  the  Paleocene-Eocene  thermal  maximum,  Science, 
308: 1611–16. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Dr. Conover? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

19 

STATEMENT OF DAVID O. CONOVER, PH.D., DEAN 

AND DIRECTOR, MARINE SCIENCE RESEARCH CENTER, 

STONY BROOK UNIVERSITY 

Dr.  CONOVER.  Good  morning,  Chair  Cantwell,  Ranking  Member 
Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is  David 
Conover. I am a fisheries scientist and I also serve as Dean of Ma-
rine  and  Atmospheric  Sciences  at  Stony  Brook  University  on  Long 
Island,  New  York.  I  am  mostly  going  to  talk  about  the  effect  of 
ocean warming on fisheries. 

I  have  studied  the  ecology  of  marine  fishes  along  the  U.S.  East 
Coast for over 30 years. My message is this. We already see strong 
evidence of the effects of ocean warming on fish and shellfish along 
the  East  Coast.  The  evidence  includes  declines  in  cold-water  spe-
cies  due  to  heat  stress  and  disease,  northward  expansion  of  south-
ern species, and explosions of invasive species. Let me explain what 
is going on. 

Because  most  animals  in  the  sea  are  cold-blooded,  ocean  tem-
perature has an enormous direct impact on their biology. We know 
a  lot  about  the  direct  thermal  effects  at  the  species  level,  less  so 
at  the  ecosystem  level.  But  we  know  enough  to  make  strong  pre-
dictions. 

All  species  are  adapted  for  life  over  a  relatively  narrow  range  of 
temperatures.  Some  species  like  it  warm,  others  like  it  cold.  Cer-
tain  regions  of  the  world  ocean,  particularly  the  East  Coast,  have 
transition  zones  between  cold-water  and  warm-water  habitats. 
That  is  where  you  are  going  to  first  see  the  impacts  of  warming. 
My home state of New York sits right in the middle of a transition 
zone.  We  are  the  southern  end  point  for  northern  species  like  cod, 
herring,  and  American  lobsters  and  we  are  at  the  northern  end 
point for southern species like weakfish, fluke, and bluefish. 

Here  is  what  we  see  happening  in  New  York.  In  1999,  we  had 
a  massive  summer  die-off  of  lobsters  in  Long  Island  Sound,  fol-
lowed  by  continued  summer  mortality  in  subsequent  years.  The 
probability  is  that  lobsters  cannot  tolerate  the  exceptionally  warm 
summer  temperatures  we  have  been  having.  Heat  stress  leads  to 
physiological,  pathogenic,  and  parasitic  diseases.  The  result  has 
been  an  85  percent  reduction  in  landings,  and  these  diseases  now 
appear to be moving northward. 

Another  example  is  a  parasitic  disease  called  dermo.  It  causes 
catastrophic  mortality  of  oysters.  Prior  to  1990,  this  parasite  was 
unknown north of Chesapeake Bay. In the 1990s dermo underwent 
a  massive  northward  range  expansion,  extending  all  the  way  into 
the Gulf of Maine. The expansion occurred during years when win-
ters  were  unusually  warm.  Dermo  is  now  highly  prevalent  from 
Delaware Bay to Cape Cod, with no signs of abating. 

Winter  flounder  is  another  species  at  the  southern  end  of  its 
range in New York. It too is declining drastically in our area. Com-
mercial  landings  in  New  York  are  only  15  percent  of  what  they 
were a few years ago. And it is not just winter flounder. When you 
look  at  the  fin  fish  community  of  Long  Island  Sound  as  a  whole 
over  the  last  15  years,  nearly  all  of  the  cold-water  species  have 
been  declining  and  nearly  all  of  the  warm-water  species  are  in-
creasing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

20 

Finally, there is the problem of invasive species. The recent trend 
of  warmer  winters  in  Long  Island  Sound  has  favored  the  growth 
and recruitment of exotic species over natives. Invasive sea squirts 
that like winters that are warm are coating the bottom of Long Is-
land Sound, driving away native species. 

What do we do about this? From a fishery management perspec-
tive, we need to recognize that harvested populations near the lim-
its  of  their  ranges  will  need  extra  precautionary  measures  to  pro-
tect  them  from  extinction.  Predators,  pathogens,  parasites  and 
invasive  species  are  moving  across  ecosystem  boundaries.  We  may 
need  to  reduce  harvest  of  some  of  these  species  in  certain  areas  to 
enable them to withstand additional stress. 

Of  course,  the  ultimate  and  best  solution  is  the  reduction  of 
greenhouse  gases.  One  way  of  doing  this,  advocated  by  some  sci-
entists  and  soon  to  be  commercialized,  is  the  purposeful  fertiliza-
tion  of  the  open  ocean  with  iron.  The  idea  is  that  phytoplankton 
blooms  will  draw  carbon  out  of  the  atmosphere.  Here  we  need  to 
be careful. Fertilizing aquatic systems almost always has some un-
desirable  consequences.  Hypoxia  in  Long  Island  Sound,  for  exam-
ple,  results  largely  from  over  fertilization  by  nitrogen.  Sometimes 
enrichment  causes  blooms  of  harmful  algal  species  like  red  tide  or 
brown  tide.  The  pros  and  cons  of  iron  fertilization  need  much  fur-
ther investigation. 

Regarding  ocean  acidification,  my  colleagues  have  already  dis-
cussed this issue. I just want to underscore that there will be direct 
impacts  of  acidification  on  marine  fishes.  It  is  a  problem  we  need 
to look more seriously at. 

Also, changes in habitat due to loss of coral and shellbed habitats 
will alter the food web that supports our fisheries. We need to un-
derstand these complex interactions. 

Finally, I want to underscore the need for a comprehensive ocean 
observation  system.  Scientists  are  frequently  asked  to  explain  ca-
tastrophes  like  the  die-off  of  lobsters  in  Long  Island  Sound.  We 
need  an  observation  system  that  can  track  environmental  changes 
before,  during,  and  after  these  events  to  provide  the  clues  to  what 
happened.  Otherwise  we  are  like  the  detective  at  the  scene  of  a 
crime, with no evidence and lots of potential suspects. 

The technology exists. Let us put it to use. Such observation sys-
tems  will  greatly  aid  resource  managers  in  ensuring  sustainable 
fisheries.  Thank  you  and  I  look  forward  to  answering  your  ques-
tions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Conover follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID O. CONOVER, PH.D., DEAN AND DIRECTOR, 

MARINE SCIENCES RESEARCH CENTER, STONY BROOK UNIVERSITY 

Introduction 

I  thank  Madame  Chair  Cantwell,  Ranking  Member  Snowe,  and  the  other  Mem-
bers  of  the  Subcommittee  for  the  opportunity  to  describe  to  you  the  likely  con-
sequences  of  climate  change  on  marine  fisheries.  My  name  is  David  Conover.  I  am 
the Dean and Director of the Marine Sciences Research Center of Stony Brook Uni-
versity, Long Island, New York. My research expertise involves the ecology and nat-
ural history of marine fishes and the impacts of harvesting and other human influ-
ences on wild fish populations. Of particular relevance to the subject of this hearing, 
I have devoted much of my 30-year career to studying the physiological mechanisms 
by  which  fish  adapt  evolutionarily  to  climate  change.  Much  of  this  work  concerns 
species  that  live  along  the  East  Coast  of  North  America  from  Florida  to  the  Cana-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

21 

dian  maritimes,  a  region  that  encompasses  dramatic  changes  in  climate.  We  can 
learn a lot about what to expect from climate change by studying species that span 
the U.S. East Coast. 

You  have  asked  me  to  address  the  consequences  of  climate  change  for  fisheries, 
fish habitats, the distribution and abundance of species, food webs, and the gaps in 
our knowledge that preclude our ability to predict immediate and long term impacts. 
In  addition,  you  have  asked  for  suggestions  on  how  resource  managers  should  re-
spond  to  these  threats.  I  will  begin  by  briefly  outlining  the  major  changes  in  the 
ocean  ecosystems  that  are  already  underway  and  are  expected  to  accelerate  in  the 
years  ahead,  touching  briefly  on  ocean  acidification  and  then  devoting  most  of  my 
attention to the effects of warming. Both the direct and indirect impacts of acidifica-
tion  and  warming  will  be  highlighted.  I  will  then  discuss  several  East  Coast  exam-
ples  where  already  there  is  strong  evidence  that  climate  change  is  harming  local 
species  and  altering  ecosystems  in  transitional  zones.  Finally,  I’ll  talk  about  short- 
term  solutions  and  research  needed  to  provide  a  longer-term  prognosis  and  options 
for the future. 
Ocean Acidification 

Knowledge  of  the  potentially  devastating  impact  of  reduced  pH  on  aquatic  eco-
systems is not new. Decades ago it became evident that acid rain was afflicting nu-
merous  freshwater  ecosystems  leading  to  declines  and  extinctions  of  numerous  fish 
and  macro-invertebrate  species  from  certain  lakes  and  streams  that  lacked  a  nat-
ural  buffering  capacity.  What  is  new  is  the  recognition  that  acidification  of  entire 
oceans  is  possible.  It  is  caused  not  by  acid  rain,  however,  but  from  increased  CO2 
in the atmosphere, which in turn leads to increased carbonic acid in the ocean. 

Most  of  our  knowledge  of  the  direct  effects  of  ocean  acidification  on  marine  orga-
nisms  focuses  on  species  known  as  ‘‘marine  calcifiers’’  (e.g.,  corals,  mollusks)  that 
build skeletons or shells made of calcium carbonate. Many of these species will suf-
fer impaired ability to build skeletons as pH decreases. We know less about the di-
rect  impacts  of  acidification  on  harvested  species  like  fishes  and  squids.  In  these 
species,  the  response  to  acidification  is  likely  to  involve  physiological  diseases  in-
cluding  acidosis  of  tissue  and  body  fluids  leading  to  impaired  metabolic  function. 
Egg  and  larval  stages  are  likely  to  be  much  more  susceptible  than  adults,  sug-
gesting  that  reduced  reproductive  success  will  be  among  the  first  symptoms  to  ap-
pear. The indirect effects of acidification on fisheries will include loss of reef habitat 
constructed by marine calcifiers. Many fishes depend on the physical structure pro-
vided by coral skeletons or shell-building organisms such as oyster reefs as essential 
habitat for one or more life stages. In addition, food web alterations will likely affect 
harvested  species  through  bottom-up  effects  on  the  food  chain  resulting  from  pH- 
induced  shifts  in  the  plankton  community.  More  research  is  needed  to  understand 
these complex interactions. 
Ocean Warming 

Temperature  is  a  pervasive  environmental  factor  with  direct  effects  on  nearly  all 
aspects of the ecology, physiology, morphology, and behavior of poikilothermic or so- 
called  ‘‘cold-blooded’’  animals.  There  is  a  vast  scientific  literature  describing  the 
temperature-dependence  of  physiological  processes  and  thermal  ecology  of  individ-
uals  of  a  given  species.  Less  is  known  about  population  and  ecosystem  level  re-
sponses  to  temperature  change  but  we  know  enough  to  make  fairly  strong,  general 
predictions about the consequences of warming at least for the species level. 

All  species  are  adapted  for  life  over  a  relatively  moderate  range  of  temperatures 
compared  with  the  extremes  experienced  form  the  poles  to  the  tropics.  Tempera-
tures  below  the  optimal  range  slow  the  rate  of  metabolism  and,  if  too  low,  can  be-
come  lethal.  Temperatures  above  the  optimal  range  increase  metabolism  and,  be-
cause  warmer  water  contains  less  dissolved  oxygen,  a  thermal  threshold  is  reached 
where  respiratory  demand  exceeds  the  capacity  for  oxygen  uptake,  sometimes  re-
ferred  to  as  the  ‘‘temperature-oxygen  squeeze’’  (Portner  and  Knust  2007).  Hence, 
temperature  is  one  of  the  primary  environmental  factors  that  determine  the  geo-
graphic range of a species. Minimum winter temperatures often determine the high- 
latitude  boundary  (the  northern  boundary  in  the  northern  hemisphere)  while  sum-
mer  maximums  determine  the  low-latitude  limit  of  a  species.  Even  within  the  nor-
mal  range  of  a  species,  the  dynamics  of  populations  often  show  strong  correlations 
with temperature trends. 

While  scientists  can  use  the  thermal  physiology  of  a  species  to  predict  how  it 
might  respond  to  the  direct  effects  of  ocean  warming,  there  are  indirect  effects  at 
the  ecosystem  level  that  complicate  the  overall  impact  considerably.  In  temperate 
regions, for example, the complex of species found at a given latitude are a mixture 
of  those  adapted  to  colder  or  warmer  thermal  regimes.  These  species  are  inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

22 

connected  through  a  web  of  predatory,  competitive,  pathogenic,  parasitic,  and 
mutualistic  interactions  that  influence  the  abundance  of  species.  Invasive  species 
also sometimes get a foothold more easily in systems undergoing disturbance. In ad-
dition,  changes  in  temperature  may  influence  the  overall  primary  productivity  of 
ecosystems  in  either  positive  or  negative  directions  (Behrenfeld  et  al.,  2006),  which 
may ultimately impact fisheries yields. 

In  general,  the  impact  of  ocean  warming  should  be  most  evident  at  the  northern 
and  southern  boundaries  of  the  distribution  of  a  given  species.  These  boundaries 
tend to be shared among numerous species, and they tend to occur where there are 
sharp  discontinuities  in  thermal  gradients.  Hence,  there  are  certain  regions  of  the 
world  ocean  that  are  transitional  zones  for  numerous  species.  Cape  Hatteras  and 
Cape Cod are two such regions. It is within these transitional regions where we are 
likely  to  first  see  the  strongest  impacts  of  climate  change.  Most  of  the  phenomena 
described above are illustrated by changes we are now seeing along the East Coast 
of the U.S., particularly within Long Island Sound. 
Impacts of Warming on Fisheries as Exemplified by Long Island Sound 

The  Long  Island  region  has  represented  a  thermal  transition  zone  for  thousands 
of  years.  During  the  Pleistocene,  this  region  was  the  transition  from  glaciated  to 
non-glaciated  terrain.  Today  it  still  represents  a  subtle  but  ecologically  important 
transitional zone between warm-water and cold-water regions. 

Most temperate marine species of fishes and macro-invertebrates can be described 
as having either cold-water or warm-water affinities. Northern species like cod, win-
ter flounder, and American lobster are classic cold-water species. For many of these 
species,  the  Long  Island  Sound  region  represents  that  southern  terminus  of  their 
migration  and/or  geographic  distribution.  Southern  species  like  weakfish,  summer 
flounder, and blue crab are physiologically adapted to warm temperatures. Long Is-
land Sound represents the northern end of their geographic occurrence. We are see-
ing  strong  evidence  of  shifts  in  the  relative  abundance  of  cold-water  and  warm- 
water species in our region that are consistent with the predictions of ocean warm-
ing. 

The  most  well  studied  example  is  American  lobster.  Massive,  catastrophic  sum-
mer–fall  mortalities  of  lobsters  in  Long  Island  Sound  began  in  August  1999,  and 
have  continued  to  occur  to  a  greater  or  lesser  degree  in  subsequent  summers.  An 
extensive  federally-sponsored  research  program  has  identified  summer  warming  of 
Long  Island  Sound  bottom  waters,  coupled  with  hypoxia,  and  the  outbreak  of  dis-
ease  as  the  most  likely  causes.  One  of  these  diseases  called  ‘‘excretory  calcinosis’’, 
discovered by scientists at Stony Brook University, is a gill tissue blood disorder re-
sulting  directly  from  warm  temperatures  (Dove  et  al.,  2004).  Other  lobster  diseases 
also  appear  to  result  from  the  stress  of  high  temperature  and  hypoxia.  The  result 
of  these  multiple  stresses  has  been  a  75  percent  reduction  in  total  landings  and  85 
percent  reduction  in  the  overall  abundance  of  the  population.  These  diseases  now 
appear to be moving northward. 

Another example of climate-induced effects on fisheries involves the northward ex-
pansion  of  a  disease  known  as  ‘‘dermo’’  that  afflicts  the  oyster.  It  is  caused  by 
Perkinsus  marinus,  a  parasite  that  yearly  kills  50  percent  of  oysters  in  the  Gulf  of 
Mexico. Prior to the late 1980s, the parasite was known to occur only south of lower 
Chesapeake  Bay.  In  the  early  1990s,  however,  dermo  underwent  a  500  km  north-
ward  range  expansion  extending  all  the  way  into  the  Gulf  of  Maine.  Researchers 
at Rutgers University have demonstrated that the range expansion occurred during 
years  when  winters  were  unusually  warm  (Ford  and  Smolowitz  2007).  The  preva-
lence of dermo is now high from Delaware Bay to Cape Cod, with no signs of abat-
ing. 

Shifts in the relative abundance of finfish in Long Island Sound also bear the sig-
nature  of  ocean  warming.  Like  the  lobster,  winter  flounder  is  also  at  the  southern 
end  of  its  distribution  and  it  too  is  showing  extremely  severe  declines.  Commercial 
landings in New York are only 15 percent of what they were 50 years ago. According 
to annual resource assessment surveys conducted since 1984 by the Connecticut De-
partment of Environmental Protection (CTDEP), winter flounder abundance in Long 
Island  Sound  is  now  less  than  10  percent  of  what  it  was  in  1990.  We  need  more 
research to determine if winter flounder are declining due to warming temperatures. 
But  when  you  look  at  the  finfish  community  of  Long  Island  Sound  as  a  whole 
(CTDEP 2006), evidence of warming as the causative factor becomes much stronger. 
Most  of  the  cold-water  species  of  Long  Island  Sound  have  been  declining  over  the 
past  15  years  (e.g.,  lobster,  winter  flounder,  Atlantic  herring,  cunner,  longhorn 
sculpin,  sea  raven,  ocean  pout,  winter  skate,  little  skate)  while  most  of  the  warm- 
water  fishes  have  been  increasing  (e.g.,  striped  bass,  weakfish,  summer  flounder, 
menhaden, scup, striped sea robin, butterfish, Atlantic moonfish, hickory shad). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

23 

Finally,  there  is  also  evidence  from  Long  Island  Sound  that  the  recent  trend  of 
warmer  winters  favors  the  growth  and  recruitment  of  invasive  species  over  those 
of native species. Researchers from the University of Connecticut showed that exotic 
ascidian  species  (sea  squirts)  benefit  more  from  mild  winters  while  native  species 
benefit more from cold winters (Stachowicz et al., 2002). Overgrowth of bottom habi-
tat by invasive sea squirts is becoming an increasing problem in Long Island Sound. 
Implications for Management 

Resource  managers  need  to  recognize  that  local  populations  of  species  near  the 
limits  of  their  distributional  ranges  will  need  additional  precautionary  measures  to 
protect  them  from  extinction.  Warming  and  acidification  represent  additional 
stresses that make populations less resilient to the effects of harvest. We may need 
to  reduce  harvest  of  some  species  in  certain  areas  to  enable  them  to  withstand  the 
additional stress. 

Transitional regions are where the impact of climate change will first be evident. 
These regions are also conduits for species exchange. The transmittal of pathogens, 
predators,  and  invasive  species  across  ecosystems  will  increase  as  species  migrate 
into  new  regions  across  thermal  and  faunal  boundaries  such  as  Cape  Cod,  which 
separates  the  Mid-Atlantic  region  from  the  Gulf  of  Maine.  Management  practices 
that transplant species across ecosystems need to be viewed with caution. 
Solutions, Their Implications, and Further Research 

The  ultimate  and  best  solution  is  the  reduction  of  greenhouse  gases  that  cause 
acidification  and  warming.  One  solution  advocated  by  some  scientists  and  soon  to 
be commercialized is the purposeful fertilization of open ocean habitats that are de-
ficient in iron. The resulting pulses of phytoplankton growth sequester carbon from 
the atmosphere and may help reduce the buildup of atmospheric CO2. Although this 
possibility  deserves  serious  scrutiny,  the  ecosystem  impacts  of  fertilization  in  most 
aquatic ecosystems almost always contain undesirable consequences for water qual-
ity,  food  webs,  and  fisheries.  Hypoxia  in  Long  Island  Sound,  for  example,  results 
largely  from  over-fertilization  by  nitrogen,  which  is  the  limiting  nutrient  in  many 
coastal waters. Sometimes the blooms produced by enrichment turn out to be harm-
ful algal species like ‘‘red tide’’ or ‘‘brown tide’’. The ecological consequences of ocean 
fertilization  on  a  scale  sufficient  to  stem  the  build-up  of  green  house  gases  needs 
much  further  research  to  evaluate  the  potential  risks  of  unintended  negative  im-
pacts. 

The certainty of climate change and its potential impacts on ocean ecosystems un-
derscore the need for a comprehensive ocean observation system. Our ability to un-
ravel the causes and consequences of ecosystem change is directly dependent on the 
availability  of  a  continuous  time  series  of  many  different  kinds  of  environmental 
data. Gradual trends in highly variable environmental parameters like temperature, 
oxygen, salinity, pH, chlorophyll, wind, circulation patterns, and others become evi-
dent  only  after  many  years.  Fishery  ecologists  are  frequently  asked  to  explain  the 
cause  of  episodic  events  like  the  die-off  of  lobsters  in  Long  Island  Sound,  but  we 
need an observation system that can provide ‘‘before, during, and after’’ data to give 
us  the  clues.  Otherwise,  we  are  like  the  detective  at  the  scene  of  a  crime  with  no 
evidence and lots of potential suspects. The technology exists to continuously meas-
ure  numerous  physical  and  biological  parameters  that  will  greatly  help  us  under-
stand  and  therefore  devise  strategies  to  cope  with  ecosystem  alterations  caused  by 
climate  change  or  other  forces.  The  number  and  diversity  of  sensors  currently  de-
ployed  in  U.S.  ocean  waters  is  woefully  inadequate.  Such  observation  systems  will 
greatly aid resource managers in ensuring sustainable fisheries. 
References 

Behrenfeld,  M.J.,  R.T.  O’Malley,  D.A.  Siegel,  C.R.  McClain,  J.L.  Sarmiento,  G.C. 
Feldman , J. Milligan, P.G. Falkowski, R.M. Letelier , and E.S. Boss, 2006: Climate- 
driven trends in contemporary ocean productivity. Nature, 444(7120), 752–755. 

CTDEP,  Bureau  of  Natural  Resources,  Marine  Fisheries  Division.  2006.  A  Study 
of Marine Recreational Fisheries in Connecticut. Federal Aid in Sport Fish Restora-
tion, F–54–R–25, Annual Performance Report. 

Dove  ADM,  LoBue  C.,  Bowser  P.,  Powell  M.  2004.  Excretory  calcinosis:  a  new 
fatal  disease  of  wild  American  lobsters  Homarus  americanus.  Diseases  of  Aquatic 
Organisms 58 (2–3): 215–221. 

Ford, S.E. and R. Smolowitz. 2007. Infection dynamics of an oyster parasite in its 

newly expanded range. Mar. Biol. 151: 119–133. 

Po¨rtner,  H.O.,  Knust  R.  (2007)  Climate  change  affects  marine  fishes  through  the 

oxygen limitation of thermal tolerance. Science 315, 95–97. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

24 

Stachowicz, J.J., J.R. Terwin, R.B. Whitlatch, and R.W. Osman. 2002. Linking cli-
mate change and biological invasions: ocean warming facilitates nonindigenous spe-
cies invasions. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. 99: 15497–15500. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Dr. Conover. 
Dr. Hansen? 

STATEMENT OF DR. LARA J. HANSEN, CHIEF SCIENTIST, 
CLIMATE CHANGE PROGRAM, WORLD WILDLIFE FUND 

Dr. HANSEN. Thank you very much, Madam Chair. 
I’ll  attempt  to  make  this  show  up  on  your  screen  as  well.  Per-

haps yes, perhaps no. Ah, there we go. 

I  have  submitted  written  testimony,  but  for  the  purposes  of  my 
5 minutes today I would actually like to take people on a more per-
sonal  journey.  In  2001,  I  was  brought  to  the  World  Wildlife  Fund 
to  help  them  design  conservation  strategies  to  prepare  for  climate 
change. Over the course of the past 6 years we have developed this 
suite  of  projects  and  I  think  that  I  will  take  you  through  a  couple 
of  them  that  really  illuminate  the  challenges  that  we  face  in  the 
world’s  oceans  in  response  to  climate  change.  The  basics  of  that 
have  been  presented  by  the  previous  speakers  very  eloquently.  I 
am  going  to  take  you  through  what  this  means  if  you  are  a  re-
source manager or a conservation planner. 

In  the  Florida  Keys,  which  is  a  place  near  and  dear  to  my 
heart—I did my postdoctoral research there—coral bleaching, coral 
disease,  and  hurricanes  have  resulted  in  the  listing  of  two  coral 
species  for  the  entire  range  of  the  Caribbean.  It  is  not  clear  how 
we  can  protect  these  species  from  those  types  of  changes  since  we 
only see more of it on the horizon. 

Currently  we  are  trying  to  reduce  the  proximal  threats  that  are 
not  related  to  climate  change  in  order  to  increase  the  resilience  of 
these systems to a changing climate, by reducing things like pollut-
ants. But it is not clear that we can do that for much longer. 

In  the  Bering  Sea,  we  are  trying  to  protect  fisheries.  The  fish-
eries of the Bering Sea are an enormous industry, not only for the 
United States but for Russia and many other countries of the world 
as  well.  But  more  importantly,  this  is  a  crucial  ecosystem  to  the 
world’s oceans. It is a very productive part of the world and we are 
trying  to  see  if  there  are  ways  we  can  better  manage  fisheries  to 
respond to climate change. 

We  are  also  working  on  protecting  mangroves  around  the  world 
because  they  protect  both  coral  reefs  and  coastal  systems  where 
humans and biodiversity live. 

But  all  of  these  actions  that  I  talk  about,  be  it  better  fisheries 
management,  reducing  pollution,  or  restoring  habitats,  will  be  in-
consequential  if  climate  change  is  allowed  to  continue  at  the  rate 
it currently is. For climate change-increasing temperatures, we rec-
ognize that there is about a limit of 2 degrees before we cannot use 
these types of methods to help these systems. 

In the case of ocean acidification, we do not know what that limit 
is.  It  is  probably  fairly  low  before  we  start  seeing  remarkable  im-
pacts,  because  the  oceans  historically  have  been  believed  to  have 
a  very  high  buffering  capacity,  so  we  would  not  need  to  worry 
about  things  like  ocean  acidification.  In  fact,  that  is  not  the  case, 
as we can all—as Dr. Feely has already indicated. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

25 

We are at a point now where we need to not only be dealing with 
adaptation, but we need to be dealing with mitigation as well. Un-
fortunately,  we  are  currently  dealing  with  neither.  As  a  result,  I 
suggest  a  number  of  things.  Obviously,  the  Congress  is  doing  a 
great  job  of  taking  on  issues  of  mitigation,  of  reducing  greenhouse 
gas emissions. There are several bills in process for that. But there 
is virtually nothing in process for what we are doing about adapta-
tion,  and  we  will  be  seeing  the  effects  of  climate  change  on  every 
sector of society. 

We need a national adaption plan or strategy. As part of this, we 
also need the capacity to deal with climate change. It is almost im-
possible  to  find  people  who  know  how  to  design  adaptation  strate-
gies and adaptation actions, because we have not trained people for 
these  types  of  activities.  We  need  an  adaptation  extension  agency 
analogous  to  the  land  grant  and  Sea  Grant  extension  agencies, 
with also an international component that can help people in other 
countries adapt. 

We have been told, according to the IPCC Second, Third—Fourth 
Assessment Report, second working group, that it will be the poor-
est  of  the  poor  that  will  be  affected  by  climate  change.  In  fact,  I 
would  argue  that  we  will  all  be  affected  by  climate  change,  and  I 
think  that  the  slow  recover  of  the  Gulf  Coast  following  Hurricane 
Katrina  is  an  excellent  example  of  the  low  adaptive  capacity  of 
even  the  United  States,  a  very  wealthy  country  by  world  compari-
son. 

We need to act now. We cannot wait and continue to do studies. 
We are seeing the changes. Obviously we need to continue to learn 
as  we  go,  but  we  cannot  wait  for  all  the  answers  before  we  decide 
what it is we are going to do. This problem is already upon us. 

Thank you very much, Madam Chair. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Hansen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. LARA J. HANSEN, CHIEF SCIENTIST, CLIMATE CHANGE 

PROGRAM, WORLD WILDLIFE FUND 

‘‘Climate change is arguably the greatest threat to the world’s biodiversity.’’ That 
is  how  I  began  my  testimony  to  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation in March of 2004. Three years later this is no less true. In fact, the 
situation  we  find  ourselves  in  is  even  more  dire  as  was  most  recently  highlighted 
in  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  for  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  Fourth  Assessment  Re-
port  released  this  year.  Representing  the  top  scientific  experts  in  their  fields,  the 
three working groups of that body present the state of the science as demonstrating 
that: 

1. Climate change is caused by greenhouse gas emissions from fossil fuels, such 
as carbon dioxide, and land use change; 
2. We are already seeing the effects of climate change around us; and 
3.  We  need  to  take  action  now  both  in  terms  of  mitigation  and  adaptation  to 
avoid an unacceptable future. 

The time to act is now. 
The  primary  response  among  policymakers  has  been  to  focus  on  reducing  emis-
sions  of  greenhouse  gases,  that  is,  mitigation  of  climate  change.  However,  as  the 
IPCC  Working  Group  II  emphasized,  and  as  I  have  emphasized  in  my  work  over 
the  years,  adaptation—our  ability  to  adjust  to  and  prepare  for  the  changes  in  cli-
mate  already  occurring  and  future  changes  to  which  our  past  emissions  have  al-
ready  committed  us—is  now  equally  important.  There  is  no  need  to  debate  the  vir-
tues of mitigation versus adaptation. Neither alone will solve our problems. We need 
both  and  we  need  to  see  meaningful  legislation  addressing  both  mitigation  and  ad-
aptation during this Congressional session. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

26 

As  part  of  a  conservation  organization,  my  colleagues  and  I  work  to  protect  the 
world’s biodiversity and natural resources. Traditional approaches to this work have 
relied  on  creating  protected  areas,  limiting  ‘‘take’’  of  key  species  and  resources  and 
monitoring  ecosystems  of  great  importance  and/or  at  great  risk.  Climate  change 
makes these approaches inadequate. As the world’s oceans warm and acidify, storm 
intensity  increases,  sea  level  rises,  timing  and  concentrations  of  nutrient  and  con-
taminant  run-off  from  terrestrial  systems  change,  currents  and  upwelling  patterns 
stop  or  move,  timing  of  migration  and  lifecycle  stages  shifts,  and  ranges  of  species 
move,  the  oceans  can  not  be  protected  from  climate  change  by  these  old  mecha-
nisms.  Conservation  is  now  being  planned  across  a  matrix  that  is  changing  before 
our eyes and we are not prepared. 

It could further be argued that the United States as a whole is not prepared. The 
IPCC Fourth Assessment Report asserts that climate change will be hardest on the 
poorest  of  the  poor  globally.  The  2005  hurricane  season  indicates  that  the  United 
States  will  not  be  unscathed  by  climate  change.  It  is  now  over  a  year  and  a  half 
since  a  record  number  of  Category  5  storms  hit  our  Gulf  Coast,  and  it  has  still  not 
recovered  from  the  battering.  New  Orleans  is  still  in  tatters.  The  calamities  of  cli-
mate change will be events like these and we are not prepared. 

To address climate change in our conservation planning, WWF has adopted an ap-
proach  to  increase  the  resilience  of  natural  systems  to  climate  change  that  we  are 
employing in ecoregions around the planet. This work is based on four basic tenets: 
1.  Protecting  adequate  and  appropriate  space.  As  the  climate  changes  species 
(plants and animals) will react to these changes. They will react by altering how 
they  live,  such  as  using  new  resources,  by  moving  to  new  areas,  or  by  dis-
appearing  because  they  cannot  find  the  habitat  or  resources  they  require.  To 
help ecosystems respond to climate change we need to start planning where pro-
tected  areas  need  to  be  in  the  future  for  species  survival  and  how  they  need 
to  be  managed  differently  to  support  species  groups.  We  need  to  look  for  loca-
tions  that  can  act  as  refuges  from  climate  change,  opportunities  for  networks 
of reserves along climatological gradients (often across latitude or elevation), lo-
cations with high amounts of heterogeneity (or areas with different habitats and 
species)  and  opportunities  to  support  genetic  diversity  and  gene  flow.  All  of 
these strategies try to maximize the opportunity for species or ecosystems to re-
spond  to  climate  change,  without  adversely  affecting  ecosystems  with  our  ac-
tions. 
2. Reducing all non-climate stresses. Climate change presents a number of envi-
ronmental  stresses—increasing  temperature,  altered  precipitation  patterns,  sea 
level  rise,  altered  environmental  chemistry  to  name  just  a  few—but  these 
stresses are not occurring in a vacuum. There are already a host of other envi-
ronmental  stresses  out  there,  including  invasive  species,  over-harvest,  habitat 
degradation and fragmentation, disease and pests, and pollution. Unfortunately 
in  many  cases  there  are  synergistic  interactions  between  these  traditional 
stresses  and  the  stresses  of  climate  change,  effectively  lowering  the  effect  or 
‘‘toxicity threshold.’’ To increase ecosystem resilience to climate change we must 
lower  the  risk  of  adverse  reactions  by  lowering  the  acceptable  limits  of  these 
other stresses in the environment because climate change is already happening 
and our actions/inaction has already committed us to some changes. 
3. Implementing these pro-active approaches in adaptive management so we can 
learn  as  we  go.  The  actions  we  suggest  are  just  good  sense  in  light  of  climate 
change.  If  we  enact  small-scale  tests  and  wait  to  implement  our  approaches 
broadly,  the  system  will  have  changed  and  our  approaches  may  no  longer  be 
useful  or  applicable.  The  window  of  opportunity  for  preparations  may  close  as 
climate change progresses. Additionally, we do not have the funds or the human 
capacity to test strategies everywhere so we need to be learning lessons to share 
and implement as rapidly as possible. 
4.  Reduce  the  rate  and  extent  of  climate  change.  There  is  a  limit  to  our  ability 
to  adapt  to  climate  change.  For  example  if  we  think  about  ocean  acidification, 
there  is  a  permanent  commitment  to  changing  the  pH  of  the  ocean  every  time 
we  add  more  carbon  to  the  atmosphere  and  it  is  not  at  all  clear  how  we  can 
adapt  to  these  changes.  Best  estimates  are  that  2°  C  (3.6°  F)  increase  in  aver-
age  global  temperature  brings  us  to  a  point  where  adaptation  options  become 
dramatically  limited  in  feasibility  and  efficacy  and  prohibitively  expensive  in 
terms of cost. It is not new thinking that mitigation is necessary. This is simply 
another reason why we need to act sooner rather than later. 

WWF’s conservation adaptation projects are being implemented around the world, 
including  in  our  marine  ecoregions.  In  the  tropics,  we  are  testing  how  to  protect 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

27 

coral  reefs  in  American  Samoa,  Florida  and  the  Mesoamerican  Reef  of  Central 
America.  We  are  also  restoring  and  protecting  mangrove  forests  to  provide  better 
coastal  protection  in  Fiji,  Cameroon  and  Tanzania.  We  are  planning  for  sea  level 
rise in low lying regions of the world, especially those that are home to endangered 
species,  like  endangered  sea  turtles  in  the  Caribbean  and  beautiful  tigers  in  the 
Sundarbans of India. In the Bering Sea of Alaska we are working to protect the fu-
ture of that region’s vital fisheries for the realities of climate change. 

Some  of  our  first  work  on  climate  adaptation  was  focused  on  coral  reefs.  Coral 
reefs are particularly sensitive to climate change. They bleach when ocean tempera-
tures climb by as little as one degree Celsius. They are unable to create the calcium 
carbonate  skeleton  that  forms  the  reef  structure  when  the  pH  drops.  And,  they  are 
damaged  by  increasingly  intense  tropical  storm  activity.  The  fate  of  coral  reefs  will 
have  ramifications  for  human  societies  as  well.  It  has  been  estimated  that  coral 
reefs have a global economic value of $30 billon in net benefits. In the case of coral 
reefs we are particularly interested in increasing resilience by decreasing those non- 
climate stresses that exacerbate the adverse effects of climate change; those factors 
that  add  to  the  overall  stress  and  prevent  corals  from  being  able  to  withstand  the 
stresses  of  climate  change  itself.  In  American  Samoa  our  research  group  worked 
with local stakeholders to assess the current and potential impact of climate change 
on  their  coral  reef  resources.  Almost  annual  coral  bleaching  in  this  region  may  be 
leading to reef degradation. Increased awareness of this issue in the region, in part 
due to this project, has lead to climate change being front and center on the agenda 
of the upcoming U.S. Coral Reef Task Force meeting to be held in American Samoa. 
This  first  project  led  us  to  explore  similar  issues  on  a  reef  closer  to  home.  In  the 
Florida Keys, in fact for their whole Caribbean range, there are two species of coral, 
Acropora  cervicornis  and  A.  palmata,  which  are  listed  as  threatened  under  the  En-
dangered  Species  Act.  The  top  three  factors  identified  as  the  cause  of  their  listing 
are increasing sea temperatures, hurricanes and disease. It is unclear how a recov-
ery  plan  will  be  developed  to  respond  to  these  threats  given  their  inextricable  link 
to  global  climate  change  and  increasing  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  However  the 
larger  issue  in  the  region  is  not  how  to  protect  these  two  species  but  rather  how 
to protect the entire reef ecosystem. We are currently developing a decision-support 
tool  to  allow  for  the  integration  of  historic  coral  bleaching  data  and  water  quality 
data  in  order  to  assess  how  improving  regional  water  quality  in  the  Keys  may  in-
crease  the  resilience  of  those  very  economically  valuable  coral  reefs.  In  2001  it  was 
estimated  that  coral  reefs  generated  $3.9  billion  in  income  for  Broward,  Mimai- 
Dade, Monroe and Palm Beach counties. 

Coral reefs are not the only systems at risk from climate change. Coastal commu-
nities,  both  people  and  wildlife,  also  experience  multiple  climate  change  chal-
lenges—sea  level  rise,  increasing  storm  intensity,  changing  precipitation,  and  in-
creasing  temperatures.  Couple  those  stresses  with  the  high  human  population  den-
sity and development typical of coastal regions and climate planning becomes quite 
complicated.  In  some  regions  we  are  working  to  protect  coastline  and  in  other  we 
are preparing for its loss. 

Mangrove  forests  are  already  one  of  the  most  degraded  ecosystems  in  the  world. 
They  have  been  cut  down  for  firewood,  building  supplies  and  to  clear  coastline  for 
development.  Unfortunately  these  trees  provide  natural  protection  for  shoreline 
from  sea  level  rise  and  storm  surge.  Their  loss  has  increased  the  vulnerability  of 
coastal  communities.  WWF  is  working  to  restore  and  protect  mangrove  forests  in 
order to increase coastal resilience in Fiji, Cameroon and Tanzania. As it turns out 
there  is  an  added  benefit  of  protecting  mangroves;  healthy  mangroves  may  support 
healthy  reefs.  Mangroves  filter  nutrients  out  of  the  water  as  it  flows  from  land  to 
the oceans. It turns out coral reefs prefer low nutrient waters and when high nutri-
ent waters flow into the oceans it can decrease the resilience of coral reefs. Addition-
ally mangroves produce a compound that can filter out the harmful ultraviolet radi-
ation that can exacerbate coral bleaching. 

Sea level rise means the loss of land. For some species appropriate land is limited; 
others  thrive  right  along  the  shoreline.  In  either  of  these  cases,  there  are  almost 
always human communities nearby that are also competing for this already precious 
space. Unfortunately it is getting more precious every day. An interesting case study 
is  the  Key  Deer,  a  federally  endangered  species  that  finds  suitable  habitat  on  just 
two  of  the  Florida  Keys.  With  an  elevation  of  less  than  2  meters  (or  about  six  feet) 
at  their  highest  point  the  vulnerability  of  the  Florida  Keys  to  climate  change  is 
clear. If you are a Key Deer, with nowhere to migrate in response to climate change, 
your future is grim. While it is not clear what can be done for the Key Deer, WWF 
is  trying  to  help  develop  plans  to  prepare  other  species  for  climate  change.  In  the 
Caribbean basin, we are learning how sea level rise will inundate the nesting beach-
es  of  sea  turtles.  Sea  turtles  are  vulnerable  throughout  their  lives  to  climate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

28 

change—their sex is determined by the temperature of the sand in which their eggs 
incubate,  their  long  migrations  and  food  sources  are  to  varying  degrees  affected  by 
ocean  currents  potentially  vulnerable  to  climate,  some  rely  on  coral  reefs  and  sea 
grasses  which  are  themselves  vulnerable  and  then  their  nesting  beaches  are  being 
lost  as  the  seas  rise.  Often  as  sea  level  rises,  beaches  retreat  inland  creating  new 
coastline that would be suitable for turtle nesting. Unfortunately human infrastruc-
ture  (buildings,  roads)  can  prevent  the  generation  of  suitable  new  habitat.  We  are 
creating a new conservation plan for sea turtles that allows us to assess rate of sea 
level  rise,  beach  elevations  (looking  for  beaches  that  can  withstand  more  sea  level 
rise),  local  geology  (subsidence  and  uplift),  and  patterns  of  human  development. 
This will allow for choosing the right places for sea turtle protected areas and devel-
oping  better  coastal  planning  for  not  only  sea  turtles  but  human  populations  as 
well. 

On the other side of the planet we are dealing with a similar but potentially more 
dangerous  issue.  In  the  Sundarbans  of  India,  tigers  live  on  low-lying  mangrove  is-
lands.  It  is  estimated  that  12  of  these  islands  will  be  lost  to  sea  level  rise  by  2020. 
These  are  home  to  not  only  the  tigers  but  people  as  well.  As  these  islands  are  lost, 
both  tigers  and  people  will  be  looking  for  new  homes,  and  with  this  may  come  in-
creasing  human/wildlife  interactions  that  can  have  adverse  consequences  for  both 
sides.  We  are  again  trying  to  develop  a  new  conservation  plan  to  prepare  for  the 
habitat that both humans and tigers will need as the landscape changes. 

A  similar  process  is  occurring  in  our  most  northern  oceans.  In  the  Arctic,  record 
sea  ice  loss  is  causing  polar  bears  to  spend  more  time  on  land  or  drown  at  sea.  It 
is  also  making  them  go  hungry  because  they  require  sea  ice  to  hunt  for  their  pri-
mary  food  source,  ringed  seals.  More  time  on  land  means  more  time  for  potential 
interactions with people. In one Russian community where we work a young woman 
was  killed  by  a  polar  bear  near  her  village  last  year.  We  are  now  working  with 
these  communities  on  ways  to  decrease  polar  bear/human  interactions  without  loss 
of life on either side through what are called ‘‘Polar Bear Patrols.’’ 

In the Bering Sea climate change is causing fish species ranges to shift (generally 
moving farther north) and historic fishing grounds will no longer be as robust. This 
is  no  small  concern  as  the  Bering  Sea  is  home  to  a  $2.1  billion  fishing  industry. 
WWF  is  working  to  develop  new  management  approaches  that  plan  for  climate 
change and protect the resource as well as the livelihoods that rely upon it. 

Obviously  projects  like  these  will  not  solve  the  problem  of  climate  change.  How-
ever  they  encompass  the  level  of  climate  awareness  that  managers  must  now  have 
and  the  range  of  activities  they  can  engage  in  order  to  increase  the  resilience  of 
their  systems  to  climate  change.  They  are  part  of  a  larger  strategy  that  we  must 
develop to address both the cause and effects of climate change. 

Virtually  all  of  the  major  bills  introduced  in  this  Congress  relating  to  climate 
change  are  focused  on  mitigation,  whether  in  the  form  of  across-the-board  cuts  in 
U.S.  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  or  in  more  targeted  cuts  for  electric  power  plants, 
mobile  sources  of  emissions,  etc.  Given  the  crucial  need  to  address  the  root  cause 
of  climate  change  this  is  not  misguided.  However  we  must  now  also  begin  the  task 
of  addressing  how  to  respond  to  the  effects  of  climate  change.  At  this  point,  bills 
on climate change have not addressed adaptation in a meaningful way. 

Conservation organizations are not alone in their lack of preparedness for the ef-
fects  of  climate  change.  We  need  a  bold  new  plan  in  all  sectors  to  deal  with  this 
ubiquitous  challenge.  WWF  proposes  a  legislative  approach  with  two  components. 
First we need a National Strategy for Adaptation, supported not only with funding, 
but  with  an  extension  agency  that  works  to  develop  the  myriad  responses  we  will 
need in all sectors of our society, not just the oceans, not just natural resources and 
wildlife,  but  in  civil  society  and  the  infrastructure  on  which  we  and  our  economy 
relies—food, water, housing, transportation, education, public health . . . the list is 
endless. This extension agency could be modeled after the Land and Sea Grant pro-
grams to work with all levels of society across the country on specifically addressing 
and  adapting  to  climate  change.  Second,  we  need  an  impact  assessment  approach 
modeled after National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) that would require public 
works,  infrastructure  activities  and  all  other  projects  that  might  adversely  affect 
natural  systems  to  take  into  account  the  added  effects  of  climate  change,  and  ad-
dress  how  those  adverse  effects  could  be  avoided.  For  instance,  some  pollutants  be-
come more toxic at elevated temperatures, so existing exposure limits may not ade-
quately  protect  people  and  ecosystems  as  the  planet  warms  and  this  could  affect 
permitting for new sewage treatment projects. In fact this approach of assessing the 
vulnerability  of  projects  to  climate  change  should  be  good  business  practice  for  all 
federally  funded  project  in  order  to  ensure  their  value,  success  and  longevity,  re-
gardless of whether they focus on natural resources. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

29 

The  task  of  fully  addressing  climate  change  is  massive,  but  we  can  no  longer  ig-

nore it. 

Sustainable Development Law & Policy—Winter 2007 

CLIMATE CHANGE AND FEDERAL ENVIRONMENTAL LAW 

by Drs. Lara Hansen and Christopher R. Pyke* 

Introduction 

Human  activities,  particularly  the  combustion  of  fossil  fuels  and  the  large-scale 
transformation  of  land  cover,  affect  ecosystems  around  the  world,  Changes  in  tem-
perature,  precipitation,  and  water  chemistry  are  altering  our  environment.  These 
changes  will  also  affect  environmental  regulatory  frameworks,  either  rendering 
them ineffective or forcing them to adapt to achieve their goals under changing con-
ditions. 
Global  temperature  has  increased  by  0.8°  C  over  the  last  century.  Climate  sci-
entists  estimate  that  we  arc  committed  to  an  additional  0.5°  C  increase  due  to  the 
amount of carbon dioxide (‘‘CO2’’) that is already present in the atmosphere.1 Rising 
temperatures have been accompanied by a wide range of environmental changes, in-
cluding,  retreat  of  sea  ice  and  glaciers,  sea  level  rise,  and  changes  in  the  intensity 
and  frequency  of  storms  and  precipitation  events.2 Rising  CO2 concentrations  has 
not  only  changed  the  composition  of  the  air,  but  it  is  also  changing  the  chemistry 
of the water: CO2 is absorbed by the oceans, which forms carbonic acid, causing the 
acidification of the oceans.3 

These  changes  mean  that  regulations  intended  to  protect  natural  resources  and 
promote  conservation  will  be  applied  under  conditions  significantly  different  from 
those  that  prevailed  when  they  were  drafted.  Achieving  the  original  goals  of  these 
regulations  will  require  a  careful  assessment  of  long-standing  assumptions,  as  well 
as  decisive  action  to  change  regulatory  practices  in  ways  that  accommodate,  offset, 
and  mitigate  climate  change.  Three  such  laws  will  be  explored  in  this  article:  the 
Endangered  Species  Act  (‘‘ESA’’),  the  Clean  Water  Act  (‘‘CWA’’),  and  the  Clean  Air 
Act (‘‘CAA’’). 
Climate Change and the Endangered Species Act 

The  stated  purpose  of  the  ESA  is  ‘‘to  provide  a  means  whereby  the  ecosystems 
upon which endangered species and threatened species depend may be conserved.’’ 4 
The  architects  of  the  ESA  intended  to  save  creatures  from  proximal  threats,  such 
as  bulldozers  and  dams.  Yet,  today  we  see  clear  evidence  that  climate  change  cre-
ates  new  threats  to  already  imperiled  species  by  contributing  to  the  disruption  of 
ecological processes essential to entire ecosystems. Deteriorating conditions will im-
pact  the  viability  of  endangered  species  and  the  practices  used  to  protect  them 
through  implementation  of  the  ESA  (e.g.,  listing,  ‘‘take’’  permitting,  and  recovery 
planning). 

For example, in 2006, two species of Caribbean coral, Elkhorn (Acropora palmata) 
and Staghorn (A. cervicornis) coral, were listed as ‘‘threatened’’ for their entire range 
under the ESA. The listing stated that ‘‘the major threats to the species’ persistence 
(i.e.,  disease,  elevated  sea  surface  temperature,  and  hurricanes)  are  severe,  unpre-
dictable, likely to increase in the foreseeable future, and, at current levels of knowl-
edge, unmanageable.’’ 5 This listing identifies three key threats that all relate to cli-
mate change: rising sea surface temperatures, disease susceptibility, and hurricane- 
related  impacts.  Sea  surface  temperatures  are  closely  related  to  increasing  global 
surface  air  temperatures.  A  severe  Caribbean  coral-bleaching  event  in  2005  dem-
onstrated that high temperatures cause coral bleaching and bleaching corals become 
more  susceptible  to  disease.6 Moreover,  as  global  temperatures  rise,  the  intensity 
and  frequency  of  hurricanes  may  increase.7 The  timing  of  this  listing  was  particu-
larly  profound  as  it  followed  the  unprecedented  2005  Caribbean  summer,  during 
which  the  region  experienced  the  hottest  water  temperatures  ever  recorded  with 
large-scale bleaching followed by disease,8 and a record breaking hurricane season.9 
Recently,  the  U.S.  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service  proposed  listing  Polar  Bears  (Ursus 
maritimus).  The  bears  rely  on  Arctic  sea  ice  for  access  to  food  and  breeding  sites. 
Their primary food source, the ringed seal (Phoca hispida), is also an ice dependent 
species.  The  loss  of  nearly  30  percent  of  Arctic  ice  cover  over  the  past  century,  to-
gether  with  the  possibility  that  the  Arctic  will  be  seasonally  ice-free  before  the  end 

* Dr.  Lara  Hansen  is  Chief  Scientist  on  Climate  Change  at  the  World  Wildlife  Fund.  Dr. 

Christopher R. Pyke is the Director of Climate Change Services for CTG Energetics, Inc. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

30 

of  this  century,  strongly  suggest  that  climate  change  will  jeopardize  the  survival  of 
this species.10 

Another  example  is  the  Key  Deer,  which  is  now  limited  to  living  on  two  islands 
in the Florida Keys. Most of the Keys have less than two meters of elevation. If sea 
levels  were  to  rise  one  meter,  most  the  Key  Deer  habitat  would  be  lost.  The  only 
way to limit sea level rise and protect remaining Key Deer habitat is to take action 
to mitigate the rate and extent of climate change.11 

These three species represent the tip of the iceberg, so to speak. Because climatic 
conditions  are  central  to  basic  ecological  processes  that  control  the  distribution  and 
abundance  of  life,  the  list  of  species  that  are  or  will  be  endangered  by  climate 
change  is  potentially  enormous.12 The  most  direct  way  to  protect  the  ecosystems  in 
which  these  species  live—the  mandate  of  the  ESA—will  be  to  address  the  cause  of 
climate change: greenhouse gas emissions. However, because some impacts are inev-
itable, it is important that we also consider how implementation of the ESA can be 
used  to  reduce  the  vulnerability  of  imperiled  species  and  aid  in  their  recovery  de-
spite changing conditions. 
Climate Change and the Clean Water Act 13 

The CWA provides the legislative foundation for the protection and restoration of 
the  waters  of  the  United  States.  The  Act  seeks  to  ‘‘restore  and  maintain  the  chem-
ical,  physical,  and  biological  integrity  of  the  Nation’s  waters’’  with  the  goal  of 
achieving  water  quality  that  ‘‘provides  for  the  protection  and  propagation  of  fish, 
shellfish,  and  wildlife,  and  recreation  in  and  on  the  water.’’ 14 The  CWA  gives  the 
U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (‘‘EPA’’)  the  statutory  authority  to  establish 
water  quality  standards  and  to  regulate  the  discharge  of  pollutants  into  waters  of 
the United States. 

Climate and water quality are linked by hydrologic processes involved in the glob-
al  water  cycle.  These  processes  move  water  from  the  oceans,  into  the  atmosphere, 
and back down into rivers, streams, wetlands, and estuaries. The net result is a sus-
tainable  supply  of  clean,  fresh  water  and  a  wide  variety  ecosystem  services,  such 
as  recreational  opportunities  and  food  production.  It  has  long  been  recognized  that 
humans  intervene  in  this  cycle  through  activities  that  intercept,  store,  utilize,  or 
otherwise alter natural hydrologic processes (e.g., the expansion of impermeable sur-
faces,  application  of  excess  fertilizer,  and  removal  of  ecological  filtration  processes 
such as wetlands). The CWA provides a framework for understanding these sources 
of impairment and acts to restore impaired waters and prevent further degradation. 
Over time, the CWA contributed to significant improvements in surface water qual-
ity  in  the  United  States  despite  a  steadily  growing  population  and  expanding  econ-
omy. 

Climate change adds a new and potentially disruptive element to these long-run-
ning efforts. The Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change predicts a wide vari-
ety  of  changes,  including  rising  air  temperature,  more  frequent  heat  waves,  more 
intense  precipitation  events,  and  increasingly  severe  dry-spells  and  droughts.15 
These  changes  reflect  the  biophysical  consequences  of  an  overall  acceleration  of  the 
global hydrologic cycle, and these general conclusions have been a feature of the sci-
entific  literature  for  nearly  twenty  years.  However,  the  local  and  regional  con-
sequences of these complex processes remain difficult to predict. The key conclusion 
for  local  and  regional  decisionmakers  is  that  ‘‘change’’  will  be  the  operative  word, 
and historic observations will provide an increasingly unreliable guide to future con-
ditions. Changes in hydrologic processes will be reflected in changes in the quantity 
and quality of surface waters, and, in many cases, they are likely to undermine im-
portant assumptions used in the implementation of the CWA. For example: 

• More intense precipitation events will increase nonpoint source pollution loads. 
• Increasing  storm  water  volumes  may  exceed  expectations  and  design  specifica-

tions for water treatment works and sewer infrastructure. 

• Decreases  in  flow  volume  may  increase  in-stream  pollutant  concentrations  and 

reduce the ability of waters to accommodate pollutant discharges. 

• Increases in ambient air temperature will raise temperatures in surface waters 

and threaten aquatic ecosystems. 

• Humans  may  respond  to  some  climate  change-related  impacts  through  in-
creased  use  of  some  pesticides,  fungicides,  and  fertilizers,  increasing  the  con-
centrations in surface and groundwater (e.g., expanding nuisance species). 

• Climate  change  may  also  decrease  the  toxicity  thresholds  of  bioindicators  to 

these pollutants. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

31 

These changes have significant implications for the most important and far-reach-
ing CWA programs, including the control of point source discharge, management of 
nonpoint source pollution, and environmental monitoring. 

Point source discharges are typically managed by engineered systems. Most mod-
ern  systems  are  designed  to  accommodate  a  relatively  wide  range  of  environmental 
conditions.  However,  there  are  limits,  and  climate  change  may  drive  systems  unex-
pectedly  close  to  their  design  tolerances—sometimes  risking  catastrophic  outcomes 
(e.g.,  levies  surrounding  New  Orleans).  Changes  to  long-term,  capital-intensive  in-
vestments  such  as  sewer  and  stormwater  facilities  are  costly  and  time  consuming. 
Consequently,  those  involved  in  their  design,  construction,  and  operation  need  to 
begin anticipating the impacts of climate change immediately. 

Nonpoint  source  pollution  represents  a  different  kind  of  problem.  By  definition, 
nonpoint  loads  come  from  many  small  sources.  Pollution  is  controlled  by  means  of 
so-called  Best  Management  Practices  (‘‘BMPs’’),  such  as  riparian  buffers,  retention 
ponds, and cover cropping. Climate change will alter both the volume and concentra-
tion of nonpoint source pollution and the effectiveness of BMPs. Managing nonpoint 
source  pollution  under  changing  climatic  conditions  will  require  thoughtful  moni-
toring  and  attention  to  the  relative  sensitivities  of  different  land  uses  and  BMPs. 
In many cases, thoughtful land use planning and the selection of climatically-robust 
BMPs  may  be  able  to  achieve  many  nonpoint  source  pollution  control  goals  despite 
changing conditions. 

CWA  programs  are  based  on  observations  of  the  actual  water  quality  conditions 
and activities that may contribute to impairment. Observations include information 
about  a  water  body’s  physical,  chemical,  and  biological  condition.  These  indicators 
are  used  to  assess  compliance  with  water  quality  standards  and  attribute  degrada-
tion  to  specific  sources.  This  process  typically  assumes  that  drivers  of  change  can 
be found within a given watershed. However, climate change will alter water quality 
regardless of local actions and, in most cases, climate-related changes will compound 
or  exacerbate  on-going  water  quality  problems  and  a  myriad  of  existing  conditions 
and on-going restoration activities. In other words, climate change will make an al-
ready complicated analysis significantly more challenging. 

Untangling  complex,  changing  mixtures  of  factors  contributing  to  water  quality 
will  require  monitoring  systems  that  allow  for  separation  of  climatic  and  non-cli-
matic  factors.  The  EPA  uses  a  system  of  bioindicators  to  evaluate  the  biological  in-
tegrity of surface waters.16 These are typically fish, aquatic insects, and other orga-
nisms that have well-known responses to changes in water quality. These bioindica-
tors  provide  synthetic  measures  of  water  quality  that  can  help  diagnose  specific 
causes of impairment or degradation. However, bioindicators are themselves part of 
ecological systems that will respond to changes in both climate and water quality.17 
The  myriad  examples  offered  in  toxicological  literature  demonstrate  that  elevated 
temperature  and  altered  water  chemistry  can  exacerbate  the  toxicity  of  pollutants. 
Consequently, the use of this important information for attribution will require un-
derstanding the response of specific bioindicators to changing conditions and specifi-
cally  selecting  indicators  with  methods  that  allow  for  partitioning  between  climatic 
and non-climatic impacts.18 
Climate Change and the Clean Air Act 

The stated purpose of Title IV of the CAA is ‘‘to reduce the adverse effects of acid 

deposition.’’ 19 It seeks to address Congressional findings that: 

1. the presence of acidic compounds and their precursors in the atmosphere and 
in deposition from the atmosphere represents a threat to natural resources, eco-
systems, materials, visibility, and public health; 
2. the principal sources of the acidic compounds and their precursors in the at-
mosphere  are  emissions  of  sulfur  and  nitrogen  oxides  from  the  combustion  of 
fossil fuels; 
3.  the  problem  of  acid  deposition  is  of  national  and  international  significance; 
4.  strategies  and  technologies  for  the  control  of  precursors  to  acid  deposition 
exist now that are economically feasible, and improved methods are expected to 
become increasingly available over the next decade; and 
5. current and future generations of Americans will be adversely affected by de-
laying measures to remedy the problem.20 

The  CAA  is  primarily  targeted  at  reduction  of  sulfur  (‘‘SOX’’)  and  nitrogen  oxides 
(‘‘NOX’’). It also may be interpreted or amended to apply to greenhouse gases. Rising 
atmospheric CO2-levels acidify ocean water and threaten marine resources and eco-
systems.  Reducing  CO2 emissions  would  help  mitigate  this  global  problem,  poten-
tially  using  CAA  mechanisms  originally  designed  for  SOX and  NOX.  For  example, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

32 

Title  IV  of  the  CAA  encourages  ‘‘energy  conservation,  use  of  renewable  and  clean 
alternative  technologies,  and  pollution  prevention  as  a  long-range  strategy,  con-
sistent with the provisions of this title, for reducing air pollution and other adverse 
impacts  of  energy  production  and  use.’’ 21 These  activities  also  reduce  CO2,  emis-
sions and in so doing mitigate the effect of atmospheric CO2, on the ocean. 

Finally, CO2, acidification, like SOX and NOX, is a problem of national and inter-
national scope. Current and future generations will be affected by any delay in tak-
ing  action.  Due  to  the  fact  that  roughly  half  of  anthropogenic  emissions  end  up  in 
the  oceans  and  because  CO2 remains  in  the  atmosphere  for  a  substantial  period  of 
time,  CO2 will  continue  to  acidify  the  Earth’s  oceans  for  decades  or  centuries  to 
come.  Failure  to  limit  anthropogenic  emissions  will  only  perpetuate  this  problem. 
The likelihood that reducing greenhouse gas emissions will limit acidification is very 
high. 

To  date,  the  EPA  has  been  unwilling  to  regulate  CO2 as  an  air  pollutant,  and 
legal action by states and municipalities on this issue awaits a decision by the U.S. 
Supreme Court. Interpreting or amending the CAA to regulate CO2, as an acidifying 
agent may be an effective mechanism for curbing CO2 emissions. 
Conclusion 

The ESA, the CWA, and the CAA form the foundation of the effort to protect and 
restore the environment in the United States. Climate change undermines the ambi-
tious goals of these laws. Changes in climate can jeopardize the survival and recov-
ery  of  endangered  species.  Climate  change  is  likely  to  alter  hydrologic  processes  in 
ways  that  could  undermine  the  goal  of  providing  clean,  safe  water  resources.  Cli-
mate  change  can  also  exacerbate  long-standing  air  quality  issues  by  increasing  the 
likelihood of unhealthy or ecologically-damaging conditions. The first step is to take 
our  collective  foot  off  our  fossil  fuel-powered  accelerator  by  implementing  prompt 
and deliberate measures to reduce the emission of greenhouse gases. 

This first step, while necessary, is not sufficient. We are already committed to sig-
nificant levels of climate change due to the accumulation of CO2, in our oceans and 
atmosphere. Achieving conservation and resource protection goals will require devel-
oping robust and resilient practices that explicitly anticipate and address the poten-
tial for changing conditions. In the years ahead, efforts to mitigate and adapt to cli-
mate change will constitute important, new dimensions to these critical pieces of en-
vironmental legislation. 
Endnotes 

1 G.A.  Meehl  et  al.,  How  Much  More  Global  Warming  and  Sea  Level  Rise?,  307 

3 Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  Summary  for  Policymakers,  Cli-
mate Change 2001: Impacts, Adaptation, and Vulnerability (Feb. 2001), available at 
http://www.ipcc.ch/pub/wg2SPMfinal.pdf  (last  visited  Feb.  13,  2007)  [hereinafter 
IPCC]. 

4 16 U.S.C. § 1531 (2000). 
5 Rules  and  Regulations.  Endangered  and  Threatened  Species:  Final  Listing  De-
termination  for  Elkhorn  Coral  and  Staghorn  Coral,  71  Fed.  Reg.  26,852  (May  9, 
2006). 

6 See Mark Eakin, Management During Mass Coral Bleaching Events: Wider Car-
ibbean  Case  Study,  International  Tropical  Marine  Ecosystem  Management  Sympo-
sium  (October  16–20,  2006);  see  also  National  Park  Service,  Coral  Bleaching  and 
Disease Deliver ‘‘One-Two Punch’’ to Coral Reefs in the U.S. Virgin Islands (October 
2006), 
at  http://www.nature.nps.gov/water/Marine/CRTFlFactl 
Sheet1-1a.pdf (last visited Jan. 21, 2007) [hereinafter NPS]. 

available 

7 Kevin  E.Trenberth  and  Dennis  J.  Shea,  Atlantic  Hurricanes  &  Natural  Varia-
bility  in  2005,  33  GEOPHYSICAL RESEARCH LETTERS,  June  27,  2006,  at  1;  see  gen-
erally Emanuel, supra note 2. 

8 NPS, supra note 6. 
9 Trenberth & Shea, supra note 7. 
10 Endangered  and  Threatened  Wildlife  and  Plants;  12-Month  Petition  Finding 
and  Proposed  Rule  to  List  the  Polar  Bear  (Ursus  maritimus)  as  Threatened 
Throughout its Range, 72 Fed. Reg. 1064 (Jan. 7, 2007). 

11 See  generally  U.S.  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service,  Southeast  Region  Workforce  Man-
agement  Plan,  available  at  http://www.fws.gov/southeast/workforce/images/ 
WorkforcePlan.pdf (last visited Feb. 13, 2007). 

12 J.R.  Malcolm  et  al.,  Global  Warming  and  Extinctions  of  Endemic  Species  From 

Biodiversity Hotspots, 20 CONSERVATION BIOLOGY 538, at 538–548 (2006). 

SCIENCE 5716 (2005). 

Years, 436 NATURE 7051 (2005). 

2 Kerry Emanuel, Increasing Destructiveness of Tropical Cyclones Over the Past 30 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

33 

13 See  generally  C.R.  Pyke,  &  R.S.  Pulwarty,  Elements  of  Effective  Decision  Sup-
port  for  Water  Resource  Management  Under  a  Changing  Climate,  8  WATER RE-
SOURCES IMPACT 5 (Sept. 2006). 

14 33 U.S.C. § 1251 (2001). 
15 IPCC, supra note 3. 
16 U.S.  EPA  website,  Biological 

of  Watershed  Health. 
http://www.epa.gov/bioindicators/html/indicator.html  (last  visited  Feb.  13,  2007). 
17 See  generally  Stephen  R.  Carpenter  et  al.,  Global  Change  and  Freshwater  Eco-

Indicators 

systems, 23 ANN. R. OF ECOLOGY AND SYSTEMATICS 119 (1992). 

18 B.G. Bierwagen and S. Julius, A Framework for Using Biocriteria as Indicators 
of Climate Change, Second Annual Meeting of the International Society for Environ-
mental Bioindicators, April 24–26, 2006. 

19 42 U.S.C. § 7651 (2003). 
20 42 U.S.C. § 7651 (2003). 
21 42 U.S.C. § 7651 (2003). 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Dr. Hansen. 
Dr. Kruse? 

STATEMENT  OF  GORDON  H.  KRUSE,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT’S 
PROFESSOR  OF  FISHERIES  AND  OCEANOGRAPHY,  SCHOOL 
OF  FISHERIES  AND  OCEAN  SCIENCES,  UNIVERSITY  OF 
ALASKA FAIRBANKS 
Dr.  KRUSE.  Madam  Chair  and  members  of  the  Committee:  It  is 
my honor to testify to you this morning. My name is Gordon Kruse. 
I  am  the  President’s  Professor  of  Fisheries  at  the  School  of  Fish-
eries and Ocean Sciences, University of Alaska, Fairbanks. 

My  objectives  are  to  discuss  potential  mechanisms  and  effects  of 
climate change on living marine resources in Alaska, future outlook 
for these resources, and implications for management and research 
needs.  As  just  one  measure  of  the  value  of  marine  ecosystems,  in 
2005 landings from Alaska totaled 5.7 billion pounds, representing 
59  percent  of  the  total  9.6  billion  pounds  landed  in  the  United 
States. 

Because  the  Arctic  has  been  warming  much  faster  than  the  rest 
of the globe and this accelerated trend is projected to persist, stud-
ies  on  its  effects  in  Alaska  are  critically  time  sensitive.  A  large 
body of scientific evidence implicates climate as being primarily re-
sponsible  for  many  observed  changes  in  marine  ecosystems  off 
Alaska.  Three  of  the  important  interrelated  scales  of  variability  I 
will  discuss  today  are  inter-annual,  decadal,  and  global  warming. 
Regarding  inter-annual  or  year  to  year  variability,  an  important 
component is the El Nin˜ o, which occurs every 2 to 7 years. In asso-
ciation with warm ocean temperatures, species more typical of trop-
ical waters, such as ocean sunfish and Pacific white-sided dolphins, 
extend their distributions into Alaska. El Nin˜ os appear to have be-
come  more  intense  in  the  latter  half  of  the  20th  century,  possibly 
as a manifestation of global warming. 

Coincident  with  the  very  strong  1997–1998  El  Nin˜ o,  the  first 
ever massive bloom of coccolithophores, which are very small, rath-
er  non-nutritious  microscopic  plants  or  phytoplankton,  was  ob-
served  in  the  eastern  Bering  Sea.  The  bloom  was  so  massive  that 
it was observed from space. Some seabird species experienced mas-
sive  die-offs  and  others  produced  very  few  surviving  offspring 
owing to feeding problems. 

Much  decadal-scale  variability  occurs  in  the  form  of  climate  re-
gime shifts every 10 to 30 years. For instance, in the northeast Pa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

34 

cific  Ocean  temperatures  were  warm  in  the  mid-1920s  to  the  mid- 
1940s,  cool  in  the  mid-1940s  to  the  late  1970s,  and  warm  since 
then. Marine ecosystem changes since the regime shift of the 1970s 
include  declines  in  forage  fishes,  crabs  and  shrimps,  and  increases 
in salmon and groundfish, presumably as a result of changes in nu-
trients supporting phytoplankton production. 

Global warming will have differential thermal effects on the spe-
cies distributions. In the Bering Sea, adult red king crab and snow 
crab  have  shifted  to  the  north  since  the  late  1960s,  likely  due  to 
an  aversion  to  increasing  bottom  temperature.  It  appears  that  the 
planktonic  larvae  of  both  species  are  now  being  carried  by  ocean 
currents  too  far  north,  beyond  preferred  nursery  habitats.  At  the 
same  time,  warmer  temperatures  have  allowed  predators  of  young 
crabs,  such  as  Pacific  cod  and  rocksole,  to  shift  their  distributions 
to  the  north.  For  these  reasons,  Bering  Sea  crabs  may  fare  poorly 
under continued global warming. 

One  species  that  seems  to  have  particularly  benefited  greatly 
from  conditions  since  the  late  1970s  is  arrowtooth  flounder,  a  spe-
cies  at  its  highest  record  levels  of  abundance.  This  species  is  a  vo-
racious  predator  that  consumes  large  amounts  of  pollock,  cod,  and 
other commercially valuable species. Unfortunately, the flesh of the 
arrowtooth  flounder  has  low  market  value  owing  to  enzymes  that 
degrade flesh quality. 

The  Bering  Sea  is  being  restructured  by  ongoing  warming  tem-
peratures  and  loss  of  sea  ice.  In  years  of  extensive  sea  ice,  an  ice 
edge  phytoplankton  bloom  occurs  in  April,  which  falls  to  the  sea 
floor  and  supports  bottom  or  benthic  species  like  crabs  and  clams. 
In  years  of  little  sea  ice,  the  spring  bloom  occurs  in  May  or  June 
and it stays in the upper layers, where it benefits water column or 
pelagic species, like pollock. A sharp decline in sea ice has favored 
pelagic  over  benthic  species  in  the  southeast  Bering  Sea  since  the 
late 1970s. 

Recent  studies  are  indicating  that  similar  changes  are  now  be-
ginning  to  occur  in  the  northern  Bering  Sea.  In  these  northern 
areas, loss of benthic production will adversely affect walruses and 
spectacled  eiders,  which  feed  primarily  on  benthic  clams  or  other 
bivalves. 

What  about  implications  of  global  warming  on  fishery  manage-
ment?  The  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  is  consid-
ering management actions with respect to likely northward expan-
sion  of  fish  resources  into  the  northern  Bering  Sea  and  Arctic 
Ocean.  At  its  June  2007  meeting,  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Man-
agement Council is considering action that may ban bottom fishing 
in  the  northern  Bering  Sea  except  for  the  conduct  of  experiments 
to study fishing effects. 

Over  the  long-term,  the  Council  may  develop  an  Arctic  Fishery 
Management  plan,  but  these  efforts  are  severely  constrained  by 
lack  of  information  on  marine  fish  and  invertebrate  resources  in 
the region. 

In  general,  global  warming  will  cause  greater  uncertainty  about 
the  productivity  of  fish  stocks.  Under  science-based  management, 
increasing  uncertainty  translates  into  more  precaution,  which  will 
likely mean reduced fish harvests in Alaska. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

35 

I  have  recommended  five  research  needs  to  improve  our  ability 
to  forecast  and  address  likely  future  marine  ecosystem  changes  in 
Alaska  with  regard  to  global  warming.  First,  it  is  critical  at  this 
time to establish baseline assessments of marine ecosystems of the 
northern Bering Sea and Arctic Ocean. 

Second, establishment of Integrated Ocean Observing Systems is 
essential  to  monitoring  and  understanding  the  effects  of  global  cli-
mate change on these marine ecosystems. Third, it is important to 
invest  in  studies  on  the  biology,  life  history,  and  ecology  of  very 
poorly  studied  species  in  the  northern  regions.  Fourth,  it  is  impor-
tant to establish linkages between climate models and marine eco-
system  and  fishery  models,  so  that  the  effects  of  global  warming 
can be better quantified. And finally, climate change coupled to the 
likely  increases  in  marine  transportation,  development  of  other 
human uses of marine ecosystems off Alaska, heighten the need for 
further development of an ecosystem approach to management. 

Thank  you,  Madam  Chair,  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  you 

today and I would be pleased to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Kruse follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT GORDON H.  KRUSE,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT’S PROFESSOR OF 
FISHERIES AND OCEANOGRAPHY,  SCHOOL OF FISHERIES AND OCEAN SCIENCES, 
UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA FAIRBANKS 

Introduction 

Madam Chair and members of the Committee, it is my honor to testify to you this 
morning.  My  name  is  Gordon  Kruse.  Since  2001,  I  have  been  the  President’s  Pro-
fessor of Fisheries and Oceanography at the School of Fisheries and Ocean Sciences, 
University of Alaska Fairbanks. Prior to my current position, I directed the marine 
fisheries  research  program  for  the  Alaska  Department  of  Fish  and  Game  for  16 
years, where I was the lead Science Advisor to the State of Alaska on state and Fed-
eral marine fishery management. I have been a member of the Scientific and Statis-
tical Committee (SSC) of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council (NPFMC’s) 
for  7  years,  including  the  two  most  recent  years  as  chair  (2005–2006)  and  the  two 
prior  years  as  vice-chair  (2003–2004).  I  served  an  additional  11  years  as  a  member 
of the NPFMC’s Crab Plan Team and Scallop Plan Team and co-authored the origi-
nal crab and scallop Fishery Management Plans. I am the current chair of the Fish-
ery  Science  Committee  for  the  North  Pacific  Marine  Science  Organization  (PICES), 
an  international  marine  science  organization  involving  China,  Japan,  South  Korea, 
Russia, Canada and the U.S. 
Objectives of Testimony 

My  objectives  are  to  discuss:  (1)  potential  mechanisms  and  effects  of  climate 
change  on  living  marine  resources  in  Alaska,  (2)  future  outlook  for  these  resources 
and  implications  for  management  under  continued  global  warming,  and  (3)  uncer-
tainties associated with gaps in our understanding that require further research. 
Importance of Marine Ecosystems Off the Coast of Alaska 

Alaska  is  unique  in  that  it  is  bounded  by  three  large  marine  ecosystems:  the 
North  Pacific  Ocean,  Bering  Sea,  and  Arctic  Ocean  (including  the  Beaufort  and 
Chukchi  Seas).  These  are  some  of  the  world’s  most  productive  ecosystems,  sup-
porting thousands of marine mammals, millions of seabirds, and trillions of fish and 
shellfish belonging to hundreds of species. 

These  Arctic  and  subarctic  oceans  provide  priceless  ecosystem  services,  including 
human  use.  Since  before  recorded  history,  Native  Alaskans  have  depended  on  the 
bounty of these ecosystems for their very existence. Still today, many of these com-
munities remain as subsistence-based (barter) economies, and their harvests of fish, 
shellfish,  mammals  and  other  resources  (e.g.,  bird  eggs,  kelp)  provide  the  majority 
of their diets. 

These  ecosystems  support  extremely  valuable  commercial  fisheries  that  provide 
both U.S. food security and foreign exports that contribute toward the national bal-
ance  of  trade.  More  than  half  of  the  total  U.S.  fishery  landings  come  from  the  wa-
ters  off  Alaska.  In  2005,  landings  from  Alaska  totaled  5.7  billion  pounds,  rep-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

36 

resenting 59 percent of the total 9.6 billion pounds landed in the U.S. (NMFS 2007). 
While  important  fisheries  occur  in  the  Gulf  of  Alaska  and  Aleutian  Islands,  most 
of this catch is taken from the eastern Bering Sea, owing to its broad, highly produc-
tive  continental  shelf.  In  2005,  the  Nation’s  top  seafood  port  was  again  Dutch  Har-
bor-Unalaska,  accounting  for  888  million  pounds  of  landings  worth  $283  million 
exvessel (before value-added processing). Moreover, seven of the Nation’s top 20 sea-
food ports are located in Alaska. The Bering Sea supports the world’s largest fishery 
(walleye  pollock),  largest  flatfish  fishery  (yellowfin  sole),  and  largest  salmon  (sock-
eye)  fishery.  Other  valuable  commercial  fisheries  target  a  diversity  of  species  of 
crabs,  rockfishes,  flatfish  (flounders  and  soles),  cod,  halibut,  herring,  and  other  fish 
and  invertebrates.  These  same  waters  provide  world-class  recreational  fishing  op-
portunities for non-resident visitors and Alaskan residents alike for salmon, halibut, 
rockfish and other species. 
Resource Sustainability Versus Variability 

In their report to the nation, the Pew Oceans Commission (2003) noted that Alas-
ka’s  fisheries  were  ‘‘arguably  the  best  managed  fisheries  in  the  country.  With  rare 
exception, the managers have a record of not exceeding acceptable catch limits set by 
scientists.  In  addition,  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council  and  Alaska 
Board  of  Fisheries  have  done  more  to  control  bycatch  and  protect  habitat  from  fish-
ing  gear  than  any  other  region  of  the  Nation.’’  The  sustainability  of  groundfish, 
salmon  and  other  fishery  resources  in  Alaska  is  tied  directly  to  conservative, 
science-based fishery management. 

Nonetheless, there are clear historical cases of overharvest and resultant collapse 
of  living  marine  resources,  even  in  Alaska—examples  include  the  Steller’s  sea  cow 
(hunted  to  extinction  in  1768),  northern  fur  seal  (1700s–early  1800s  and  again  in 
the  late  1800s–early  2000s),  great  whales  (mid  1800s–mid  2000s),  sea  otters  (mid 
1700s–early  2000s),  yellowfin  sole  (1960s),  and  Pacific  ocean  perch  (1960s–1970s). 
Causes  of  recent  declines  in  Steller  sea  lions,  northern  fur  seals,  shrimp,  and  king, 
Tanner and snow crabs are much less clear. Although human effects have been im-
plicated  in  many  of  these  recent  examples  and  undoubtedly  humans  have  contrib-
uted  to  varying  degrees,  a  large  body  of  scientific  evidence  has  emerged  in  support 
of climate change as being primarily responsible for major shifts in the marine eco-
systems  off  Alaska.  Environmental  variability  affecting  marine  ecosystems  occurs 
over  a  wide  range  of  time  scales;  the  scales  most  relevant  to  most  marine  animal 
populations  are  seasonal  to  decadal  and  longer.  Owing  to  our  rather  short  history 
(few  decades)  of  research  and  monitoring  of  marine  organisms  in  Alaska,  much  of 
our  outlook  for  impacts  of  global  warming  on  marine  ecosystems  is  based  upon  our 
understanding  of  the  mechanisms  and  effects  operating  on  shorter  time  scales,  as 
summarized below. 
Effects  of  Seasonal  Climate  Variability  on  Living  Marine  Resources  in 

Alaska 

Seasonal climate variability is vital to the productivity of temperate, subarctic and 
Arctic  marine  ecosystems.  In  these  regions,  there  is  a  seasonal  ‘‘battle’’  between 
winds  that  mix  deep,  nutrient-rich  waters  into  the  photic  zone  and  solar  heating 
that warms the upper layers of the ocean, causing thermal stratification that retains 
microscopic plants (phytoplankton) in the upper layers of the ocean where they can 
grow under sufficient light penetration and nutrient concentrations. 

In  the  spring,  when  solar  heating  wins  the  battle,  an  intense  bloom  of  large 
phytoplankton  occurs,  providing  large  amounts  of  food  to  microscopic  animals 
(zooplankton) that, in turn, bloom in abundance. This sequential burst in abundance 
of  phyto-  and  zooplankton  serves  as  food  to  higher  trophic  levels,  including  the 
planktonic  early  life  stages  (larvae)  of  many  commercially  important  species  of  fish 
and  shellfish,  as  well  as  adults  of  some  species  of  planktivorous  marine  mammals 
(e.g.,  humpback  whales)  and  seabirds  (e.g.,  crested  auklet).  In  other  words,  this 
spring bloom fuels the engine that supports much of the productivity of marine eco-
systems  in  Alaska.  The  timing  of  herring  spawning,  hatching  of  red  king  crab  lar-
vae,  and  outmigration  of  salmon  smolts  are  tied  to  this  remarkable  annual  event. 
As summer progresses, nutrients in the warm upper layers of the ocean become de-
pleted, overall production tends to decline, and other species of small phytoplankton 
adapted to low-nutrient conditions become prevalent. 

In  the  fall,  as  winds  strengthen  and  solar  heating  diminishes,  the  water  column 
mixes,  stability  breaks  down  and  a  smaller  fall  bloom  may  occur.  However, 
phytoplankton are mixed to deeper waters where light levels are too low to sustain 
net  growth  and  the  engine  that  fuels  the  marine  ecosystem  slows  down.  In  winter, 
productivity  is  low,  but,  even  at  this  time  of  year  some  species  (e.g.,  some  flatfish) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

37 

have  adapted  strategies  for  optimum  survival  as  winter  spawners.  In  the  following 
spring, the cycle is repeated again. 

Each  species  has  evolved  unique  life  history  strategies  to  be  successful  in  these 
seasonally  dynamic  marine  ecosystems.  For  many  species  of  marine  fish  and  inver-
tebrates, their success depends upon the synchrony in time and space of their early 
life  stages  (eggs  and  larvae)  with  abundances  of  suitable  food,  the  abundance  (or 
lack thereof) of predators, and ocean currents that carry them (advection) to nursery 
areas most amenable to their survival. Likewise, the success of seabird and marine 
mammal  populations  depends  largely  upon  the  ability  of  adults  to  secure  adequate 
prey while feeding their young on rookeries. 
Effects  of  Interannual  and  Decadal  Climate  Variability  on  Living  Marine 

Resources in Alaska 

El Nin˜ o 

Although  an  understanding  of  seasonal  variability  in  environmental  variables  is 
important  toward  understanding  the  strategies  by  which  species  thrive  within  ma-
rine ecosystems, it is the year-to-year (interannual) variability in climate and ocean 
processes that determines how animal populations change over time. One important 
component  of  interannual  variability  that  occurs  every  2–7  years  is  El  Nin˜ o/La 
Nin˜ a,  an  oscillation  of  a  coupled  ocean-atmosphere  system  in  the  tropical  Pacific 
having  important  consequences  for  weather  in  the  North  Pacific  and  around  the 
globe.  Prominent  features  of  an  El  Nin˜ o  include  the  relaxation  of  the  trade  winds 
and a warming of sea surface temperature in the equatorial eastern Pacific, extend-
ing  along  the  U.S.  west  coast  into  Alaskan  waters.  Species  more  typical  of  sub-
tropical  and  tropical  waters  extend  their  distributions  into  Alaska  during  El  Nin˜ o 
events.  For  instance,  during  the  1997–1998  El  Nin˜ o,  albacore  tuna  were  caught  off 
Kodiak  Island  and  ocean  sunfish  were  observed  in  the  northern  Gulf  of  Alaska 
(Kruse 1998). Global surface mean temperature anomalies provided by NOAA’s Na-
tional  Climate  Data  Center  suggest  that  El  Nin˜ os  became  more  intense  and  more 
frequent  in  the  latter  half  of  the  20th  century,  quite  possibly  as  a  manifestation  of 
global warming. Thus, range extensions and first-time sightings of southern species 
have become more common in recent years. 

Beyond  the  curiosity  of  such  unusual  sightings,  more  far-reaching  marine  eco-
system  changes  can  be  associated  with  El  Nin˜ o  events.  Coincident  with  the  1997– 
1998 El Nin˜ o, salmon run failures occurred in western Alaskan river systems impos-
ing  severe  economic  and  social  hardships  in  some  western  Alaskan  communities 
(Kruse 1998). A Federal disaster was declared by the U.S. President. Also, in 1997, 
the  first-ever  massive  bloom  of  coccolithophores  (a  non-nutritious  microscopic 
phytoplankton  covered  with  calcium  carbonate  platelets)  was  observed  in  the  east-
ern Bering Sea. The bloom was so dense and expansive, that it was easily observed 
by  satellites  orbiting  the  Earth.  A  massive  die-off  of  short-tailed  shearwaters  was 
associated  with  reduced  availability  of  their  preferred  prey  (euphausiids).  Murres, 
a  dive-feeding 
likely  because  dense 
coccolithophore concentrations obscured their vision and ability to feed. It is impor-
tant to recognize that these ecosystem effects were likely the product of an unusual 
combination  of  El  Nin˜ o,  decadal  climate  variability,  global  warming,  and  other 
atypical regional conditions. However, this suite of climatic conditions set the stage 
for repeated coccolithophore blooms in the eastern Bering Sea for half a dozen years 
after this initial event. 
Decadal Climate Regime Shifts 

seabird,  produced 

fewer  offspring, 

Much  marine  ecosystem  research  in  Alaska  since  the  1980s  has  documented 
decadal  climate  variability  patterns  that  have  led  to  regime  shifts  every  10–30 
years.  The  Pacific  Decadal  Oscillation  (PDO)  is  one  index  of  such  shifts,  based  on 
warm-cold patterns of sea surface temperature in the northern North Pacific Ocean. 
Some  have  likened  the  warm  phase  of  the  PDO  to  an  extended  El  Nin˜ o  situation. 
For  instance,  ocean  temperatures  in  the  northeast  Pacific  were  typically  warm  in 
the mid-1920s to mid-1940s, cool during the mid 1940s–late 1970s, and warm since 
then. The opposite pattern was experienced in the northwestern Pacific. 

The  regime  shift  of  the  late  1970s  has  been  particularly  well  studied.  Since  the 
late  1970s,  Alaskan  waters  have  experienced  more  frequent  winter  storms  associ-
ated  with  an  intensified  Aleutian  Low  Pressure  System,  increased  freshwater  dis-
charge  into  the  Gulf  of  Alaska,  a  stronger  Alaska  Coastal  Current  (which  flows  in 
a  counter-clockwise  fashion  around  the  gulf),  and  warmer  ocean  temperatures. 
These  changes  appeared  to  have  altered  the  flux  of  nutrients,  leading  to  a  marked 
increase in the biomass of zooplankton in the Gulf of Alaska. Other major ecosystem 
changes  associated  with  this  regime  shift  include  a  decline  in  forage  fishes,  crabs, 
and  shrimps  and  increases  in  the  abundances  of  salmon  and  groundfish  (Anderson 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

38 

and  Piatt  1999).  Some  research  supports  the  hypothesis  that  declines  in  a  number 
of  populations  of  marine  mammals  and  seabirds  are  related  to  observed  shifts  in 
marine food webs (e.g., decline in forage fish) in Alaska. However, as with any com-
plex ecosystem with limited monitoring, the evidence is less than conclusive. 

Decadal-scale  variability  in  the  extent  of  sea  ice  formation  has  had  profound  ef-
fects  on  the  Bering  Sea  marine  ecosystem.  Sea  ice  forms  and  melts  seasonally 
spreading  from  the  northern  to  southern  Bering  Sea  shelf  waters.  Timing  of  the 
spring  bloom  depends  heavily  on  ice  formation  and  melt.  In  years  of  extensive  ice 
coverage,  the  ice  thaws  more  slowly  and  melt  water  stratifies  the  upper  water  col-
umn  with  buoyant,  low  salinity  water.  If  this  stratification  occurs  sufficiently  late 
(e.g., April), then sunlight is adequate at that time of year to cause an early spring 
bloom near the ice edge. However, there is a dearth of zooplankton in this cold melt 
water,  so  much  of  the  phytoplankton  sinks  ungrazed  to  the  seafloor  where  it  bene-
fits bottom-dwelling (benthic) species, such as clams, crabs and other invertebrates. 
On the other hand, in years when ice is thin and less extensive, it melts in February 
or  March;  the  lesser  amount  of  freshwater  is  inadequate  to  stratify  the  water  col-
umn  and  sunlight  is  too  weak  at  that  time  of  year  to  support  a  plankton  bloom.  In 
such  years,  the  spring  bloom  is  delayed  until  May  or  June  after  the  sun  has  had 
sufficient  time  to  heat  a  stratified  layer  of  warmer  water.  Warmer  ocean  tempera-
tures  at  this  time  of  year  support  growth  of  the  zooplankton  community  and  much 
of  the  phytoplankton  production  is  grazed  by  water  column  (pelagic)  species,  such 
as walleye pollock. 

Sea  ice  in  the  southeast  Bering  Sea  has  declined  markedly  from  covering  6–7 
months in the late 1970s to spanning just 3–4 months each winter since the 1990s. 
As  the  ice-edge  bloom  may  account  for  a  large  fraction  of  the  total  annual  primary 
production in the eastern Bering Sea, there is considerable concern that declines in 
productivity have occurred with reductions in sea ice since the late 1970s. Although 
long-term  records  of  phytoplankton  are  lacking,  declines  in  summer  zooplankton 
have  been  clearly  documented  in  the  eastern  Bering  Sea  by  the  Japanese  research 
vessel OSHORO MARU since at least 1990. 
Effects of Global Warming on Living Marine Resources in Alaska 
Terrestrial Impacts of Global Warming in Alaska 

Increases  in  global  air  and  sea  temperatures  have  been  clearly  documented  since 
the  1800s.  On  land,  observed  changes  in  Alaska  are  dramatic  and  well  known,  in-
cluding retreat of nearly all glaciers, melting of permafrost and associated structural 
damage  to  buildings  and  roads,  and  increased  insect  outbreaks  (e.g.,  spruce  bark 
beetle)  in  coniferous  forests  and  an  associated  increase  in  frequency  of  forest  fires. 
Along  the  coast  of  western  Alaska,  higher  sea  levels  and  lack  of  shore-fast  sea  ice 
in  winter  has  led  to  extensive  coastal  erosion  during  storms,  prompting  the  immi-
nent costly relocation of dozens of Native villages. 
Climate and Oceanographic Changes With Global Warming 

A composite land-ocean index of global temperature provided by NASA shows that 
temperature  changes  since  the  1880s  reflect  the  combined  influences  of  the  two 
major frequencies already discussed—El Nin˜ os (every 2–7 years) and decadal varia-
bility (10–30 years)—plus a long-term increase in temperature associated with glob-
al warming (≥100 years). Because our history of research and monitoring of marine 
organisms  is  very  short  (decades)  relative  to  the  century-long  time  scale  associated 
with global warming, the outlook for living marine resources under continued global 
warming  is  based  largely  upon  our  rather  limited  understanding  of  recent  varia-
bility  and  mechanisms  associated  with  those  observed  changes.  The  outlook  for 
these  marine  resources  also  depends  upon  the  accuracy  of  future  projected  changes 
in temperature, precipitation and winds from climate forecast models. 
Based  on  the  working  group  of  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change 
in 2007, the near-term projection is for an average global increase of 0.2° C per dec-
ade  over  the  next  two  decades.  The  Arctic  has  been  warming  twice  as  fast  as  the 
rest of the globe since the mid 1800s, and this accelerated trend is projected to per-
sist  for  the  higher  latitudes  into  the  foreseeable  future.  Based  on  these  IPCC  mod-
els,  increased  precipitation  is  also  very  likely  in  the  higher  latitudes.  High-latitude 
changes  in  wind  patterns  are  also  projected,  but  specific  details  in  the  projections 
concerning storm frequency and intensity are somewhat less certain. 
Shifts in Species Distribution and Abundance 

Each  species  has  its  own  preferred  optimum  temperatures  within  a  wider  range 
of temperatures suitable for its growth and survival. With warming ocean tempera-
tures,  species  at  the  southern  end  of  their  distributions  (e.g.,  snow  crabs  in  the 
southeastern  Bering  Sea)  are  expected  to  contract,  whereas  those  at  the  northern 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

39 

ends  of  their  distributions  (e.g.,  Pacific  hake  in  southeastern  Alaska)  are  expected 
to expand northward. 

Increased  temperatures  may  benefit  some  species  and  disfavor  others.  With  the 
warming  experienced  in  the  last  two  decades,  in-river  temperatures  in  British  Co-
lumbia have exceeded 15° C, which causes stress in sockeye salmon, increasing sus-
ceptibility to disease and impairing reproduction. Studies have shown that mortality 
is  positively  related  to  temperature  and  river  flow  in  Fraser  River  sockeye  salmon. 
Turning  back  to  the  poor  salmon  runs  in  western  Alaska  in  1997–1998  mentioned 
earlier,  among  other  potential  causes,  anecdotal  reports  found  a  high  incidence  of 
a parasite, called Ichthyophonus. Infected fish did not dry properly when smoked (a 
common  means  of  preservation  by  subsistence  users)  and  had  white  spots  on  inter-
nal organs and muscle. Follow-up studies found that 25–30 percent of adult chinook 
salmon  returning  to  the  Yukon  River  in  1999–2002  were  infected  (Kocan  et  al., 
2003).  Many  of  the  diseased  fish  appear  to  have  died  before  spawning.  The  spread 
and pathogenicity of this parasite is correlated with Yukon River water temperature 
in June, which increased from 11° C to 15° C over 1975 to 2002 at Emmonak (river 
mile  24).  Such  examples  of  adverse  impacts  of  increasing  temperatures  on  salmon 
may become more common in Alaska with continued global warming. 

Warming  temperatures  are  expected  to  increase  the  northward  migration  of 
piscivorous  predators  into  the  future.  Pacific  mackerel  and  jack  mackerel,  species 
common to the coast of California, have extended their distributions into British Co-
lumbia in recent warm years. The productivity of Pacific mackerel populations is fa-
vored during warm years off California. Mackerel compete with and prey on juvenile 
salmon;  reduced  survival  of  sockeye  salmon  on  the  west  coast  of  Vancouver  Island 
is correlated with the abundance and early arrival of Pacific mackerel in British Co-
lumbia. The impact of mackerel predation and competition with salmon is a concern 
for Alaska. Mackerel have already been encountered in Southeast Alaska by salmon 
troll fishermen. 

There  are  additional  concerns  about  the  northward  extension  of  other  predators, 
such as spiny dogfish in Alaska. A colleague from the University of Washington and 
I  have  an  ongoing  project  to  evaluate  the  evidence  for  an  increase  in  dogfish  abun-
dance,  as  well  as  to  evaluate  the  life  history  and  productivity  of  dogfish  and  man-
agement implications in Alaska. Bycatch of dogfish is an increasing problem to fish-
ermen,  particularly  in  the  salmon  gillnet  and  halibut/sablefish  longline  fisheries  in 
Alaska.  On  the  one  hand,  dogfish  bycatch  causes  gear  damage  (gillnet)  and  hook 
competition  for  more  valuable  species  (sablefish  and  halibut),  but,  on  the  other 
hand, this species could provide new economic opportunities (dogfish supply the fish 
and  chips  industry  in  Europe).  Determination  of  sustainable  harvest  levels  is  prob-
lematic for this abundant species that has a low rate of annual productivity associ-
ated with delayed maturity and low reproductive rate. 

In  the  Bering  Sea,  the  centers  of  distribution  of  adult  female  red  king  crab  and 
snow crab have shifted to the north since the late 1960s and early 1970s, likely due 
to  increases  in  bottom  temperature  (Loher  and  Armstrong  2005,  Orensanz  et  al., 
2004, Zheng and Kruse 2006). The larval stages of both species are planktonic—sub-
ject to passive drift. Given the northward flow of prevailing ocean currents and the 
probable fixed location of juvenile nursery areas, the northward shift of females has 
most likely adversely affected the ability of these populations to supply young crabs 
to the southern end of their distribution in recent decades. At the same time, warm-
ing  ocean  temperatures  have  allowed  predators  of  young  crabs,  such  as  Pacific  cod, 
rock  sole,  and  skates,  to  shift  their  distributions  to  the  north.  So,  the  young  stages 
of  crab  not  only  have  to  deal  with  settlement  into  suboptimal  habitats,  but  they 
have to navigate the gauntlet of increased predation by groundfish. These two mech-
anisms may be leading reasons why crabs have generally faired poorly since the late 
1970s  regime  shift.  For  these  same  two  reasons,  crabs  may  continue  to  fair  poorly 
under  continued  global  warming.  On  the  other  hand,  groundfishes  like  pollock  and 
cod may continue to benefit. 

One  species  that  seems  to  have  benefited  greatly  from  conditions  since  the  late 
1970s  is  the  arrowtooth  flounder,  a  species  at  its  highest  recorded  levels  of  abun-
dance and still increasing. This species is a voracious predator that consumes large 
amounts  of  pollock,  cod,  and  other  commercially  valuable  groundfish  and  shellfish. 
Unfortunately,  the  flesh  of  the  arrowtooth  flounder  has  low  market  value  owing  to 
enzymes that degrade the flesh quality. So, future warm ocean conditions may con-
tinue  to  result  in  a  shift  from  commercially  valuable  species,  like  pollock  and  cod, 
to this species, which has low market value. 

Other predatory species that may increase in Alaska with continued global warm-
ing  include  seasonal  predators,  such  as  albacore  tuna.  This  species  would  provide 
new economic opportunities in Alaska, perhaps to the detriment of salmon fisheries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

40 

Restructuring of Ecosystems 

Earlier,  I  discussed  the  role  of  sea  ice  extent  on  funneling  energy  to  the  benthic 
ecosystem  (early  spring  bloom)  or  the  pelagic  ecosystem  (late  spring  bloom).  Al-
though the trend since the late 1970s has been toward a late spring bloom favoring 
pelagic  species  (such  as  pollock)  in  the  southeastern  Bering  Sea,  the  spring  bloom 
remains largely an ice-edge bloom in the northern Bering Sea, where the ecosystem 
remains  benthic  dominated  (e.g.,  clams).  This  benthic  production  is  essential  for  a 
number  of  charismatic  species,  such  as  walruses  and  spectacled  eiders  that  feed  on 
benthic  clams  and  other  bivalves.  All,  or  nearly  all,  of  the  world’s  populations  of 
spectacled  eiders  overwinter  in  a  small  area  between  St.  Lawrence  Island  and  St. 
Matthew  Island  in  the  eastern  Bering  Sea.  In  the  past  decade  with  an  increase  in 
air  and  ocean  temperatures  and  a  reduction  in  sea  ice,  there  has  been  a  reduction 
in  benthic  prey  populations  and  a  displacement  of  marine  mammals  (Grebmeier  et 
al., 2006). With a commensurate increase in pelagic fishes, the northern Bering Sea 
is  shifting  from  a  benthic  to  a  pelagic  ecosystem,  posing  risks  to  benthic  prey-de-
pendent  species  of  seabirds  and  marine  mammals.  This  benthic  to  pelagic  trend  is 
expected to increase and expand northward with continued global warming. 

Loss of sea ice in the Bering Sea is likely to have major impacts on ice-dependent 
marine  mammal  species,  such  as  ring  seals  and  bearded  seals.  Ring  seals  excavate 
caves  (lairs)  under  the  ice  in  which  they  raise  their  young  for  protection  from  the 
weather  and  predators.  Ring  and  bearded  seals  feed  on  a  variety  of  invertebrates 
and  fishes.  Both  seals  are  major  components  of  the  diet  of  polar  bears.  Polar  bears 
also have the capacity to kill larger prey, such as walruses, a species with seasonal 
migrations  also  tied  to  the  advance  and  retreat  of  sea  ice.  Therefore,  it  seems  very 
likely  that  the  loss  of  sea  ice  associated  with  global  warming  will  have  serious  im-
pacts on these ice-dependent marine mammals. 
Potential for Invasive Species 

An  additional  area  of  concern  under  global  warming  is  invasive  species.  With  in-
creasing  ocean  temperatures,  cold  thermal  barriers  to  warm-water  invasive  species 
may become removed. One key species of concern is the European green crab, a spe-
cies  that  is  native  to  the  North  and  Baltic  Seas.  Unintentionally  introduced  as  an 
invasive  species,  the  green  crab  has  consumed  up  to  50  percent  of  manila  clams  in 
California,  and  it  was  blamed  for  the  collapse  of  the  soft-shell  clam  industry  in 
Maine.  This  species  has  the  potential  to  alter  an  ecosystem  by  competing  with  na-
tive fish and seabirds. Its recent arrival on the U.S. west coast and potential to ex-
pand northward with global warming causes concerns for Alaska with respect to our 
Dungeness crab fishery and aquaculture farms for oysters and clams. 
Changes in Seasonal Production Cycle 

Increased temperatures may result in earlier stratification, perhaps advancing the 
timing  of  the  spring  bloom.  In  such  case,  the  continued  success  of  some  species  de-
pends upon their ability to spawn earlier so that their early life history stages con-
tinue  to  match  the  spring  bloom.  Additionally,  greater  heat  in  the  ocean  may  lead 
to prolonged summer-like conditions favorable to small phytoplankton that thrive in 
low  nutrient  conditions,  including  some  phytoplankton  species  that  produce  toxins, 
such  as  paralytic  shellfish  poisoning.  Food  chains  based  on  small  phytoplankton 
(typical  of  summer)  tend  to  be  less  productive  than  those  based  on  large 
phytoplankton  (typical  of  the  spring  bloom),  because  they  require  more  steps  of  en-
ergy  conversions  along  the  food  chain  to  support  upper  trophic  level  species,  such 
as  seabirds,  marine  mammals,  and  commercially  important  fish  including  cod  and 
halibut.  So  far,  this  seasonal  cycle  outlook  is  based  solely  upon  increased  tempera-
tures; other important considerations are the forecasted future changes in storm fre-
quency  and  intensity.  If  greater  storminess  in  the  Gulf  of  Alaska  and  Bering  Sea 
is  associated  with  global  warming,  then  the  increased  mixing  could  somewhat  com-
pensate  for  the  tendency  for  increased  stratification  caused  by  warmer  tempera-
tures, perhaps resulting in little change in the timing of the spring bloom. However, 
in  such  case,  given  the  temperature  control  of  the  rate  of  many  physiological  proc-
esses (including reproduction) of cold-blooded marine fish and invertebrates, a chal-
lenge  for  many  species  will  be  to  maintain  current  spawning  timing  despite  warm-
ing temperature conditions. 
Ocean Acidification 

As greenhouse emissions continue to increase, the ocean soaks up more and more 
CO2,  which  when  dissolved  in  water,  becomes  carbonic  acid.  Such  increases  lower 
the  pH  of  seawater,  causing  a  critical  concern  for  species  with  calcium  carbonate 
skeletons.  Preliminary  results  of  studies  in  Alaska  indicate  that  declining  seawater 
saturation  of  calcium  carbonate  induced  by  ocean  acidification  may  make  it  more 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

41 

difficult for larval blue king crabs to harden their shells (J. Short, NMFS, Auke Bay 
Laboratory, pers. comm.). Juvenile king crabs had substantially increased mortality, 
slower growth, and slightly less calcified shells when exposed to undersaturated sea-
water conditions projected for their rearing habitat within the coming century in the 
North  Pacific  Ocean.  These  preliminary  results  indicate  that  continued  increasing 
carbonation  of  the  ocean  surface  layer  as  a  result  of  increasing  atmospheric  CO2 
may directly affect recruitment of commercially important shellfish. Other witnesses 
on  this  panel  have  outstanding  expertise  on  ocean  acidification  and  will  speak  in 
much greater detail on this topic. 
Management and Economic Implications 

One  need  not  look  further  than  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery  in  2006  for  an  ex-
ample of the sort of management implications expected under global warming. Dur-
ing  the  B  (fall)  fishing  season,  pollock  were  farther  north  and  west  than  normal. 
Diesel fuel prices were high. The at-sea (factory trawler fleet) sector has the ability 
to  conduct  7–10  day  fishing  trips  and  a  byproduct  of  their  fish  harvests  is  fish  oil, 
which  they  burn  in  their  boilers  and  generators.  On  the  other  hand,  smaller  shore- 
based vessels only have capacity for 2–4 day trips and they cannot produce fish oil. 
The  northward  shift  of  pollock,  typical  of  expectations  under  global  warming,  had 
relatively small impact on the at-sea sector, but had significant adverse impacts on 
the  shore-based  fleet,  owing  to  reduced  access  to  the  resource  and  increased  oper-
ational  costs.  Under  northward  shifts  in  fish  resources,  the  shore-based  fleet  will 
need  to  shift  to  a  mothership-type  fishery  or  will  need  to  relocate  plants  in  new 
northern ports at greater investment of capital. 

Over  the  near  term,  the  NPFMC  is  currently  considering  management  actions 
with  respect  to  the  potential  northward  expansion  of  pelagic  and  other  fishery  re-
sources  into  the  northern  Bering  Sea  and  Arctic  Ocean.  One  major  problem  is  that 
current  surveys  do  not  extend  into  the  northern  Bering  Sea,  much  less  the  Arctic, 
so allowance of fisheries to follow the fish north would be conducted under increased 
uncertainty,  perhaps  at  greater  risk  to  previously  unexploited  benthic  resources, 
which  in  turn  could  place  sensitive  populations  of  marine  mammals  (e.g.,  walrus) 
and  seabirds  (e.g.,  spectacled  eider)  as  risk.  At  its  June  2007  meeting,  the  NPFMC 
is scheduled to take action on a proposal to define and mitigate essential fish habi-
tat  in  the  eastern  Bering  Sea  including  an  SSC  proposal  to  allow  fishing  in  the 
northern Bering Sea only under an experimentally designed study to test fishing im-
pacts upon which future decisions can be based. Over the longer term, the NPFMC 
is considering management options for the Arctic Ocean, perhaps under a new Arc-
tic  Fishery  Management  Plan.  Management  options  for  the  Arctic  are  constrained 
by  a  serious  lack  of  information  on  the  marine  fish  and  invertebrate  resources  in 
this region. The reliance of species of marine mammals and seabirds, as well as Na-
tive communities, on the living marine resources of these northern areas, heightens 
the gravity of management decisions for the Arctic Ocean. 

Long-term  forecasts  of  the  implications  of  global  warming  and  fisheries  manage-
ment  in  Alaska  are  highly  speculative,  given  present  levels  of  understanding.  Just 
as there was a reorganization of marine ecosystems after the regime shift of the late 
1970s, marine ecosystems off Alaska might be expected to reorganize again, perhaps 
to a new unobserved state, in response to a climate regime shift associated with con-
tinued global warming. If so, then a commensurate reorganization of the fishing in-
dustry is to be expected. Uncertainty increases as conditions (e.g., temperature, per-
cent sea ice cover) move outside the range of historical observations. Under science- 
based  management,  increasing  uncertainty  typically  translates  into  more  pre-
caution.  Thus,  more  precautionary  management  under  greater  uncertainty,  coupled 
to the increasing use of ecosystem-based fisheries management, will likely result in 
more conservative fish harvests in Alaska in the future. 
Data Gaps and Research Needs 

Predictions  of  future  changes  of  marine  ecosystems  for  the  Gulf  of  Alaska,  Aleu-
tian Islands, and eastern Bering Sea are uncertain, partly owing to gaps in our un-
derstanding  of  mechanisms  affecting  the  dynamics  of  living  marine  resources  and 
partly due to uncertainties in climate forecast models at the level of detail necessary 
for the Alaska region. A combination of improved monitoring, process-oriented stud-
ies,  modeling,  and  policy  development  are  recommended  to  improve  our  ability  to 
forecast and address likely future marine ecosystem changes in Alaska: 

• Arctic  baselines—very  few  data  are  available  on  the  abundance,  distribution, 
and  life  history  of  marine  species  in  the  northern  Bering  Sea  and  Arctic.  It  is 
critical at this time to establish baseline understanding of community structure 
and  function  before  the  Arctic  region  is  perturbed  by  human  impacts  and  cli-
mate change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

42 

• Integrated  Ocean  Observing  Systems—establishment  of  routine  observing  sys-
tems for physical and biological features of marine ecosystems off Alaska is es-
sential to monitoring the effects of global climate change. 

• Studies  of  physiology  and  life  history.  Models  only  go  so  far;  the  biology  and 
life  history  of  many  species  off  Alaska  are  poorly  known,  including  functional 
relationships  between  their  growth  and  survival  and  environmental  conditions. 
In order to understand the effects of global warming and human effects on these 
populations  and  associated  ecosystem  consequences,  it  is  essential  to  invest  in 
studies  of  basic  biology,  life  history,  and  physiology  of  poorly  studied  northern 
marine species. Physiological studies can reveal a great deal about the impacts 
of increasing temperature on the scope for growth and survival of northern spe-
cies. 

• Coupled climate-ecosystem and climate-fisheries forecasting models. It is imper-
ative to establish explicit linkages between climate forecast models and regional 
ecosystem and fishery models so that outlooks for changes in marine ecosystems 
and fisheries can be made more quantitative and less qualitative. In June 2007, 
PICES  will  convene  a  workshop  on  linking  climate  and  fisheries  forecasts,  but 
this  is  just  a  very  initial  step  in  a  process  that  will  require  substantial  efforts. 
• Ecosystem  approach  to  management.  Climate  change  is  just  one  of  a  suite  of 
both  human  and  naturally  occurring  factors  that  need  to  be  considered  in  the 
management  of  living  marine  resources.  Effective  management  of  marine  re-
sources off Alaska will become increasingly complex, given the uses of these re-
sources  by  coastal  Native  communities  and  higher  trophic  level  species  (e.g., 
birds and mammals). Potential for increased marine transportation and oil and 
gas exploration and development further heighten the need for an ecosystem ap-
proach to management. 

Thank you, Madam Chair, for the opportunity to speak to you and your committee 
today. I would be pleased to answer any questions you or other committee members 
may have. 
References 

Anderson,  P.J.,  and  J.F.  Piatt.  1999.  Community  reorganization  in  the  Gulf  of 
Alaska  following  ocean  climate  regime  shift.  Marine  Ecology  Progress  Series  189: 
117–123. 

Grebmeier, J.M., J.E. Overland, S.E. Moore, E.V. Farley, E.C. Carmack, L.W. Coo-
per,  K.E.  Frey,  J.H.  Helle,  F.A.  McLaughlin,  and  S.L.  McNutt.  2006.  A  major  eco-
system shift in the northern Bering Sea. Science 311: 1461–1464. 

Kocan, R., P. Hershberger, and J. Winton. 2003. Effects of Ichthyophonus on sur-
vival and reproductive success of Yukon River chinook salmon. U.S. Fish and Wild-
life Service, Office of Subsistence Management, Final Report 01–200. 

Kruse,  G.H.  1998.  Salmon  run  failures  in  1997–1998:  A  link  to  anomalous  ocean 

conditions? Alaska Fishery Research Bulletin 5(1): 55–63. 

Loher,  T.,  and  D.A.  Armstrong.  2005.  Historical  changes  in  the  abundance  and 
distribution  of  ovigerous  red  king  crabs  (Paralithodes  camtschaticus)  in  Bristol  Bay 
(Alaska),  and  potential  relationship  with  bottom  temperature.  Fisheries  Oceanog-
raphy 14: 292–306. 

NMFS  (National  Marine  Fisheries  Service).  2007.  Fisheries  of  the  United  States, 
2005.  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service,  Current  Fishery  Statistics  2005,  Silver 
Spring, MD. 

Orensanz, J., B. Ernst, D.A. Armstrong, P. Stabeno, and P. Livingston. 2004. Con-
traction of the geographic range of distribution of snow crab (Chionoecetes opilio) in 
the eastern Bering Sea: an environmental ratchet? CalCOFI Report 45: 65–79. 

Pew Oceans Commission. 2003. America’s living oceans: charting a course for sea 
change.  A  report  to  the  nation:  recommendations  for  a  new  ocean  policy.  Arlington, 
VA. 

Zheng,  J.,  and  G.H.  Kruse.  2006.  Recruitment  variation  of  eastern  Bering  Sea 
crabs:  climate  forcing  or  top-down  effects?  Progress  in  Oceanography  68:  184–204. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Dr. Kruse. 
Admiral  Watkins,  welcome.  Let  me  thank  you  again  for  your 
leadership on the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy, something this 
Committee  has  had  a  lot  of  involvement  with,  starting  with  Sen-
ator Hollings’ bill on the Oceans Policy Act, and my colleagues Sen-
ator  Stevens  and  Senator  Inouye  and  many  others  have  had  much 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

involvement  in  this.  We  are  glad  you  are  back  before  the  Com-
mittee. 

43 

STATEMENT OF JAMES D. WATKINS, ADMIRAL (RET.), 

U.S. NAVY; CHAIRMAN, U.S. COMMISSION ON OCEAN POLICY; 

CO-CHAIR, JOINT OCEAN COMMISSION INITIATIVE 

Admiral WATKINS. Thank you very much, Madam Chair and dis-
tinguished  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  for  inviting  me  to  par-
ticipate  in  today’s  hearing.  I  submitted  a  much  longer  statement 
for the record that I hope will be included therein. 

I  appear  before  you  today  representing  the  interests  of  the  U.S. 
Commission  on  Ocean  Policy,  as  well  as  the  Joint  Ocean  Commis-
sion  Initiative,  which  I  co-chair  with  Leon  Panetta.  As  you  know, 
he  was  Chair  of  the  Pew  Ocean  Commission,  a  privately-funded 
commission.  Because  we  were  not  doing  very  much  in  Washington 
toward  establishing  a  National  Ocean  Commission  Pew  decided  to 
go  ahead  anyway,  which  I  think  scared  the  Congress  and  they 
passed the Ocean Policy Act of 2000, which led to our commission. 
I  want  to  thank  you,  particularly  the  Senate,  for  the  work  that 

you have done to bring national visibility to the oceans. 

While  today’s  hearing  is  focused  primarily  on  the  issue  of  in-
creasing acidification of the oceans and the impact on living marine 
resources,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  come  and  speak  to  the 
broader  issue  of  the  role  oceans  play  in  climate  change  and  the 
need  to  pursue  strategies,  how  to  mitigate  and  adapt  to  these 
changes. 

As public awareness of climate change and its potential economic 
and  environmental  consequences  has  increased,  so  has  the  level  of 
urgency  to  take  action.  Unfortunately,  few  people  fully  appreciate 
the  fundamental  role  oceans  play  in  governing  climate  through 
their  immense  capacity  to  store  and  distribute  heat  and  their  part 
in the carbon cycle. I have never seen one article on climate change 
that ever mentions the oceans and I think it is a tragedy. They are 
the  first  victims  and  they  are  also  the  hope  for  mankind  to  come 
out of this and to adapt to it. 

We have global ocean circulation and heat flux models that clear-
ly  indicate  major  changes  are  under  way.  Yet  we  still  lack  a  clear 
understanding  of  the  underlying  dynamics  of  these  processes  and 
are  even  less  knowledgeable  about  activities  occurring  along  the 
highly dynamic coastal margins, where ecological and economic ac-
tivities  are  of  greatest  importance  to  humans  and  many  of  the  im-
pacts  of  climate  change,  such  as  sea  level  rise  and  coastal  storms, 
will be directly felt. 

Clearly,  a  more  coherent  strategy  is  needed,  and  a  core  element 
of  such  a  strategy  must  include  increased  attention  to  the  role  of 
the  oceans  and  impacts  on  ocean  resources.  Let  me  proceed  by  fo-
cusing  my  remarks  on  three  key  points  that  I  hope  my  written 
statement communicates. 

Congressional  leadership.  First,  our  oceans,  coasts,  and  Great 
Lakes  need  a  voice  and  strong  leadership  and  we  are  counting  on 
the  members  of  this  Committee  to  help  fill  this  role.  The  ocean 
community  is  in  the  process  of  a  major  organizational  transition, 
moving away from an outdated, highly structured, institutional ap-
proach  toward  an  integrated  process  that  more  closely  resembles 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

44 

the function of natural systems. We call that ecosystem-based man-
agement. 

This  transition  is  necessary  in  order  to  respond  to  the  host  of 
problems  impacting  the  ecological  health  and  economic  viability  of 
the oceans. These problems range from impacts associated with cli-
mate  change,  such  as  acidification,  sea  level  rise,  more  intense 
coastal storms, to degradation issues such as water pollution, habi-
tat loss, overfishing, and invasive species. 

The  problems  facing  the  oceans  are  too  large  and  too  varied  to 
continue  the  current  piecemeal  approach  to  management  and 
science.  It  will  take  leadership  and  vision  from  Members  of  Con-
gress  to  lay  the  foundation  for  a  transition  to  ecosystem-based 
management. It will be difficult and require some painful decisions, 
but  it  is  incumbent  upon  you  to  recognize  the  need  for  reform  and 
to  move  the  process  forward,  and  today’s  hearing  hopefully  is  a 
major step toward this objective. 

Governance  reform.  My  second  point  builds  squarely  on  the  con-
cerns  raised  in  my  first  point.  Governance  problems  in  the  oceans 
community  are  severely  limiting  the  oceans  community’s  capacity 
to provide the scientific information and management options need-
ed  by  Congress  to  make  critical  policy  decisions.  Given  the  oceans’ 
fundamental  role  in  climate  change,  this  weakness  in  the  ocean 
community  is  impacting  its  capacity  to  make  meaningful  contribu-
tions  toward  the  effort  to  understand  and  address  climate  change. 
We  need  a  new  governance  regime  within  the  Federal  Govern-
ment that moves away from the stove-piped, command and control 
organization  where  the  budget  process  often  discourages  inter- 
agency  cooperation.  The  Joint  Initiative  has  made  ocean  govern-
ance  reform  one  of  its  highest  priorities  and  the  urgency  of  this 
issue  has  only  escalated,  given  the  need  to  address  ocean-related 
science and management demands associated with climate change. 
We  must  focus  on  improving  our  capacity  to  more  accurately  as-
sess the processes influencing climate change and place greater at-
tention  on  designing  and  implementing  a  comprehensive  strategy 
that balances resources across the spectrum of scientific disciplines, 
that  is  physical,  chemical,  and  biological,  and  sectors,  that  is  re-
search,  monitoring,  and  modeling,  as  well  as  expand  support  for 
translating  this  data  into  information  that  will  allow  you,  Con-
gress,  to  establish  policies  aimed  at  meeting  the  goal  of  improving 
the resiliency of the coastal communities and ecosystem. 

My  final  point  is  straightforward:  The  time  to  act  is  now.  Leon 
and  I  are  committed  to  pursuing  the  implementation  of  the  two 
Commissions’ recommendations through establishment of the Joint 
Initiative because we feel strongly that a failure to respond to prob-
lems  facing  our  oceans  and  coasts  now  will  result  in  irreversible 
damage to our economy and environment. The urgency of the need 
for  action  is  further  highlighted  by  growing  concern  over  impacts 
associated with climate change and the ocean’s role in the process. 
A  much  more  comprehensive  and  robust  science  enterprise,  one 
that  includes  a  better  understanding  of  the  ocean’s  role  in  climate 
change, is required to more accurately predict the rate and implica-
tions  of  change  at  the  global  through  local  level,  as  well  as  to  en-
able  a  more  thorough  evaluation  of  options  for  mitigating  and  ac-
commodating this change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

45 

One of the first steps in the process of strengthening the science 
enterprise  should  be  a  commitment  to  building  a  comprehensive 
environmental monitoring system. Clearly, an integrated ocean ob-
serving system such as the one recommended in Senate 950, which 
is  cosponsored  by  many  members  of  this  Subcommittee,  should  be 
a key element of such a system. 

Yet  progress  toward  this  goal  is  limited  and  appears  to  be  mov-
ing  backward.  A  recent  NRC  study  out  of  the  National  Academies 
found  that  remote  sensing  satellite  programs  of  NASA  are  at  seri-
ous  risk  due  to  a  $500  million  decrease  in  funding  for  its  Earth 
Science  program  and  that  the  next  generation  of  satellites  on  the 
drawing  board  are  generally  less  capable  than  the  current,  rapidly 
diminishing system. 

This  situation  must  be  addressed  and  a  comprehensive  moni-
toring  system  that  includes  support  for  data  management  and 
analysis and modeling must be the core of a national strategy. 

I  will  conclude  by  noting  that  the  recent  elevation  of  concerns 
surrounding  climate  change  and  its  economic  and  environmental 
implications validate similar concerns voiced by the oceans commu-
nity  in  the  release  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  and 
Pew  Ocean  Commission  reports.  At  the  heart  of  the  matter  is  the 
need for a more robust science enterprise capable of advancing our 
understanding of the processes that drive our planet and guide the 
decisions  of  policymakers.  The  integration  across  agencies  and  sci-
entific  disciplines  can  only  occur  if  we  succeed  in  implementing  a 
new  governance  regime  that  facilitates  greater  collaboration,  in-
cluding resources and expertise outside of the Federal system. 

So  I  am  appealing  to  you  publicly,  as  Leon  and  I  have  done  in 
private,  to  take  up  the  mantle  of  governance  reform  in  the  ocean 
community.  It  is  the  critical  first  step  in  a  process  toward  realign-
ing and focusing the resources and energy of the ocean community 
toward  restoring  the  health  and  viability  of  our  oceans  and  coasts. 
I  can  assure  you  that  the  rewards  will  be  immense  and  enduring 
and will provide you with a lasting legacy. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear and I stand ready to an-

swer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Watkins follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES D.  WATKINS,  ADMIRAL (RET.),  U.S.  NAVY; 
CHAIRMAN,  U.S.  COMMISSION ON OCEAN POLICY;  CO-CHAIR,  JOINT OCEAN 
COMMISSION INITIATIVE 
Madame Chair, Senator Snowe and members of the Subcommittee: Thank you for 
the  invitation  to  testify  at  today’s  hearing.  I  appear  before  you  today  representing 
the  interests  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  as  well  as  the  Joint  Ocean 
Commission  Initiative,  which  I  co-chair  with  Leon  Panetta.  The  Joint  Initiative  is 
a  collaborative  effort  of  members  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  and  the 
Pew Oceans Commission. The purpose of the Joint Initiative is to advance the pace 
of change for meaningful ocean policy reform. 

Leon  and  I  believe  that  this  is  an  important  hearing  and  hopefully  is  the  first  of 
many hearings that will examine the fundamental role oceans play in global climate 
change,  as  well  as  the  impact  climate  change  is  having  on  our  oceans  and  coasts. 
We  trust  that  the  Members  of  the  Committee  will  work  closely  with  the  multitude 
of  other  congressional  committees  that  share  jurisdiction  over  climate  change  re-
lated  issues  and  will  champion  the  need  for  greater  attention  to  governance  needs 
and  the  commitment  of  resources  to  support  ocean-related  science,  management, 
and education. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

46 

Multi-jurisdictional  problems,  such  as  climate  change,  are  becoming  more  com-
mon. In the work of our commissions, we found almost the identical problem in the 
effort  to  deal  with  the  many  problems  facing  our  oceans,  coasts,  and  Great  Lakes. 
The  lack  of  governance  regimes  capable  of  reaching  across  the  diversity  of  congres-
sional  committees  and  Federal  agencies  is  severely  hampering  our  capacity  to  deal 
with  these  issues.  Thus,  while  I  understand  that  today’s  hearing  is  focused  on  the 
issue  of  the  increasing  acidification  of  the  oceans  and  the  impact  on  living  marine 
resources,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  the  broader  issue  of  the  role  of 
oceans  in  climate  change  and  the  importance  of  pursing  strategies  now  to  help 
coastal  communities  adapt  to  the  inevitable  changes  that  will  occur  in  the  coming 
years. 
Oceans Role in Climate Change 

As  public  awareness  of  climate  change  and  its  potential  economic  and  environ-
mental  consequences  has  increased,  so  has  the  level  of  urgency  to  take  action  to 
mitigate the causes of this change and to make preparations to adapt to its impacts. 
Unfortunately, few people fully appreciate the fundamental role oceans play in regu-
lating  climate  through  their  capacity  to  store  and  distribute  heat  and  their  role  in 
the carbon cycle. As a nation, we are even less knowledgeable about the ramification 
of  this  change  on  the  health  of  coastal  and  pelagic  ecosystems  and  their  capacity 
to  provide  the  services  upon  which  we’ve  come  to  rely.  This  lapse  has  resulted  in 
limited understanding of the complexity of ocean-related physical, geochemical, and 
biological/ecological processes that are influencing and being influenced by the ongo-
ing  change.  The  consequences  of  this  lack  of  knowledge  are  significant.  Policy-
makers struggle to evaluate alternatives to address climate change because the lev-
els  of  uncertainty  associated  with  the  short-  and  long-term  impacts  of  proposed  op-
tions are relatively high and the science underpinning these decisions is inadequate. 
Clearly,  a  more  coherent  strategy  is  needed  to  address  climate  change,  and  a  core 
element  of  such  a  strategy  must  include  increased  attention  to  the  role  of  the 
oceans. 

Oceans are key drivers in the Earth’s heat and carbon budgets, storing one thou-
sand times the heat of the atmosphere and absorbing a third of all anthropocentric 
carbon  dioxide  generated  over  the  last  few  centuries.  Furthermore,  oceans  not  only 
store heat, but transport it around the globe, as well as vertically through the water 
column  in  ocean  basins,  making  it  a  driving  force  of  climate  change.  While  our 
knowledge of physical oceanographic processes is further advanced than that of geo-
chemical  and  biological  processes,  it  is  still  rudimentary  due  to  the  lack  of  a  com-
prehensive monitoring regime. As a result, we have ocean circulation and heat flux 
models  that  clearly  indicate  major  changes  are  in  progress.  However,  we  still  lack 
a clear understanding of these processes on a global scale, and are even less knowl-
edgeable about activities occurring along the highly dynamic coastal margins, where 
ecological and economic health are of the greatest importance to humans and many 
of  the  impacts  of  climate  change—such  as  sea  level  rise  and  coastal  storms—will 
be directly felt. 

Further  complicating  the  situation  is  the  lack  of  understanding  of  the  inter-
relationship  among  the  physical,  geochemical,  and  biological  processes.  As  today’s 
hearing  clearly  demonstrates,  we  need  to  know  the  implications  of  ocean  acidifica-
tion  on  marine  ecosystems—such  as  phytoplankton  communities,  coral  reefs,  and 
fish larva. We also need to know the rate of ice sheet melt and its impact on coastal 
communities, polar ecosystems, and regional weather patterns. 

The complex relationship between oceans and climate change, as we currently un-
derstand it, cries out for reform in two core areas, governance and science. Congress 
must  respond  to  the  chorus  of  criticism  directed  at  the  lack  of  a  coherent  strategy 
and  framework  for  addressing  the  challenges  facing  our  oceans  and  coasts.  This 
strategy,  in  turn,  must  be  integrated  into  a  broader  national  initiative  to  deal  with 
climate  change.  It  is  incumbent  upon  Congress  to  take  this  opportunity  to  look  be-
yond  parochial  interests  and  issue-specific  legislation,  and  work  toward  a  govern-
ance  regime  and  management  policies  that  place  greater  emphasis  on  cooperation 
and  collaboration  within  the  Federal  Government,  while  capitalizing  on  the  wealth 
of scientific expertise and resources that reside outside the Federal system. 
Governance 

The  complexity  and  breadth  of  issues  associated  with  efforts  to  understand,  miti-
gate, and adapt to climate change make it essential that the Nation have a coherent 
and  comprehensive  strategy  to  guide  this  work.  This  is  a  daunting  challenge  given 
the multitude of governmental and nongovernmental entities that have a vested in-
terest  in  this  issue  and  its  long-term  impact  on  the  health  and  viability  of  the  na-
tion’s  economy  and  environment.  The  ocean  community  has  been  struggling  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

47 

this same problem, albeit on a slightly smaller scale. But the challenge remains the 
same,  we  need  a  new  Federal  governance  regime  that  moves  away  from  the  stove- 
piped,  command  and  control  organization  in  which  individual  departments  and 
agencies formulate policies and budgets that are reviewed by the Office of Manage-
ment and Budget and then sent to Congress for a similar review by the appropriate 
committee  of  jurisdiction.  While  there  is  a  continuing  effort  to  integrate  programs 
and activities, it is the exception not the rule. In addition, the budget process often 
discourages interagency cooperation as funding for multi-agency programs is subject 
to cuts or reductions during internal agencies budget negotiations, compromising the 
integrity  of  the  broader  strategy  and  promoting  further  competition  among  Federal 
and non-governmental players. 

But  don’t  take  my  word  for  it.  There  are  a  number  of  credible  entities  that  have 
recognized that governance problems are impeding the Nation’s capacity to respond 
to  some  of  its  most  pressing  challenges  and  have  recommended  solutions.  Earlier 
this  spring  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  responded  to  a  request  from  the 
White House Climate Change Science Program to identify lessons learned from past 
global change assessments. In its report, the NRC cited the lack of a long-term stra-
tegic  framework  for  meeting  the  climate  change  research  mandate  as  an  out-
standing weakness of the current system.1 

Testimony  by  former  administration  officials  who  oversaw  the  climate  change  re-
search program reiterated these concerns last Thursday in a hearing before a House 
Energy and Commerce Subcommittee, where recommendations were made to estab-
lish a program office with a sense of permanence, the political power to make deci-
sions  across  agencies,  and  the  authority  over  budgets.2 These  recommendations 
closely track those made by the two ocean commissions, which advocated for a new 
management regime, based in the Executive Office of the President that would have 
the  authority  to  coordinate  efforts  and  guide  the  distribution  of  resources  through-
out  the  Federal  Government  in  an  integrated  system  that  reached  across  jurisdic-
tional boundaries of individual agencies. 

Such a vision was partially implemented in the ocean community when the Presi-
dent established the Committee on Ocean Policy (COP). However, the COP’s charge 
is  limited  to  coordination.  It  lacks  institutional  independence  and  a  leader  charged 
with  resolving  interagency  disputes  and  representing  the  interest  of  individual 
agency  ocean  programs  in  the  budget  process.  Consequently,  efforts  to  move  a  new 
national  ocean  policy  forward  have  languished  and  the  ocean  community’s  capacity 
to contribute toward the scientific and management needs to address climate change 
have been compromised. 

Similar  problems  exists  in  Congress,  where  cross-cutting  issues  such  as  oceans 
and  climate  fall  under  the  jurisdiction  of  multiple  committees  and  subcommittees. 
Take the case of ocean acidification. The Commerce Committee clearly has jurisdic-
tion;  however,  the  Environment  and  Public  Works  Committee  has  authority  over 
water  pollution  and  water  quality  issues,  the  Energy  and  Natural  Resources  Com-
mittee  has  a  role  regarding  emissions  from  energy  facilities,  which  are  a  major 
source  of  CO2,  and  the  Committee  on  Appropriations  funds  authorized  activities. 
The  same  diversity  of  oversight  authority  exists  in  the  House,  significantly  compli-
cating efforts to develop a comprehensive strategy to address climate change. In the 
108th Congress, the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy identified a total of 58 stand-
ing  committees  and  subcommittees  having  jurisdiction  over  ocean-related  issues  in 
the  House  and  Senate.3 An  early  assessment  of  the  110th  Congress  shows  little 
change or consolidation. 

Further evidence of support for a more coherent approach to science-related policy 
issues  is  reflected  in  the  growing  interest  in  reestablishing  an  Office  of  Technology 
Assessment  (OTA).  OTA  was  a  congressional  office  charged  with  providing  non-
partisan  research  on  technical  and  scientific  issues  pending  before  Congress,  but 
was closed in 1995. As Congress struggles with increasingly sophisticated and com-
plex technical issues such as biomedical research and climate change, an entity such 
as  OTA  can  provide  timely  and  issue  specific  guidance  that  would  complement  the 
more  exhaustive,  costly  and  time  consuming  review  process  performed  by  the  Na-
tional  Academies.  Congress  relies  on  credible  and  readily  available  information  to 
make  informed  policy  decisions.  Right  now,  the  lack  of  information  on  oceans  and 
coasts,  or  a  clear  strategy  for  collecting  and  translating  this  information  into  prod-

1 Analysis  of  Global  change  Assessments:  Lesson  Learned.  National  Research  Council  2007. 
2 Hearing before the House Science and Technology Committee, Subcommittee on Energy and 
the Environment; Reorienting the U.S. Global Change Research Program Toward a User-Driven 
Research  Endeavor.  http://science.house.gov/publications/hearingslmarkupsldetails.aspx? 
NewsID=1798 May 3, 2007. 

3 U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy, Appendix F. 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

48 

ucts and services useful to decisionmakers and managers, is hobbling Congress’ abil-
ity to perform its role. 

Thus, the focus must turn to improving our capacity to more accurately assess the 
processes  and  phenomena  influencing  climate  change  and  society’s  impact  on  such 
processes  and  phenomena.  This  will  require  much  greater  attention  and  support 
being devoted to the broader problem of designing and implementing a strategy that 
balances resources among basic and applied research, monitoring and analysis, and 
modeling.  This  strategy  must  also  be  expanded  to  incorporate  support  for  trans-
lating  and  utilizing  this  information  to  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  mitigation,  ad-
aptation,  and  other  management  actions  aimed  at  meeting  the  goals  of  increasing 
the resiliency of coastal communities and ecosystems. 

Given  the  complexity  and  interdisciplinary  nature  of  the  issues  surrounding  cli-
mate change, progress toward these goals will require changes in the operation and 
coordination of Federal agencies and the Federal budget process. The National Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  is  the  logical  lead  Federal  agency  to 
oversee the climate change science program; however, public and private confidence 
in  the  agency  is  lacking.  This  is  due,  in  great  part,  to  the  outdated  organizational 
structure  of  the  agency  and  the  lack  of  resources  that  have  been  provided  to  fulfill 
its  expanding  mandate.  The  opportunity  is  ripe  to  reevaluate  and  realign  NOAA’s 
programs  along  its  core  functions,  which  include:  assessment,  prediction  and  oper-
ations;  scientific  research  and  education;  and  marine  resource  and  area  manage-
ment.  This  step,  taken  in  combination  with  an  effort  to  enhance  the  oversight  role 
of the President’s Committee on Ocean Policy, would lay the foundation for a major 
transition in the ocean and atmospheric policy that would be of enormous long-term 
benefit to Congress and the public. 

Congress should also take advantage of this opportunity to address science agency 
mission and funding inconsistencies that are hampering the collection and synthesis 
of  long-term  data  measurements.  While  NASA  and  NSF  are  charged  with  devel-
oping new approaches to collecting, analyzing, and integrating data, NOAA has the 
charge—but lacks the technical expertise and fiscal resources—to maintain increas-
ingly  important  remote  and  in  situ  observation  platforms  capable  of  sustained  data 
collection  (the  compilation  of  long-term  data  sets).  These  long-term  data  sets  are 
crucial to understanding the rate of change over an extended period. Further exacer-
bating the situation is a disjointed data management system that is preventing sci-
entists from fully utilizing data that are currently being collected. Given the consoli-
dation  of  science  agencies  (NOAA,  NASA,  and  NSF)  responsible  for  ocean  and  at-
mospheric research under the jurisdiction of the Commerce Committee and its sister 
appropriations  subcommittee,  the  opportunity  exists  to  more  closely  link  their  com-
plementary  programs  through  both  the  authorization  and  appropriations  processes. 
While this proposal may disturb many of those in the community who have a vested 
interest in programs associated with the individual agencies, in the long-term their 
collaboration is essential if our Nation is to succeed in making progress toward un-
derstanding and responding to climate change while also restoring the health of our 
oceans and coasts. 

Clearly,  a  careful  reevaluation  of  the  governance  regime  guiding  climate  and 
ocean-related  science  and  management  programs  is  needed  to  overcome  the  obsta-
cles that are currently hampering efforts to develop a comprehensive response to cli-
mate  change.  Whatever  action  Congress  takes,  it  should  look  beyond  the  current 
models and existing organizational structure to ensure that both ocean and climate 
change  programs  are  broad-based  and  charged  with  developing  a  balanced  strategy 
that incorporates science, management and outreach. Anything less will perpetuate 
an  approach  that  has  proven  to  be  ineffective  and  is  now  jeopardizing  the  health 
and welfare of current and future generations. 
Science 

Credible scientific information is essential as the Nation begins the process of de-
veloping  a  new  regime  to  mitigate  and  adapt  to  climate  change.  Better  science, 
when  linked  with  improved  risk  management  and  adaptive  management  strategies 
will  help  guide  a  process  that  must  deal  with  the  relatively  high  levels  of  uncer-
tainty surrounding mitigation alternatives and the range of impacts associated with 
climate  change.  A  much  more  comprehensive  and  robust  science  enterprise—one 
that  incorporates  a  better  understanding  of  the  oceans’  role  in  climate  change—is 
required to more accurately predict the rate and implications of change at the glob-
al-through-local  level,  as  well  as  to  enable  more  thorough  evaluation  of  options  for 
mitigating and accommodating this change. 

While  the  United  States  is  making  a  significant  financial  commitment  to  under-
standing  climate  change,  the  inadequacy  of  the  current  strategy  has  become  clear 
and  reform  is  urgently  needed.  Research  that  has  been  primarily  focused  on  phys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

49 

ical science and validation of climate change must expand to incorporate greater at-
tention  to  the  role  and  contributions  of  biogeochemical  and  ecological  processes,  as 
well  as  interactions  among  these  three  processes.  This  will  require  a  significant 
commitment  of  new  resources  and  will  increase  the  complexity  of  the  science  strat-
egy to understand and respond to climate change. However, these actions cannot be 
avoided  if  the  science  community  is  going  to  be  responsive  to  Congress’  need  for 
credible scientific information to guide its decisionmaking process. 

One  of  the  first  steps  should  be  a  commitment  to  building  a  comprehensive  envi-
ronmental  monitoring  system.  We  are  supposedly  well  on  our  way  to  fulfilling  our 
international commitment to support climate observing systems—which according to 
the most recent report from the Climate Change Science Program is over 50 percent 
complete.  However,  support  for  this  system  is  in  trouble,  which  is  compounded  by 
the  fact  that  considerably  fewer  resources  are  dedicated  to  supporting  an  ocean-fo-
cused  component  of  the  observing  system.  A  recent  NRC  study  found  that  remote 
sensing  satellite  programs  in  NASA  are  at  great  risk  and  that  the  next  generation 
of  satellites  is  generally  less  capable  than  the  current,  rapidly  diminishing  system. 
Projected  budgets  show  U.S.  investment  in  these  capabilities  falling  by  2012  to  its 
lowest  level  in  two  decades.4 Support  for  a  dedicated  ocean  observing  program  ap-
peared in the President’s budget for the first time this year, at the level of $16 mil-
lion, a fraction of what Congress has been providing in recent years. 

As  a  consequence  our  knowledge  of  physical  ocean-related  processes  is  limited, 
and  our  capacity  to  understand  biogeochemical  and  ecological  processes  languishes 
due  to  the  lack  of  capacity  to  study,  much  less  monitor  and  model  these  systems 
and  their  responses  to  change.  The  expert  scientific  witnesses  appearing  before  the 
Subcommittee today have testified to this fact, presenting us with quantifiable data 
that  humans  have  contributed  to  the  increased  acidification  of  the  oceans  and  that 
there  are  very  real  and  potentially  damaging  consequences  associated  with  this 
change. Yet, the ocean scientific community does not have access to funding to sup-
port large-scale field experiments, study environments that are naturally more acid-
ic,  or  more  fully  examine  the  geologic  record  to  understand  past  events  that  may 
have resulted in similar conditions. 

It  is  now  obvious  that  enhanced  and  integrated  observing  systems  are  a  key  ele-
ment underlying a robust ocean and climate science strategy. From a research per-
spective  this  need  was  clearly  articulated  in  the  release  of  the  Administration’s 
Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy  in  January,  in  which 
the deployment of a robust ocean-observing system was highlighted as a critical ele-
ment  of  the  plan.  Such  an  observing  system  will  require  a  commitment  to  deploy 
and  maintain  infrastructure  and  instrumentation,  such  as  satellites,  research  ves-
sels,  buoys,  cabled  underwater  observatories,  and  data  management  networks.  A 
sustained,  national  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS),  backed  by  a  com-
prehensive research and development program, will provide invaluable economic, so-
cietal,  and  environmental  benefits,  including  improved  warnings  of  coastal  and 
health  hazards,  more  efficient  use  of  living  and  nonliving  resources,  safer  marine 
operations, and a better understanding of climate change. However, the value of this 
system  will  be  fully  realized  only  if  an  adequate  financial  commitment  is  also  pro-
vided to support integrated, multidisciplinary scientific analysis and modeling using 
the  data  collected,  including  socioeconomic  impacts.  Unfortunately,  support  for  the 
lab  and  land-based  analysis  of  the  data  derived  from  these  systems  is  often  inad-
equate,  diminishing  the  value  of  these  programs,  while  support  for  socioeconomic 
analysis is virtually nonexistent. 

The  lack  of  a  comprehensive  climate  change  response  strategy  and  supporting 
governance  regime  that  integrates  fundamental  research  and  development,  moni-
toring and analysis, and modeling efforts is a major weakness in our national effort. 
It  must  be  immediately  addressed  to  ensure  that  policymakers  have  the  scientific 
information necessary to guide their deliberation regarding both mitigation and ad-
aptation strategies. Congress should develop legislation, perhaps with guidance from 
the  National  Research  Council,  requiring  the  development  of  a  comprehensive 
science strategy that incorporates support for ocean-related sciences with a focus on 
enhancing  the  predictive  capacity  of  physical  and  ecological  models.  This  advance-
ment is necessary to provide policymakers and the public with the information nec-
essary to make informed decisions regarding the collateral impact of potential miti-
gation  strategies—such  as  carbon  sequestration  in  or  under  the  oceans  or  biofuel 
production that results in increased runoff of agricultural pollutants into coastal wa-
tersheds—and  strategies  for  increasing  the  resiliency  of  coastal  communities  and 
marine ecosystems to climate generated impacts. 

4 Earth Science and Applications for Space: National imperatives for the Next Decade and Be-

yond, NRC 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

Conclusion 

50 

The  recent  elevation  of  national  conversation  surrounding  climate  change  and  its 
economic  and  environmental  implications  validate  similar  discussions  voiced  by  the 
ocean community upon the release of the U.S. Commission and Pew Commission re-
ports.  At  the  heart  of  the  matter  is  the  need  for  more  a  robust  science  enterprise 
capable  of  advancing  our  understanding  of  the  processes  that  drive  our  planet  and 
can  better  guide  the  decisions  of  policymakers.  The  integration  across  agencies  and 
scientific  disciplines,  with  a  focus  of  developing  products  and  services  useful  to  pol-
icymakers  and  the  public,  will  only  occur  if  we  succeed  in  implementing  and  inte-
grating new governance regimes for climate change and ocean policy that facilitates 
greater  collaboration,  including  resources  and  expertise  outside  of  the  Federal  sys-
tem. 

This  transition  must  be  well  thought  out  and  deliberate,  perhaps  pursuing  a 
phased  approach  such  as  that  recommended  in  the  U.S.  Commission  report.  In  it, 
we recommended that the initial focus be on strengthening NOAA, followed by a re-
alignment and consolidation of ocean programs that are widely distributed through-
out  the  Federal  Government.  The  final  phase  would  be  the  consolidation  of  natural 
resource  oriented  programs  under  a  single  agency.  This  approach  responds  to  the 
recommendation  of  the  Volker  Commission,  which  identified  the  proliferation  and 
distribution  of  agencies  and  programs  throughout  the  Federal  Government  as  a 
major hindrance to efficiency and effectiveness of the Federal system.5 

I  am  appealing  to  you  publicly,  as  Leon  and  I  have  done  in  private  to  many  of 
you,  to  take  up  the  mantle  of  governance  reform  in  the  ocean  community.  It  is  the 
critical  first  step  in  the  process  toward  realigning  and  focusing  the  resources  and 
energy  of  the  ocean  community  toward  restoring  the  health  and  viability  of  our 
oceans  and  coasts.  I  understand  it  will  be  difficult,  but  increased  public  awareness 
and concern about the health of the environment has provided us with a unique and 
timely opportunity to leave a lasting legacy, one we can appreciate when sitting on 
a  beach—free  of  closure  and  swimming  advisory  signs—on  a  sunny  summer  after-
noon  with  our  children  or  grandchildren  while  looking  out  over  the  horizon  of  a 
sparkling blue sea. 

Madame  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity 
to  appear  before  you  today,  and  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  address  the 
ocean  and  coastal  issues  raised  in  this  hearing.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any 
questions that you may have. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Admiral Watkins. Thank you for 

your, as I said earlier, ongoing advocacy in this area. 

We  will  start  now  with  a  round  of  5-minute  questions  from  my 
colleagues.  I  will  start  off  with  Dr.  Feely  if  I  could,  asking  you  a 
question  about  this  experience  of  acidification  that  we  are  in  now. 
Obviously,  we  have  had  other  experiences  in  the  past  on  ocean 
acidification. 

We obviously—I do not know if you are anticipating my question. 
[Laughter.] 
Dr. FEELY. If that is the question, I have a slide for you. 
Senator CANTWELL. I did not know I was going to ask this ques-
tion.  But  we  obviously  have  had  time  periods  before  between  gla-
cial  and  inter-glacial  periods  when  we  have  had  acidification.  So 
what is different now? That is my first question. If you have a slide 
for that I am going to be very surprised. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. FEELY. Actually, no. In the past, through the geological past, 
the CO2 levels have been much higher than we have seen now, per-
haps  20  million  years  ago  or  even  farther  back.  The  difference  is 
that the organisms that are responding to the acidification respond 
to  the  saturation  state  of  sea  water,  which  is  a  combination  of  the 
CO2 concentrations  and  the  pH  change  and  the  calcium  changes. 

5 National  Commission  on  the  Public  Service:  Urgent  Business  for  America:  Revitalizing  the 
the  21st  Century  http://www.brookings.edu/gs/cps/volcker/ 

for 

Federal  Government 
volckerlhp.htm 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

51 

It turns out that in our present condition calcium concentrations 
are lower than they have ever been in geological history. So there-
fore the saturation state that we are looking at occurring in the fu-
ture  is  going  to  be  lower  than  has  ever  been  observed  in  the  geo-
logical  past.  This  is  being  influenced  directly  by  the  CO2 increases 
that we are observing. 

So these ecosystems will be looking at a lowered saturation state 
that  has  not  been  observed  through  the  entire  history  of  the 
oceans. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  how  should  we  look  at  the  corrective  na-
ture of things in the context if we were able to reduce CO2 emission 
now  how  long  would  it  take  to  have  an  impact?  How  do  we  look 
at  the  time  period  if  we  continue  for  another  10  years  at  the  level 
of  CO2 emissions?  We  have  heard  from  Dr.  Hansen  and  Admiral 
Watkins  about  various  adaptive  or  ecosystem  approaches.  How  do 
we look at what we can do to correct this current trend? 

Dr.  FEELY.  That  is  very  difficult  to  answer,  particularly  because 
we  do  not  have  a  lot  of  information  on  what  the  biological  tipping 
points  are  for  these  individual  species.  We  do  for  a  select  few  spe-
cies that have been studied in mesocosm experiments under labora-
tory and bag experiments in the field. These tipping points suggest 
that by the middle of this century the coral reef systems will be se-
verely impacted by the increasing CO2 levels in the oceans. 

The concern that we have is in the ocean itself, the reefs are not 
only  influenced  by  these  simple  relationships  that  we  just  deter-
mined  in  the  laboratory,  but  also  other  impacts  such  as  erosion, 
storm  effects,  and  perhaps  the  tipping  points  that  we  measure  in 
the  laboratory  do  not  show  and  represent  what  the  organisms  see 
in the field. 

So  what  we  dearly  need  is  experiments  that  occur  in  the  field 
that are representative of field conditions, as well as continuing ex-
periments  in  the  laboratory.  Our  best  projections  right  now  are 
that  for  coral  reef  systems  we  may  be  seeing  severe  impacts  as 
soon as 2050 or earlier. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Dr.  Kruse,  how  do  you  as  an  expert  in  fish-
eries management, how do you deal with this information? I mean, 
are  you  working  into,  with  salmon  or  Bering  Sea  species,  are  you 
working  factors  of  climate  change  and  acidification  into  the  man-
agement  plans  for  fisheries?  How  do  you  address  that  if,  as  Dr. 
Feely  says,  we  do  not  have  all  the  data,  but  we  know  that  we  are 
starting to see impact? 

Dr.  KRUSE.  Thank  you  for  your  question.  In  the  North  Pacific 
Fishery  Management  Council,  we  are  making  some  really  pretty 
good  progress  to  incorporate  climate  variability  into  fish  stock  as-
sessments  and  fishery  management.  One  of  the  ways  that  sci-
entists  are  doing  that,  for  example,  is  they  have  found  that  the 
catchability  of  the  trawl  used  to  survey  of  certain  species  is  very 
highly  dependent  on  temperature.  So  they  have  done  experimen-
tation both in the field, but also modeling studies, that have identi-
fied the nature of that relationship. So they are incorporating that 
into stock assessments. 

Also, with the Bering Sea pollock, which is probably the best as-
sessed fish stock that we have in our system, there has really been 
some excellent studies relating the dynamics of that particular pop-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

52 

ulation  to  temperature  and  sea  ice  dynamics.  So  those  are  finding 
their ways into the management strategies. 

Admittedly,  we  are  really  early  on  the  curve  of  doing  this.  In 
fact, soon there will be a workshop to address these issues. I chair 
the  Fisheries  Science  Committee  for  the  PICES,  the  North  Pacific 
Marine Science Organization. A subgroup of us are having a work-
shop in Seattle in July 2007 with our international Pacific Rim col-
leagues  to  see  how  we  can  better  make  these  connections  between 
climate  and  our  fish  assessment  models  and  our  management 
strategies. 

So  we  are  making  some  progress,  but  certainly  there  is  a  lot 

more work to be done. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  applaud  the  North  Pacific  Fishery 
Management  Council  for  its  leadership  in  this  area.  I  think  in  the 
past  you  have  showed  great  stewardship  on  environmental  issues, 
so  I  applaud  that,  even  though  it  seems  challenging  at  this  point 
in time. 

Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Mr.  Doney,  I  am  informed  that  the  Pacific  Decadal  Oscillation 
has  shifted  every  20  to  30  years  and  that  if  we  look  at  the  past 
there  were  temperature  observations  that  the  ocean  cooled  from 
2003  to  2006,  but  over  the  past  40  years  that  the  average  of  all 
those  has  been  that  the  warming  trend  has  resulted  in  a  .04  de-
grees  change  Centigrade.  Do  you  agree  with  that?  The  increase  in 
the temperature of the oceans has been .04 degrees Centigrade? 

Dr. DONEY. Senator, I think that is a reasonable estimate of the 
volume  average  change.  That  is  actually  a  rather  large  number. 
The heat capacity of the ocean is several thousand times that of the 
atmosphere, and the numbers, the back of the envelope calculation, 
is  that  if  the  integrated  global  average  temperature  of  the  ocean 
went  up  by  .1  degrees  it  would  be  equivalent  to  the  atmosphere 
going up by 100 degrees. 

So you have to think about it in the context—— 
Senator STEVENS. That is in terms of stored heat. 
Dr. DONEY. That is in stored heat. 
Senator  STEVENS.  I  understand  that.  But  in  terms  of  the  tem-
perature, the implication of your testimony was there has been this 
overwhelming  rise  in  the  temperature  of  the  oceans.  Is  that  your 
position? 

Dr. DONEY. The surface temperature has been going up about .2 
degrees  per  decade  over  the  last  30  years,  and  if  you  look  at  the 
full  water  column  much  of  the  heating  is  occurring  at  the  surface. 
As  you  go  down  the  water  column,  the  heating  rates  are  smaller, 
but they are quite large relative to the natural background. 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  disagree  with  that  figure  that  I  just  gave 

you, then, that the average for 40 years is .04? 

Dr. DONEY. I think it is .04 degrees Celsius over the 40 year pe-
riod.  That  is  actually  quite  a  large  number,  considering  the  rates 
that the ocean heats and cools naturally. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Do  you  agree  or  disagree,  doctor?  Is  that  a 

Dr. DONEY. I would have to check my numbers, but I think that 

proper figure? 

is a reasonable estimate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

53 

Senator STEVENS. I have been told that we are ending the Little 
Ice Age, that this period we are seeing right now is a return to the 
normal  situation  at  the  beginning  of  that  Little  Ice  Age.  Do  you 
disagree with that? 

Dr. DONEY. I do think the paleoclimate data suggest that the cur-
rent  temperatures  are  much  higher  than  the  temperatures  that 
were  existing  before  the  Little  Ice  Age.  These  are  records  that  are 
based  on,  for  example,  tree  ring  records  and  isotope  records.  The 
best  estimates  of  the  climate  over  the  last  thousand  years  show 
that the 50-year period we are in now is warmer than at any time 
in the last 1,000 years. 

Senator  STEVENS.  How  long  do  you  think  the  Little  Ice  Age 

Dr.  DONEY.  The  Little  Ice  Age  was  a  couple  hundred  years.  So 
we  are  certainly  experiencing  much  warmer  climate  than  existed 
prior to the Little Ice Age. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Would  you  check  that,  please,  because  that  is 

lasted? 

not my information. 

Dr. DONEY. I can check that for you, sir. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Let  me  ask  Admiral  Watkins.  I  think  I  agree 
with  everything  you  said.  The  difficulty  is  the  funding.  Since  2001 
the Congress and this administration has allocated $29 billion just 
to  climate-related  science  alone.  There  may  be  some  question  of 
whether  those  funds  were  spent  effectively,  but  that  is  a  massive 
increase over the previous 6 year period. 

How much more do you think we need to have? 
Admiral WATKINS. Senator, last year we worked with the staff up 
here  and  members  to  deliver  the  answer  to  some  questions  raised 
by the Senate, and I think you were a co-signer on that letter. 

Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Admiral WATKINS. We worked very hard on that to come up with 
what  do  you  need,  what  are  we  talking  about  here?  We  came  up 
in  that  report,  ‘‘From  Sea  to  Shining  Sea,’’  that  the  Senate  acted 
on  last  year,  at  least  in  one  case,  and  that  was  Magnuson-Stevens 
Reauthorization  Act.  That  was  a  good  product  that  came  out  of 
that. 

That was the Senate. You had to push it through the House. We 
have  not  had  any  support  from  the  House  on  funding.  In  fact,  the 
Senate has had to restore every year for the last 5 years significant 
cuts  by  House  Appropriations,  coming  over  here  with  NOAA  get-
ting a $500 million cut, and you have had to restore it all. 

So  we  have  spent  all  our  time  restoring  to  status  quo.  And  our 
report said status quo ain’t good enough. We have got to start mak-
ing the investment in science. We have got to start getting serious 
about  organization  and  structural  changes  of  how  we  deal  with  an 
ecosystem-based approach that cuts across jurisdictional lines both 
in  the  White  House  and  up  here  and  in  the  states.  And  we  still 
have not done anything. So it has been 3 years now. 

So I am just saying I count on the Senate because the Senate has 
been  the  only  receptive  body,  and  we  have  not  put  enough  money 
in.  We  said  $750  million  over  2007  appropriated  is  the  right 
kickstart, and to do that for the next 4 or 5 years to try to buildup 
to about $13 billion—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

54 

Senator STEVENS. I wanted that in the record. $750 million, if we 

had that increase by that amount over 5 years—— 

Admiral  WATKINS.—over  5  years  that  would  do  everything  we 
recommended  in  our  report,  and  that  would  include  the  climate 
change issue. 

Senator STEVENS. Madam Chairman, I have a conflict. May I ask 

one more question? 

Senator CANTWELL. Yes. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Dr.  Kruse,  I  do  appreciate  your  coming,  as  I 
indicated.  I  want  to  know  this.  I  am  told,  and  as  a  matter  of  fact 
you said in your own testimony here today that is printed, that the 
North Pacific temperatures warmed between 1920 and 1940. Do we 
have  any  records  to  show  what  happened  to  king  crab  and  other 
species during that time? Did they shift northward during that pe-
riod,  that  20  years  of  warming?  Can  we  show—when  the  tempera-
ture went down, were they restored naturally? 

Dr.  KRUSE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Stevens,  for  your  question.  That 
is  really  an  excellent  question.  Unfortunately,  as  we  go  back  in 
time  we  find  we  just  do  not  have  the  routine  stock  assessments 
that  we  have  now.  For  example,  in  the  Bering  Sea  the  very  first 
National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  bottom  trawl  survey  started,  I 
believe  it  was  1969,  and  it  was  in  a  small  area  of  Bristol  Bay,  fo-
cusing on Bristol Bay red king crab. 

Likewise in the Gulf of Alaska, most of our surveys started in the 
1980s  or  maybe  in  the  1970s.  So  we  do  not  have  the  fishery-inde-
pendent  information  to  really  objectively  look  at  that  question.  If 
you  look  at  fisheries  data,  you  always  have  to  be  careful  because 
catch  rates  can  be  affected  by  fishing  practices  and  there  may  not 
be a direct reflection to what the populations are doing. 

In  the  Kodiak  area,  for  example,  those  fisheries  did  not  begin 
until  the  late  1950s  and  really  got  under  way  in  the  1960s.  King 
crab  catches  peaked  in  1965.  So  we  just  did  not  have  observations 
prior to that time. 

There were, however, some fishermen who were fishing for other 
species  who  claim  that  in  the  earlier  time  period  it  was  very  rare 
to find king crab. So it is anecdotal information that lends support 
that crab populations were down. 

Senator STEVENS. Did those peaks follow the temperature curve, 
is  what  I  am  getting  at?  Have  they  followed  the  temperature 
curve?  There  seems  to  be  a  20  year  up  and  20  year  down  in  the 
North  Pacific.  Have  the  peaks  in  our  species  followed  that  curve? 
Dr.  KRUSE.  The  short  answer  is  some  of  them  do  and  some  of 
them  don’t.  I  spend  a  lot  of  time  with  colleagues  examining  crab 
population dynamics and some crab populations seem to be related 
to temperature signals. The northern shrimp that had supported a 
big  fishery  in  Alaska  is  more  clearly  related  to  temperature,  par-
ticularly in the North Atlantic. But it is difficult to simply connect 
temperature  to  king  crab  population  dynamics.  It  is  much  more 
complicated. 

Senator STEVENS. I thank you. I have overstayed my leave. I saw 
a  chart  just  recently  that  showed  that  the  CO2 spike  was  very 
small  compared  to  the  spike  in  methane.  We  have  now  got  enor-
mous  amounts  of  methane  being  released  from  the  permafrost  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

55 

Russia and in the Arctic. Has anyone examined this? Is that going 
to affect the oceans at all as the methane continues to increase? 

Dr. KRUSE. I have not done that. It is not my area. 
Dr.  DONEY.  I  will  take  a  shot  at  that.  Molecule  for  molecule, 
methane  is  about  20  times  or  30  times  more  potent  as  a  green-
house gas than CO2. 

Senator STEVENS. Why have we not measured that, then? 
Dr.  DONEY.  Actually,  there  is  a  global  network  that  NOAA  is 
part  of  that  measures  methane,  and  there  are  actually  quite  good 
measurements. 

Senator STEVENS. I mean in relation to the oceans. 
Dr.  DONEY.  The  effect  of  methane  on  the  oceans  is,  as  I  men-
tioned  in  my  testimony,  is  one  of  the  other  greenhouse  gases  that 
is  leading  to  increased  warming.  The  methane  doesn’t  dissolve  in 
the  ocean,  so  most  of  its  impacts  are  through  increased  warming. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Dr.  Feely,  did  you  want  to  respond  to  that 

too? 

Dr.  FEELY.  I  just  wanted  to  add  that  when  methane  is  released 
into the oceans it quickly oxidizes to CO2 by bacterial processes. So 
the  impacts  that  we  see  in  the  oceans  are  the  oxidation  product  of 
CO2. 

Senator STEVENS. Resulting from the increase in methane? 
Dr.  FEELY.  When  methane  is  released,  for  example  from  sedi-
ments  or  from  methane  hydrates,  it  quickly  gets  oxidized  to  CO2 
by  methane-oxidizing  bacteria.  So  the  impacts  that  we  would  see 
in the oceans would be the CO2 enrichment. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
I  just  wanted  to  follow  up,  Dr.  Doney,  on  some  of  the  questions 
that Senator Stevens was asking about the temperature issue, just 
to  clarify  this.  I  am  also  on  the  Environment  Committee  and  I  get 
questions  about  this  kind  of  thing  a  lot.  I  always  use  the  example 
for  the  air  temperature  that  it  has  gone  up  one  degree  in  the  last 
century  and  the  EPA  predicts  it  will  go  up  3  to  8  degrees  in  this 
coming  century.  To  give  some  perspective  to  people,  because  espe-
cially in Minnesota we think, well, in the middle of the winter that 
does not sound that bad, but I give them the perspective that since 
the Ice Age it has only gone up 5 degrees, the height of the Ice Age, 
the temperature worldwide. 

So  I  wondered  if  you  could  use  that  kind  of  analogy  with  the 
ocean temperatures in some way to better clarify this for us, when 
you said that it was actually a large amount to go up .04. 

Dr. DONEY. Right, and I also wanted to make one additional clar-
ification,  which  is  there  were  some  early  reports  that  global  ocean 
temperatures had started to drop around the year 2002. But when 
they went back and reexamined the data, they found that they had 
been making errors in the way they had been treating some of the 
data.  The  most  recent  estimates  are  that  the  ocean  temperatures 
leveled  off  or  cooled  slightly  but  there  has  not  been  a  significant, 
long-term drop since the observational record began. 

Yes,  the  ocean  changes  that  we  are  seeing  are  unprecedented  in 
the  historical  record  and  are  comparable  to  what  was  seen  during 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

56 

the  deglaciation  from  the  last  glacial  period.  You  have  to  remem-
ber,  though,  when  you  are  talking  about  the  temperature  change 
of  5  degrees  between  the  glacial  maximum  and  what  we  call  the 
Holocene,  the  modern  period,  that  occurred  over  several  thousand 
years. We are experiencing the same temperature change over dec-
ades,  and  that  is  what  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony  that  it  is  not 
just the magnitude of the change, it is the rate of change that spe-
cies cannot adapt to. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
One  of  the  things  I  get  asked  about  is  the  effect  that  this  has 
had on the severity of storms with the warming of the ocean. Does 
anyone want to lend some expertise to that issue? 

Dr.  DONEY.  I  will  try  to  answer  that.  There  is  some  data  that 
suggests  that  the  intensity  of  tropical  storms  has  been  increasing 
for things like hurricanes and typhoons. There is still not clear evi-
dence whether the frequency of storms will change. There are good 
theoretical reasons to believe that storms will increase in intensity 
because warmer air can hold more water, and the whole process of 
the  energetics  of  warmer  sea  surface  temperatures  and  warmer 
atmospheres  holding  more  water  should  lead  to  stronger  storms, 
both  in  the  tropics,  but  also  at  mid-latitudes,  which  could  lead  to 
not  just  effects  in  the  ocean,  but  effects  on  land  like  increased 
flooding. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  mentioned  the  Great  Lakes  earlier  in  my 
opening  comments  and  I  just  wanted  to  put  something  out  there 
because  I  am  not  sure  we  will  have  a  hearing  entirely  devoted  to 
the Great Lakes and climate change. But as I mentioned, the water 
in Lake Superior is lower, and there are studies out of the Univer-
sity  of  Minnesota  at  Duluth  and  other  places  showing  that  part  of 
this, the opposite of the oceans where it is going up, is that because 
we have less ice because of the increasing temperatures and so the 
water  is  evaporating,  and  it  is  having  an  actual  tremendous  effect 
on the economy up there. 

Just to give you a sense, in 2006 at just one terminal dock in Du-
luth  it  took  42  more  ships  to  load  the  same  amount  of  tonnage  as 
it  did  in  2005  because  of  the  fact  that  we  are  seeing  a  lowering  of 
the  water  level  in  the  Great  Lakes.  I  always  look  for  examples  to 
use  for  some  of  my  colleagues  that  are  in  states  that  are  not  on 
the coast areas, to use about why the climate change issue is affect-
ing us just as it is affecting people in the coastal areas. 

I know that this was not the focus of this hearing, but if anyone 
had any information to add to the information we are gathering on 
the Great Lakes that would be helpful. Dr. Feely? 

Dr. FEELY. Yes. I just wanted to add, the same problems that we 
are  talking  about  with  ocean  acidification  should  be  also  thought 
about  with  respect  to  the  Great  Lakes.  The  Great  Lakes  are  lakes 
that  are  not  as  well  buffered  as  the  oceans,  so  the  impacts  could 
be  even  more  severe.  To  my  knowledge  there  has  been  very  few 
studies  of  this  particular  problem.  Historically,  we  have  looked  at 
acid  rain  in  the  Great  Lakes  regions  and  acid  rain  is  very  similar 
to  this  kind  of  problem  because  it  involves  sulfuric  acid  and  nitric 
acid and those kinds of impacts are usually quite severe and short- 
lived  over  the  seasonal  changes  due  to  snow  melt  and  its  impacts 
on rivers and lakes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

57 

This  is  a  different  kind  of  problem  because  it  is  a  gradual  in-
crease in CO2 over a long period of time. So we should look at these 
kinds of issues with respect to the Great Lakes as soon as possible. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Madam Chair, could I do one more question 

or are we running out of time? 

Senator  CANTWELL.  No,  absolutely  ask  additional  questions.  I 
thought  perhaps,  though,  given  your  question,  I  think  that  Dr. 
Feely’s  slides  are  about  acidification  and  acidification  impact. 
Would now be a proper time to show that? 

Dr. FEELY. Sure, I would love to. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Very  good.  We  have  been  waiting  to  see 

this slide. 

[The PowerPoint presentation is retained in Committee files.] 
Dr.  FEELY.  I  actually  prepared  this  slide  for  this  presentation. 
What  we  have  done  with  the  global  CO2 surveys,  we  made  meas-
urements  in  the  1990s  of  the  distribution  of  anthropogenic  carbon 
in  the  ocean  and  we  used  that  information  to  develop  models  of 
how  the  oceans  will  change  over  time  with  respect  to  saturation 
levels  that  the  coral  reef  systems  and  the  pteropods  and  many  of 
these calcifying organisms are sensitive to. 

Then we worked together with the modelers who had been work-
ing  with  global  circulation  models.  This  is  a  composite  model  out-
put  of  the  13  best  models  throughout  the  world  that  have  been 
used  for  these  studies.  What  this  map  shows  is  the  pre-industrial 
level of saturation state for the oceans in the surface waters. What 
we  have  plotted  on  here  in  the  map  in  the  very  black  dots  are  the 
present  day  distributions  of  tropical  coral  reefs.  The  magenta  dots 
are the present day distributions of the deep water coral reefs. 

What the tropical coral reefs need is a saturation state in excess 
of  3,  a  saturation  state  of  3  for  them  to  survive  naturally.  We  do 
not  know  what  the  saturation  state  requirement  is  for  deep  water 
corals because those studies have not been done. 

So  we  move  into  the  present  condition  in  2000  and  we  see  that 
the  system  has  changed.  It  is  no  longer  optimal  for  calcification, 
but many of the regions are still safely within that saturation state 
of 3. We would prefer to have it at 3.5 or 4. Again, most of the trop-
ical  coral  reefs  are  within  that  state.  But  we  see  we  are  now  en-
croaching on that optimal saturation state. 

If  we  go  out  to  2040,  we  see  that  now  the  coral  reef  systems  in 
the Hawaiian Islands region and other locations are also very, very 
close to being well within this limit of 3.0 saturation, and therefore 
there is some concern whether they can continue to calcify by 2040. 
The  magenta  regions  here  are  the  thermodynamic  limit  where 
dissolution  begins  to  occur,  and  we  can  see  that  occurring  in  the 
southern ocean by 2040. 

When  we  go  out  to  2100,  what  we  see  is  that  the  entire  world 
oceans are no longer within this level of 3.0, which means that the 
coral  reef  systems  would  not  be  able  to  continue  to  calcify.  Again, 
the  entire  southern  ocean  would  be  a  region  of  complete  dissolu-
tion.  In  other  words,  no  organism  would  be  able  to  calcify.  They 
would begin to dissolve. 

Now we see in the North Pacific, high northern latitudes, also in 
the  Atlantic  particularly  and  presumably  the  Bering  Sea,  we  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

58 

the  same  conditions  of  undersaturation  in  which  the  coral  orga-
nisms and the other calcifying organisms would—— 

Senator CANTWELL. But Dr. Feely, on calcification, you are treat-
ing that like an indicator species? Or should we attribute other—— 
Dr.  FEELY.  Calcification  is  the  process  by  which  they  form  their 
shells.  So  the  question  is  can  they  form  their  shells  or  not?  What 
these  models  show  is  where  they  can  form  their  shells  and  when 
the shells will actually begin to dissolve. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  You  are  treating  that  as,  you  are  treating 
that like any other indicator species as to the health of an environ-
ment,  or  are  there  other  implications  we  should  draw  from  that,  I 
guess as you keep going through this? 

Dr.  FEELY.  Yes.  Well,  for  example,  for  coral  reefs,  this  means 
whether they can continue to produce their skeletons. But for other 
species,  this  would  suggest  that  they  would  no  longer  be  able  to 
calcify.  For  example,  the  pteropods  which  are  the  primary  food 
source  for  salmon  would  no  longer  be  able  to  form  their  calcium 
carbonate  shells.  So  these  are  the  regions  where  they  would  have 
to  be—no  longer  can  exist  in  those  locations.  So  they  would  be  re-
moved  from  those  locations.  So  the  food  chain  would  change  dra-
matically. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  are  saying  they  are  the  beginning  of 

the food chain indication? 

Dr. FEELY. Right. 
Senator CANTWELL. Is that what you are saying? 
Dr. FEELY. That is exactly correct. 
Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Dr.  FEELY.  So  what  we  are  seeing,  this  process  of  CO2 enrich-
ment really starts from the poles and moves toward the tropical re-
gions.  So  the  high  latitude  regimes,  the  high  productivity  regimes 
for fish and shellfish, are going to be affected first, and this is what 
we are seeing in these model outputs. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  think  Dr.  Hansen  wanted  to  comment  a 

little more. 

Dr. HANSEN. I wanted to add something with regard to the Great 
Lakes.  The  Great  Lakes  have  not  only,  as  well  as  the  world’s 
oceans,  have  not  only  an  issue  of  quantity—as  you  stated,  the 
world’s oceans are growing, while the lakes are shrinking—but also 
issues  of  water  quality.  In  the  Great  Lakes  region  you  have  not 
only the issue of increased evaporation because of altered ice cover, 
but  you  also  have  periods  of  drought  that  have  been  occurring 
there. 

Coupled  with  that  drought  are  altered  use  of  fertilizers  and  pes-
ticides for agriculture and other human adaptations, if you will, to 
the changes that are already going on. And as part of that, I think 
that  one  of  the  concerns  for  the  Great  Lakes  should  be  how  is  the 
water  quality  being  protected  under  that  changing  climate  regime 
and  how  do  we  rethink  the  way  we  set  regulatory  limits  on  things 
like  contaminants,  sewage  outflow,  in  response  to  the  fact  that 
there  is  now  less  water  in  that  water  body  that  historically  has 
been receiving those outputs. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

59 

My last question was for you, Admiral Watkins. As we looked at 
all  the  enormous  challenges  we  are  facing,  you  had  some  ideas  for 
solutions, and obviously some of it is the funding for research. But 
I  was  interested  in  your  idea  of  the  more  integrated  management 
of our ecosystem and if you could just spend a little time explaining 
that  to  us  as  we  look  at  how  we  can  better  do  things  in  addition 
to the additional funding. 

Admiral  WATKINS.  Well,  let  me  say  first,  Senator,  that  I  do  not 
know  if  you  noticed,  but  when  we  put  out  our  draft  report  in  the 
spring  of  2004  the  biggest  negative  comment  we  had  on  that  draft 
was  from  the  Great  Lakes  area  saying,  it  is  oceans,  coasts,  and 
Great Lakes. We agreed and you will see it in our report. It is not 
only what we just heard here, but also invasive species are coming 
in there and destroying the fisheries. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. The Asian carp. 
Admiral WATKINS. It is a huge issue. If you ask the White House, 
what are you doing you will hear: Look, we have established a task 
force, we have got a Federal to State relationship, we have got the 
Canada-Great  Lakes  Commission,  it  has  been  there  for  many, 
many years. And the answer is: Yes; what have you done? And the 
answer is not very much. 

So  it  is  like  everything  else.  It  is  a  lot  of  rhetoric  and  very  little 
substance to the investment that we need in the Great Lakes. But 
it  is  part  of  the  whole  regime  that  we  are  talking  about  here.  We 
are  saying  that  we  need  to  have  a  governance  response  and  we 
need  to  have  a  science  response,  and  both  of  those  come  into  play 
for the Great Lakes. 

On  the  governance  side,  we  have  mentioned  to  Congress  in  our 
reports  we  need  to  codify  and  strengthen  NOAA.  That  should  be  a 
pigh  priority  of  this  Committee  to  pass  a  NOAA  Organic  act. 
NOAA should focus on three core functions: assessment, prediction, 
operation;  research  and  education;  and  marine  resource  and  area 
management; a realignment that would benefit the Great Lakes. 

Congress  should  also  request  a  National  Academies  study  to 
make  organizational  recommendations  for  a  national  climate 
change response office. That could deal with the Great Lakes issue. 
It  should  also  require  an  integrated  budget  in  support  of  the  na-
tional climate change response office. 

This Committee, members of this Committee here and other com-
mittees,  sent  a  letter  2  years  ago  to  the  White  House  saying,  we 
want an integrated ocean policy budget submission. If you want to 
send  them  up  this  way,  from  15  agencies,  that  is  fine,  but  hori-
zontally  integrate  them  and  get  them  up  here,  so  we  can  tell;  are 
you doing anything. So far we have not seen such a budget, so the 
answer  is  no,  they  are  not  doing  anything.  So  it  is  all  superficial 
stuff. 

So again, the Great Lakes get affected by all that. 
We  say  codify  and  strengthen  the  White  House  Committee  on 
Ocean  Policy.  Could  this  work  in  the  current  system?  Yes.  All  the 
President would have to say is: Do it, Mr. OMB, and do it, Mr. Ad-
viser,  the  Policy  Adviser.  That  happened  to  me  when  I  was  Sec-
retary  of  Energy.  I  wanted  to  clean  up  the  bomb  factory  after  40 
years  when  the  Cold  War  ended.  It  was  President  H.W.  Bush  who 
said: No, Mr. Secretary of Defense, I know it is coming out of your 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

60 

hide,  but  we  are  going  to  do  it.  We  went  from  $800  million  a  year 
to $6 billion. Now it is $7 billion. We are turning Rocky Flats back 
to the State of Colorado, Fernault back to the State of Ohio. 

So  we  can  work  with  the  current  system  if  we  want  to  do  it.  So 
it  really  starts  in  the  White  House.  I  think  if  they  took  the  lead 
the Congress would respond very positively. 

So then we want to codify the Committee on Ocean Policy, to pre-
vent it from disappearing, since it currently exists under an execu-
tive  order.  That  is  how  NOAA  was  established  via  an  executive 
order,  and  we  do  not  want  that  any  more.  We  want  Congress  to 
codify  NOAA  to  give  them  responsibility,  accountability,  and  re-
sources. Of the $750 million a year over JOCI recommended, about 
60  percent  of  that  would  go  to  NOAA,  to  support  all  the  projects 
that we have outlined in our report. 

So  that  addresses  the  governance  issue.  On  the  science  side,  we 
say  fund  the  climate-related  research  priorities  in  the  administra-
tion national ocean research priorities plan. They have a plan that 
was  released  in  January.  Fund  it.  And  you  know,  in  the  initial 
funding  for  the  plan  they  allowed  NASA  to  refuse  funding  to  sup-
port  its  Earth  sciences.  So  I  do  not  trust  implementation  of  that 
plan solely by the Administration. So Congress has to codify it and 
say: No, we expect it to do its job. 

Fund  the  Integrated  Earth  Observing  System.  We  have  heard 
that here today. We have got to have a comprehensive observation 
system.  We  have  got  to  know  what  is  going  on  out  there.  And  we 
can  build  on  that.  It  is  50  percent  completed  now,  but  not  in  the 
ocean.  There  is  not  even  close  to  50  percent  there.  We  are  way 
down at the bottom of the heap in terms of our science, technology, 
data management, ability to convert data into useful product. 

Senator CANTWELL. Admiral Watkins, if I could jump in here, are 
you suggesting that we incorporate the oceans impact when we are 
talking  about  setting  a  target  for  CO2 emissions  reduction?  And  if 
we were, how would you do that? 

Admiral  WATKINS.  Well,  the  Oceans  Commission  was  never 
tasked  by  the  Congress  to  do  that.  We  are  on  the  fringes  of  it  be-
cause  we  kept  running  into  the  time.  But  we  could  not  address  it. 
So we did not feel we had the mandate out of Congress to deal with 
greenhouse gas mitigation. Obviously, as Secretary of Energy when 
I was there we did. We ran some of the ocean flux studies. We ran 
the carbon cycle. We put a lot of emphasis in this. 

I think it dissipated at that point. So I have some personal views 
on it, but I do not have any clues as to—you know, there has been 
so  much  talk  about  this,  to  give  a  specific  number  and  set  these. 
I  am  on  the  same  wavelength  as  some  of  the  witnesses  this  morn-
ing  on  doing  both  mitigation  and  adapting,  and  adaptation.  We 
have not addressed the subject of adaptation at all and that is sad, 
because  for  the  next  two  and  a  half  decades,  no  matter  what  we 
do  with  greenhouse  gas  reduction,  we  are  going  to  have  a  problem 
of  global  warming.  It  is  there  for  us  to  deal  with  and  we  have  got 
to manage our way through it. So we need both. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  let  us  turn  to  Dr.  Feely  on  that  so  we 
can  understand,  because  I  think  that  the  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget 
would  decrease  about  14  percent  from  the  2006  level  research  re-
lated to acidification. Is that correct? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

61 

Dr. FEELY. Yes, Senator, that is correct. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  And  we  do  not  have  any  money  for  adapta-

tion? 

Dr. FEELY. Well, the research that is presently being provided for 
directly  funding  ocean  acidification  research  is  about  $1.6  million 
per  year  throughout  all  the  Federal  agencies.  There  is  an  addi-
tional $4 million per year that is being funded within NOAA on re-
lated  activities  to  ocean  acidification,  but  they  are  not  directly 
funding ocean acidification research. 

We  draw  from  that  additional  related  research  to  identify  and 
proceed  on  ocean  acidification  studies.  But  they  are  not  directly 
funded for doing ocean acidification studies. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  You  have  suggested,  I  think,  four  themes. 
One  would  be—in  this  research  realm.  One  would  be  monitoring. 
Another  would  be  understanding  the  response  of  the  animals  to 
acidification, ecosystem modeling, and risk assessments. 

Dr. FEELY. That is correct. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So  do  you  have  a  sense  of  how  much  that 
would cost in the context of where we are today and where we need 
to get a clear picture of ocean health and a plan? 

Dr.  FEELY.  Well,  we  have  discussed  this  in  a  number  of  work-
shops  that  involve  the  scientists  that  are  doing  ocean  acidification 
research and related activities. In those workshops, the community 
has  indicated  that  a  national  program  on  the  order  of  $30  million 
per year would be appropriate. 

Senator CANTWELL. Dr. Hansen, did you—in best practices on ad-
aptation,  what  do  you  think  are  the  key  things  that  we  should  be 
looking at? 

Dr. HANSEN. Well, the first thing is that we actually need the ca-
pacity to do this type of work. We are not training people to do this 
work  whatsoever.  We  are  also  not  raising  the  awareness  of  people 
that  it  needs  to  be  done.  Many  people  are  still  trying  to  pretend 
that climate change either is not happening or someone else is tak-
ing care of it. Unfortunately, it is a reality for all of us. 

So the sort of steps that I have laid out in my testimony and that 
my  colleagues  and  I  have  been  talking  about  is  first  the  need  to 
train  the  next  generation  of  people  who  will  be  taking  this  on,  as 
well  as  getting  ourselves  up  to  speed  on  it;  developing  some  sort 
of  extension  agency  that  actually  is  going  out,  raising  awareness 
about  this  issue,  engaging  people  on  what  the  options  are,  getting 
them to implement them, and taking the lessons back to synthesize 
and provide the next generation of guidance. 

Then finally, we need to be incorporating climate adaptation into 
literally  everything  that  is  being  done  in  national  and  local  and 
international  legislation,  quite  frankly,  where  we  are  preparing  all 
of  the  projects  we  are  working  on  so  that  they  are  climate-pre-
pared, be it in coastal infrastructure, preparing it for sea level rise, 
be  it  agriculture,  preparing  it  for  periods  of  drought  or  movement 
of pest species, forestry, preparing for increasing fire regimes, fish-
eries, preparing for movement and new management strategies. 

Literally every sector of our society is and will continue to be im-
pacted  by  climate  change  for  decades  to  come,  and  we  are  grossly 
underprepared for that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

62 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Dr.  Kruse,  it  seems  that  you  are  kind  of  on 
the  front  lines  there  in  Alaska  with  the  polar  bears  and  walruses 
and seals being impacted by melting ice. What can managers do on 
these species? 

Dr. KRUSE. Thank you for your question. Certainly these climate 
changes are out of the purview of fisheries managers, but fisheries 
managers  need  to  deal  with  the  ramifications.  So  one  of  the  clear-
est things we can do is be more precautionary. So if there is poten-
tial  for  fishery  interactions  with  either  of  those  species  directly  or 
indirectly through their prey base, I think we have to be more pre-
cautionary. 

As  I  indicated  briefly  in  my  oral  remarks  and  more  fully  in  my 
written remarks, the North Pacific Fishery Management Council is 
looking  at  establishing  perhaps  an  Arctic  Fishery  Management 
Plan  that  would  basically  set  those  areas  off  limits,  particularly 
with  an  eye  toward  the  loss  of  sea  ice.  The  loss  of  sea  ice  reduces 
habitats  for  the  ice  seals  and  polar  bears.  Associated  with  the  loss 
of sea ice, we may see a switch from that system, which is a more 
benthic system that support prey of birds like the spectacled eiders 
and walruses to a pelagic system. Realizing that these changes are 
happening, maybe it is best to not allow any fishing there. 

At  their  next  meeting  in  June  2007,  the  North  Pacific  Fishery 
Management  Council  is  looking  at  defining  what  we  call  essential 
fish  habitat.  They  will  consider  basically  freezing  the  northern 
boundary  of  the  current  areas  that  are  being  fished  in  the  Bering 
Sea,  even  realizing  that  fish  may  move  north,  into  previously 
unfished  areas  wtih  increasing  temperature.  The  problem  is  that 
we  simply  do  not  have  data  nor  surveys  up  there,  so  we  do  not 
know what is there, and we realize that these northern ecosystems 
can  be  very  fragile  with  respect  to  species,  such  as  some  of  the 
seabirds,  the  marine  mammals.  Certainly  the  coastal  residents  of 
those northern areas make use of those marine resources and real-
ly depend on them for their survival. 

So being more precautionary I guess is the short answer. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Dr.  Conover,  do  we  have  to  take  this  into 

consideration in implementing the Magnuson-Stevens Act? 

Dr.  CONOVER.  Yes.  I  think  one  of  the  most  important  shifts  that 
we  are  seeing  in  how  we  manage  marine  resources  is  to  take  a 
more  ecosystem-based  approach.  In  an  ecosystem-based  approach, 
then the impacts of climate change can be folded into the decisions 
we  make  about  how  heavily  we  can  harvest  various  species  or 
whether we need to back off. 

A  lot  of  the  things  we  see  happening  in  my  region  of  the  world 
go  beyond  just  the  impacts  of  harvesting  and  include  diseases,  the 
impacts  of  water  quality,  hypoxia,  and  all  those  end  up  having  an 
impact  on  the  abundance  of  the  species  we  are  trying  to  protect. 
So  using  an  ecosystem  approach,  which  really  we  have  only  begun 
to do recently, lends itself to thinking longer term rather than year 
to  year,  and  including  expectations  of  climate  change  in  that  ap-
proach. 

Senator CANTWELL. Admiral Watkins, I am going to give you the 
last  word,  with  the  emphasis  on  ‘‘last.’’  But  if  you  could  briefly, 
what  do  you  think  that  we  need  to  change  from  a  policy  perspec-
tive? Why from a political sense are we not getting this done? What 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

63 

are  the  road  blocks  and  what  do  you  suggest  that  we  do  to  take 
the  information  we  have  had  to  date  at  this  hearing  and  integrate 
that into policy action? 

Admiral  WATKINS.  Well,  you  used  the  term  here  ‘‘ecosystem- 
based  management.’’  That  is  not  a  trivial  issue.  Eyes  roll  back 
when you tell that to the public, but in Washington we know what 
it  means.  It  means  major  reorganization  of  how  we  do  business 
here.  Horizontal  integration  across  Federal  agencies,  up  here  on 
the Hill and so forth becomes very important when you get into cli-
mate  change  practices.  We  cannot  separate  these  things.  So  we 
have to kind of back away from the old way of doing business, take 
advantage  of  the  information  technology  world  we  live  in,  bring 
business  and  industry  into  the  game  to  help  us  build  these  archi-
tectural  systems  that  we  want  to  observe,  get  the  database 
straightened out, be able to convert that data to useful products at 
the local, county, State levels. 

We  should  be  able  to  do  all  this,  but  the  current  governance  re-
gime is a big hindrance right now. There is no process to integrate 
activities across the Federal Government. That is what we have got 
to deal with. That is why we put so much emphasis on governance. 
It  is  not  that  governance  will  answer  everything.  Obviously,  you 
have to have a budget and you have to have educational programs. 
You  have  to  have  a  lot  of  things.  But  if  we  are  going  to  spend  the 
money right, we better do it right, and we better do it the way na-
ture  does  it.  We  fouled  it  up  by  managing  it  piecemeal,  vertically. 
Nature  beautifully  integrates  horizontally  and  tells  us  what  the 
problem  is.  And  we  need  to  listen  to  that,  and  then  we  need  to 
manage  within  the  natural  process,  and  we  are  not  doing  that 
today at all. 

So that is why I put so much emphasis on governance. And obvi-
ously  the  science  is  the  other  critical  component.  We  have  not  put 
adequate  emphasis  on  it.  When  the  President  announced  his  new 
American  Competitiveness  Initiative  two  years  ago  in  the  State  of 
the Union Address, oceans were not in the game. They are not even 
considered in this. 

So  we  have  not  put  emphasis  on  science,  in  particular,  ocean 
science.  The  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  also  used  to 
be the Science Adviser to the President. He is no longer the Science 
Adviser  to  the  President.  It  was  removed.  Is  science  important  to 
the administration or not? I do not think so, not sufficiently impor-
tant, particularly when you get into this area of climate change. 

So we have got a major job to do in the way we look at this, and 
that  is  why,  because  the  Senate  has  been  so  receptive  to  our  work 
over  the  last  few  years,  we  are  kind  of  counting  on  the  Senate  to 
take the lead. We tried the White House and we do not get enough 
response.  I  do  not  know  that  Jim  Connaughton  is  not  doing  a  de-
cent  job,  but  he  is  not  given  the  time  of  day  and  the  strength  to 
put  the  money  into  the  budget  process,  to  give  you  a  budget  up 
here that is other than what we have always done. 

I will say the administration this year in the 2008 budget finally 
put in a figure that was comparable to the 2007 appropriated. They 
have  never  done  that  before.  So  is  that  a  plus?  Well,  yes,  I  guess 
so, but not a big plus. 

Senator CANTWELL. We will stop on that note. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

64 

Admiral WATKINS. Anyway—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Because  we  all  do  want  to  work  together, 
and  I  appreciate  your  point.  You  had  the  scientists  nodding  at  the 
other end of the table about how we should look more at the envi-
ronment and its response from a systematic perspective. 

I  will  point  out  that  I  think  the  Pacific  Northwest,  particularly 
Washington State, has done fabulous work on two areas, timberfish 
and  wildlife,  which  is  industry  working  together  with  environ-
mentalists.  In  fact,  those  ecosystem  plans,  if  they  are  ever  chal-
lenged, you get the industry officials as aggressively responding as 
you  do  the  environmentalists.  So  I  think  it  has  been  a  good  meas-
ure. I think Bill Ruckelshaus has done fabulous ecosystem work as 
it relates to salmon recovery in the Northwest, again working with 
a  whole  cadre  of  local  governments,  Native  Americans,  fishermen, 
industry  officials  across  the  board.  So  we  may  be  a  little  bit  more 
of a forerunner on that. 

And  as  I  mentioned,  the  Pacific  Northwest  Fishery  Council  I 
think  has  been  a  forerunner  in  implementing  environmental  im-
pacts and management into their fisheries policy ahead of the rest 
of  the  Nation.  So  we  obviously  do  care  greatly  about  our  environ-
ment in the Northwest, including our ocean. 

So  I  want  to  thank  all  the  panelists  for  a  very  detailed  presen-
tation about the challenges that we face with our oceans policy. Ad-
miral  Watkins,  I  hope  that  my  colleagues  will  review  all  of  this. 
Obviously,  we  are  going  to  leave  the  record  open  for  additional 
questions.  If  you  could  help  us  and  comply  by  answering  that  in 
a quick fashion, we will leave the record open for a few weeks. But 
I hope my colleagues will take this hearing and take the testimony 
and take up the baton that you are passing to us to act and to con-
solidate this as part of our response to healthy oceans. 

So thank you all very much. We are adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:52 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Coral reefs have been called ‘‘the rainforests of the sea.’’ In addition to their great 
beauty, they offer critical habitat to a variety of marine organisms. Coral reefs cover 
less  than  1  percent  of  the  Earth’s  surface,  but  they  provide  resources  and  services 
worth approximately $1.4 billion annually to the U.S. economy. In the State of Ha-
waii, the economic value of coral reefs is estimated at more than $360 million annu-
ally. 

These  diverse  coral  habitats  have  survived  for  millions  of  years,  recovering  from 
natural  disturbances.  However,  the  reefs  are  under  threat  from  rising  ocean  tem-
peratures and increasing ocean acidity. Scientists are observing coral bleaching that 
is more widespread and more severe, in some cases, severe enough to kill the corals. 
I  am  pleased  the  Administration  is  proposing  legislation  to  reauthorize  and 
strengthen  the  Coral  Reef  Conservation  Act  of  2000,  legislation  that  I  introduced 
in 1999 to establish the Coral Reef Conservation Program within the National Oce-
anic and Atmospheric Administration. 

However,  this  legislation  will  not  be  effective  in  protecting  coral  reefs  if  we  do 

nothing to reduce carbon emissions. 

Coral reefs are just one of the kinds of living marine resources that are impacted 
by  climate  change.  Scientific  research  has  confirmed  that  emissions  of  greenhouse 
gases  contribute  to  climate  change  and  that  such  emissions  are  causing  our  oceans 
to become warmer and more acidic. These effects are harming our living marine re-
sources.  The  science  is  also  clear  that  these  impacts  will  grow  worse  as  long  as  we 
continue to do nothing to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. 

Therefore,  I  hope  that  our  distinguished  panel  members  will  be  able  not  only  to 

help us understand these impacts, but also to suggest a way forward. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 
Madam Chairman, thank you for holding today’s hearing. 
Despite the Bush Administration’s ongoing efforts to censor and suppress science, 
there is no doubt that man-made global warming is real, and it threatens the health 
of our planet, including our oceans. 

The increase in carbon dioxide causes global warming and ocean acidification. 
NOAA  researchers  predict  that  oceans  will  continue  to  acidify  to  ‘‘an  extent  and 
at  rates  that  have  not  occurred  for  tens  of  millions  of  years.’’  Ocean  acidification 
threatens our marine ecosystems. As the chemistry of our ocean changes, some ma-
rine life may not be able to survive. 

Acidic water damages our corals, for example, which provide vital habitat to many 

marine species, and plankton, the foundation of the marine food chain. 

In addition, the rise in ocean temperature has caused some fish to move to colder 

waters, posing challenges to our commercial and recreational fisheries. 

The combined effects of global warming and ocean acidification cannot be ignored. 
The  potential  environmental  and  economic  cost  to  New  Jersey—and  coastal  states 
across the country—is too great. 

I am concerned that the Administration is not taking the issue of ocean acidifica-
tion  seriously  enough.  In  the  Magnuson-Stevens  bill  we  passed  last  year,  Congress 
directed  the  National  Research  Council  to  report  on  ocean  acidification  and  its  im-
pact  on  the  United  States.  I  have  requested  funding  for  this  authorized  study  as 
a  member  of  the  Appropriations  Committee,  and  I  will  work  with  my  colleagues  to 
see  that  the  effects  of  ocean  acidification  are  made  a  priority  for  this  Administra-
tion. 

Thank  you  again  Madam  Chairman  for  beginning  our  work  on  this  important 

issue. 

(65) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

66 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

SCOTT C. DONEY, PH.D. 

Question 1. Coral reefs are not just critical habitat for fish. In my state of Hawaii, 
they  are  also  an  economic  engine  supporting  both  fishing  and  tourism.  Is  ocean 
acidification  or  the  increase  in  sea  temperature  the  more  pressing  issue  for  pro-
tecting  and  preserving  Hawaii’s  coral  reefs  and  other  marine  resources  and  why? 
Answer.  Surface  ocean  warming  and  acidification  are  two  sides  of  the  same  coin 
because their root cause is the same, namely the human-driven rise in atmospheric 
carbon  dioxide.  Therefore  we  need  to  address  both  issues  simultaneously.  Warming 
has  already  been  linked  to  coral  bleaching  events.  Acidification  has  been  shown  to 
limit coral growth in the laboratory, and more work is needed to assess the impacts 
on  whole  ecosystems.  One  concern  is  that  the  combined  effect  of  temperature  and 
warming  may  be  much  more  harmful  on  coral  reefs  than  either  factor  in  isolation. 
Thus  it  is  difficult  to  separate  temperature  and  acidification  effects  and  to  assign 
one factor or the other as the most pressing issue; they are both important. 

Question 2. How can we incorporate actions to address these issues into an overall 

management strategy for protecting Hawaii’s corals and other marine resources? 

Answer. Climate warming and acidification are global processes that are not easy 
to  reverse  at  the  local  or  state  level  (see  below).  Management  strategies,  however, 
can  be  developed  to  minimize  their  impacts  on  coral  reefs  and  fisheries.  The  first 
step is to reduce the negative effects of other factors that are more amenable to local 
control.  These  include  things  like  pollution,  land  runoff  of  excess  nutrients,  over- 
fishing,  and  habitat  destruction.  The  second  step  is  to  create  more  adaptive,  for-
ward-looking  management  strategies  that  explicitly  include  climate  warming  and 
acidification  in  their  design.  For  example,  the  catch  limits  for  many  fisheries  are 
set  based  on  historical  levels  of  fish  stocks.  But  the  future  ocean  will  not  look  like 
the past. Numerical climate models will provide some guidance for helping resource 
managers, but at present there remain relatively large uncertainties in our forecasts 
of  the  magnitude  in  climate  change  on  regional  scales  and  resulting  biological  re-
sponses. Following a precautionary principle, one strategy would be to lower present 
catch  limits  to  provide  an  additional  safety  factor  for  unforeseen  climate  impacts 
and  to  closely  monitor  resource  levels  to  maintain  sustainability.  Climate  change 
and ocean acidification also need to be factored into the design of other management 
tools  such  as  marine  reserves  or  marine  protected  areas.  For  example,  as  species 
distributions  shift  with  climate,  will  the  size  of  a  protected  area  be  sufficient  and 
will it still protect the target species of interest. 

Question  3.  Dr.  Doney,  could  you  tell  me  what  adaptation  and  mitigation  steps 
you  think  the  United  States  needs  to  take  to  address  the  threats  that  climate 
change and ocean acidification pose to our ocean resources? 

Answer. Increasing surface water temperatures and ocean acidification are driven 
by the human emissions to the atmosphere of greenhouse gases like carbon dioxide. 
The atmosphere mixes on time-scales of months to a few years, and the climate im-
pact  of  carbon  dioxide  emissions  is  global  rather  than  local.  Thus  ocean  warming 
and acidification require global solutions to limit the rise in atmospheric carbon di-
oxide.  The  most  direct  mitigation  steps  would  be  to  reduce  the  amount  of  carbon 
dioxide  released  to  the  atmosphere.  Reducing  emissions  can  occur  through  shifts  to 
non-fossil  fuel  energy  sources,  increases  in  energy  efficiency,  and  deliberate  actions 
to  sequester  carbon  rather  releasing  it  to  the  atmosphere.  One  of  the  more  prom-
ising sequestration approaches appears to be storage of carbon dioxide in geological 
reservoirs, such as old natural gas and oil fields. There are also proposals to manip-
ulate land and ocean ecosystems to remove some of the excess carbon dioxide in the 
atmosphere and increasing carbon storage plants, soils and the deep ocean. Adapta-
tion strategies are discussed in the answer above. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

SCOTT C. DONEY, PH.D. 

Question  1.  The  most  rigorous  mitigation  goal  in  the  recent  summary  report  by 
the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  is  to  stabilize  atmospheric  green-
house gas levels between 445 and 710 parts per million by 2030. But given that the 
current concentrations of atmospheric carbon are estimated at 379 parts per million, 
shouldn’t  this  target  be  set  at  a  much  lower  level  if  we  are  to  effectively  address 
climate change? What is the expected temperature increase of this range? 

Answer.  The  IPCC  stabilization  scenarios  from  the  4th  IPCC  Assessment  report 
are discussed in some detail in the Technical Summary for Working Group III (Miti-
gation).  I  think  the  specific  values  of  445  to  710  parts  per  million  are  drawn  from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

67 

Table  TS.  2  (page  21  and  22  of  the  draft  Technical  Summary);  the  same  table  is 
given  as  Table  SPM.5  on  page  23  of  the  Summary  for  Policymakers.  This  table  is 
somewhat  confusing  as  it  lists  two  columns  of  carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  levels,  one  an 
actual CO2 level and the other the ‘‘equivalent’’ CO2 level, that is the amount of CO2 
that  would  be  needed  to  match  the  total  radiative  warming  of  excess  CO2 plus  the 
other human driven greenhouse gases (methane, nitrous oxide, chlorofluorocarbons, 
etc.). 

(numbers  from  Table  TS.  2;  IPCC  4th  Assessment,  Technical  Summary,  Working 

Group III) 

Category 

CO2 (ppm) 

Equivalent 
CO2 (ppm) 

350–400 
400–440 
440–485 
485–570 
570–660 
660–790 

445–490 
490–535 
535–590 
590–710 
710–855 
855–1,130 

Equilibrium 
temperature 

change 
(deg. C) 

2.0–2.4 
2.4–2.8 
2.8–3.2 
3.2–4.0 
4.0–4.9 
4.9–6.1 

I 
II 
III 
IV 
V 
VI 

The most extreme stabilization scenario is for stabilizing roughly present day con-
ditions  (CO2 of  350–400  ppm;  equivalent  CO2 of  445–490  ppm)  by  2100.  This  is  a 
very  rigorous  goal  and  would  require  reductions  of  all  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by 
2015 and net removal of CO2 by some means (e.g., growing biomass) toward the end 
of  the  century.  A  series  of  stabilization  scenarios  are  then  presented  that  allow  for 
higher  atmospheric  CO2 (and  equivalent  CO2 because  of  the  other  greenhouse 
gases). 

Two different temperatures are often reported for stabilization scenarios, the tran-
sient temperature at some point in time along a pathway and the equilibrium tem-
perature.  Even  once  atmospheric  greenhouse  gas  levels  are  stabilized,  the  planet 
will  continue  to  warm  for  an  extended  period  of  time.  The  temperature  differences 
given above are for the equilibrium global mean temperature. Equilibrium tempera-
ture  changes  relative  to  pre-industrial  levels  are  estimated  by  IPCC  to  range  from 
2.0–2.4  deg.  C  for  the  most  aggressive  stabilization  scenario  (marked  I  in  the  table 
above).  The  temperature  increases  grow  as  higher  stabilization  CO2 levels  are  al-
lowed,  reaching  4.9–6.1  deg.  C  for  the  most  lenient  case  examined.  Even  these  val-
ues are considerably less than some business as usual scenarios considered in IPCC. 
Question  1a.  What  would  be  the  impacts  on  our  ocean  resources  if  we  were  to 

reach these emissions levels? 

Answer. Even if we were to eliminate all greenhouse gas emissions to the atmos-
phere, the ocean and the planet would experience some additional amount of warm-
ing  and  acidification  beyond  current  levels  (global  mean  temperature  increase  of 
0.76 ± 0.19 deg. C and surface pH drop of  ¥0.1 units) because of the inertia in the 
climate  system.  Even  the  most  aggressive  IPCC  stabilization  scenarios  lead  to  fur-
ther  warming  and  acidification  beyond  what  we  have  already  experienced  (see 
above).  Broadly  speaking,  there  is  a  strong  consensus  that  reducing  the  total 
amount of climate change will lessen the impacts of climate change and acidification 
on  ocean  resources.  For  some  specific  ecosystems  we  can  make  estimates  of  the 
trends  such  as  reductions  of  some  species  and  increases  in  others,  poleward  shifts 
in  the  ranges  of  warm-water  species,  further  degradation  of  coral  reef  systems,  etc. 
Making  more  detailed,  quantitative  forecasts  for  biological  systems  comparing  the 
impacts for one stabilization scenario versus another is more difficult at present be-
cause of uncertainties in our scientific understanding. Biological systems are not lin-
ear,  and  it  is  likely  that  at  least  for  some  regions  with  larger  climate  change  and 
acidification ecosystems will reach thresholds beyond which there will be significant 
and  dramatic  changes  in  ocean  resources.  Equally  important  is  the  rate  at  which 
the changes are occurring. Faster rates of climate change and acidification give spe-
cies  less  time  to  adapt  or  to  migrate  to  different  regions  where  conditions  may  be 
more favorable. Faster rates of change also introduce additional social and economic 
problems, particularly when significant changes happen over a time-scale short rel-
ative to the lifetime of infrastructure used for a particular ocean resource (e.g., fish-
ing fleets). 

Question  2.  How  can  we  improve  our  ocean  and  Earth  observation  programs  to 
ensure  understanding  of  the  impacts  of  global  climate  change  and  ocean  acidifica-
tion on the marine environment? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

68 

Answer. The U.S. and other countries are putting in place elements that will con-
tribute  to  a  global  ocean  observing  system,  but  there  remain  a  number  of  gaps  in 
such  a  system.  First,  much  of  the  current  in-water  observing  network  measures 
physical  properties  of  the  ocean.  Documenting  ocean  physical  changes  is  key,  as 
physical  changes  drive  biological  changes.  But  there  needs  to  be  a  corresponding 
rapid  expansion  of  in-water  chemical  and  biological  properties.  In  some  cases,  we 
need  to  invest  in  the  development  and  testing  of  new  sensors  to  routinely  measure 
seawater chemistry and biology. For example, there is an international network that 
uses  volunteer  observing  ships  (cargo  freighters,  research  vessels)  and  some  moor-
ings  to  measure  surface  ocean  carbon  dioxide  levels.  Given  concerns  with  ocean 
acidification, that network needs to be expanded in scale (e.g., by using autonomous 
drifters and profiling floats) and in scope by including pH measurements. 

Second,  the  U.S.  needs  to  maintain  and  extend  the  capability  to  monitor  ocean 
trends  from  space  using  satellite-based  remote  sensing.  For  ocean  biology,  sensors 
measuring  ocean  color,  a  proxy  for  surface  water  phytoplankton  chlorophyll,  have 
been invaluable in understanding biological spatial patterns and dynamics on time- 
scales  from  seasonal  to  multi-year.  We  will  soon  have  10  years  of  data  from  the 
NASA and GEOEYE SeaWiFS sensor. The future of U.S. ocean color remote sensing 
and other routine satellite ocean measurements is somewhat in doubt with the tran-
sition  of  many  measurements  from  NASA  research  mode  to  an  operational  mode 
under  NPOESS  by  NOAA  and  DOD.  In  particular,  the  requirements  for  long-term 
climate data records (e.g., consistency across time and across satellite platforms) can 
be  more  demanding  than  those  for  operational  needs,  and  it  is  not  clear  that  the 
appropriate investments are being made within NPOESS. 

Question 3. What are the potential impacts of some of the currently proposed cli-
mate change mitigation strategies on the marine environment—such as iron stimu-
lated plankton blooms or injection of CO2 into sea sediments? 

Answer.  Ocean  iron  fertilization  has  been  proposed  as  a  carbon  mitigation  strat-
egy because phytoplankton growth is limited by the availability of the trace nutrient 
iron  in  some  oceanic  regions.  As  indicated  by  the  results  from  about  a  dozen  delib-
erate experiments, adding iron causes the plant-like phytoplankton to bloom, draw-
ing  down  seawater  carbon  dioxide  levels.  What  is  not  clear,  however,  is  the  long- 
term  fate  of  the  newly  formed  organic  matter.  If  this  material  is  converted  back  to 
carbon  dioxide  in  the  surface  ocean  by  respiration,  the  net  effect  on  ocean  carbon 
storage will be small. If on the other hand some of the carbon is transported to the 
deep  ocean,  iron  fertilization  could  act  to  sequester  carbon  and  lower  atmospheric 
carbon dioxide levels. 

Several concerns have been raised about the potential impacts of iron fertilization: 
1. To be effective, iron fertilization must alter ecosystem dynamics, and the en-
vironmental  consequences  on  other  parts  of  the  food  web  are  not  well  under-
stood.  For  example,  how  will  iron  fertilization  effect  fisheries?  Will  it  increase 
the  likelihood  of  harmful  algal  blooms?  Because  of  ocean  circulation,  the  envi-
ronmental  impacts  of  iron  fertilization  may  arise  either  locally  near  the 
fertilizationsite or non-locally downstream. 
2. Iron fertilization may stimulate the production and release to the atmosphere 
of  other  climate  greenhouse  such  as  nitrous  oxide  and  methane.  Since  these 
gases  are  much  more  potent  greenhouse  gases  on  a  per  molecule  basis,  the  re-
lease  of  these  gases  may  greatly  decrease  the  effectiveness  of  iron  fertilization 
as a mitigation approach. 
3. Increased carbon export to mid and deep-ocean could decrease subsurface ox-
ygen levels, increasing the size of oxygen minimum zones. 

Two other proposed carbon mitigation strategies include direct injection of carbon 
dioxide into the deep ocean water column or into deep-sea sediments. Deep-sea sedi-
ment injection would have local impacts on benthic (bottom) and water-column eco-
systems because of the infrastructure required for injection. If the leakage of carbon 
dioxide  into  the  overlying  seawater  can  be  minimized,  the  environmental  con-
sequences on the ocean water column will be relatively small. Direct injection of car-
bon dioxide into the ocean deep waters will result in a lowering of seawater pH and 
ocean  acidification.  Locally  around  the  injection  site  the  resulting  acidification  will 
be  much  larger  than  that  observed  in  the  upper  ocean.  Extrapolating  from  studies 
of  surface  species,  one  should  expect  significant  negative  impacts  on  calcifying  spe-
cies  (deep-sea  corals,  mollusks).  Some  studies  suggest  only  minimal  acute  (short- 
term)  effects  on  fish;  less  clear  are  the  longer-term,  chronic  effects.  There  will  also 
be  local  dissolution  of  carbonate  bottom  sediments.  Some  injection  schemes  involve 
pumping  down  liquid  carbon  dioxide,  which  is  heavier  than  seawater  and  will  form 
concentrated  pools  along  the  ocean  bottom.  Benthic  life  will  be  destroyed  under-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

69 

neath  the  liquid  carbon  dioxide  pools,  but  the  effected  area  would  be  considerably 
smaller  than  if  the  carbon  dioxide  were  dispersed  in  the  seawater.  The  environ-
mental  impacts  will  depend  upon  the  extent  to  which  the  liquid  carbon  dioxide 
mixes into the overlying seawater. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

SCOTT C. DONEY, PH.D. 

Question  1.  According  to  NOAA,  about  4,000  species  of  fish,  including  approxi-
mately  half  of  all  federally-managed  fisheries,  depend  on  coral  reefs  and  related 
habitats for a portion of their life cycles, and the National Marine Fisheries Service 
estimates that the value of U.S. fisheries from coral reefs exceeds $100 million. Will 
corals and plankton be able to survive or adapt to more acidic waters in our oceans? 
Answer.  Our  current  information  on  the  impacts  of  ocean  acidification  is  based 
almost  entirely  on  short-term  (days  to  months)  studies  of  shell  forming  plants  and 
animals to large increases in carbon dioxide. Higher CO2 will affect other organisms 
(non-shell  forming  plankton,  juvenile  fish,  etc.)  but  there  is  considerably  less  data 
on  non-calcareous  (shell  forming)  organisms.  Most  of  the  experiments  to  date  have 
been  conducted  either  in  the  laboratory  or  in  small  controlled  conditions  (for  exam-
ple,  outdoor  seawater  tanks  or  floating  tethered  bags  filled  with  seawater).  The  ob-
served  effects  of  acidification  include  decreased  calcification  rates  (slower  shell-for-
mation),  reduced  growth  rates,  and  in  some  cases  reduced  reproduction  rates.  Ex-
trapolating  from  those  results  to  the  ocean,  where  the  rise  in  carbon  dioxide  will 
be more gradual, involves considerable uncertainties. 

The ability of calcifying organisms to survive or adapt to high CO2 conditions like-
ly  varies  from  group  to  group.  Some  types  of  organisms,  such  as  phytoplanktonic 
coccolithophores,  have  species  or  ecotypes  that  can  survive  without  a  calcareous 
shell,  and  under  high  CO2 conditions  the  population  may  shift  toward  the  non-cal-
careous  variants.  The  shells  of  other  groups  of  calcareous  organisms  such  as 
pteropods  (planktonic  marine  mollusks)  and  most  corals  appear  to  be  integral  to 
their life history. Most organisms experience variations in seawater chemistry natu-
rally  due  to  seasonal  cycles  and  year  to  year  variability.  It  is  not  well  known  the 
degree  to  which  organisms  may  possess  mechanisms  to  adapt  to  small  levels  of 
acidification or the extent to which those mechanisms would be effective (even over 
decadal  time-scales)  against  the  significant  levels  of  acidification  projected  by  the 
middle  to  end  of  this  century.  A  recent  study  (Fine  and  Tcernov,  Science,  Vol.  315, 
page 1811, 2007) showed that a Scleractinian coral species could grow as individual 
polyps without shells at high CO2 levels; while this demonstrates survival to acidifi-
cation,  the  ecological  impact  of  these  naked  polyps  would  be  dramatic  as  they  no 
longer would contribute to reef formation. 

Question  1a.  If  they  cannot,  what  are  the  implications  for  other  marine  species 

and the ocean’s food chain? 

Answer. Calcareous organisms are important components of ocean food webs, and 
the reductions in calcareous organisms due to acidification likely will have broad ec-
ological  effects.  The  gradual  build-up  of  warm-water  coral  skeletons  produces  reefs 
that  provide  habitat  for  some  of  the  richest  marine  ecosystems  on  the  planet.  The 
size  of  reefs  reflect  a  dynamic  balance  between  calcium  carbonate  production  that 
adds to the reef and loss processes (storms, human reef destruction, etc.) High CO2 
conditions  will  likely  shift  the  balance  and  may  cause  a  reduction  in  the  size  of 
reefs. Similar decreasing trends for cold-water corals would result in habitat loss on 
the  continental  shelf  and  slope  in  temperate  to  polar  latitudes.  Planktonic  cal-
careous  organisms  play  important  roles  as  prey  for  larger  species.  For  example 
pteropods  (small  planktonic  snails),  which  are  abundant  in  the  North  Pacific  and 
Southern  Ocean,  are  eaten  by  fish  (e.g.,  salmon)  and  baleen  whales.  At  present  it 
is  not  clear  how  the  impacts  of  acidification  will  filter  through  the  rest  of  the  eco-
system  and  whether  and  how  predator  species  will  adjust  to  the  loss  calcareous 
prey. 

Question  1b.  Species  have  migrated  in  response  to  ocean  temperature  changes. 

Will marine organisms migrate to avoid acidification? 

Answer.  The  ranges  for  calcifying  species  are  expected  to  shift  in  response  to 
acidification.  Most  experiments  show  that  organisms  are  sensitive  to  the  carbonate 
ion concentration and the saturation state for carbonate minerals, both of which de-
crease  as  pH  declines.  Seawater  carbonate  chemistry  varies  with  temperature,  and 
under present conditions saturation decreases as one moves poleward. Under a high 
CO2 world,  species  ranges  therefore  would  have  to  shift  equatorward  to  maintain 
the  same  saturation  state.  In  contrast,  global  warming  will  drive  species  ranges 
poleward. One concern is that the opposing forces of warming and acidification will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

eliminate  the  combined  temperature  and  saturation  state  niches  to  which  some  or-
ganisms are adapted. 

70 

Question  2.  There  have  been  ocean  acidification  events  in  the  past  that  have  re-
sulted  in  the  disappearance  of  marine  organisms,  including  corals.  What  does  the 
fossil  record  reveal  about  the  adaptation  of  marine  organisms  to  changes  in  ocean 
acidification? 

Answer. Several different lines of geological evidence suggest that ocean seawater 
carbonate chemistry has varied in the past in response to alterations in atmospheric 
carbon dioxide levels and variations in the weathering rates on land and deposition 
rates of carbonate minerals in the ocean. Several processes buffer (damp) ocean pH 
variations  on  the  gradual  time-scales  of  several  thousand  to  several  hundreds  of 
thousands  of  years  that  characterize  many  geological  changes.  The  current  rate  of 
ocean  acidification  is  many  times  that  of  prehistoric  rates  and  because  of  the  slow 
time-scales  of  ocean  buffering  the  pH  changes  over  the  next  several  centuries  may 
be  much  larger  than  those  experienced  throughout  most  of  the  geological  record. 
Ocean  pH  levels  have  already  dropped  by  0.1  since  the  preindustrial  period,  com-
parable to the pH change thought to have occurred between glacial and interglacial 
cycles,  and  an  additional  pH  decrease  of  0.14¥0.35  may  occur  by  the  end  of  this 
century. 

Past analogues to present acidification may have occurred in several catastrophic 
events in the geological record where it appears that large amounts of carbon diox-
ide  were  released  rapidly  into  the  atmosphere-ocean  system,  resulting  in  ocean 
acidification and dramatic reductions in marine carbonate burial. The more extreme 
episodes  are  associated  with  minor  to  major  biological  extinction  events,  which  be-
cause  of  the  way  the  geological  time-scale  was  originally  developed  using 
paleofossils,  often  fall  at  the  boundaries  of  geological  periods.  A  number  of 
hypotheses  have  been  proposed  (e.g.,  isolated  refuges)  for  why  some  species  (or 
groups of species) survive these acidification events and others do not, but the exact 
reasons are not well understood. 

Question  2a.  How  long  did  it  take  for  corals  and  other  marine  organisms  to  re-

cover from the acidification events in the past? 

Answer. The recovery time-scales to past geological events most likely were deter-
mined  by  both  biology  and  geochemistry.  One  of  the  best  documented  events  oc-
curred  during  the  Paleocene-Eocene  thermal  maximum  (PETM)  about  55  million 
years  ago.  The  PETM  is  marked  by  rapid  increases  in  temperature  and  alterations 
in the ocean carbonate system over about 1,000 to 10,000 years followed by a more 
gradual relaxation over several hundred thousand years. A large acidification event 
throws off the balance of alkalinity input and removal from the ocean, and the hun-
dred thousand year relaxation timescale can be explained as the amount of time re-
quired  for  the  ocean  alkalinity  cycle  to  come  back  into  balance  through  carbonate 
and  silicate  weathering  on  land.  There  is  only  a  limited  fossil  record  to  reconstruct 
what  happened  to  calcifying  organisms  during  the  PETM  because  carbonate  sedi-
ments are not buried under acidic conditions. Following the PETM, there was a bio-
logical radiation of calcifying organisms. 

Question 3. Dr. Feely indicates in his statement that ‘‘the atmospheric concentra-
tion of carbon dioxide is now higher than experienced on Earth for at least 800,000 
years  and  is  expected  to  continue  to  rise*the  oceans  are  absorbing  increasing 
amounts of carbon dioxide . . . and the chemical changes in seawater resulting from 
the  absorption  of  carbon  dioxide  are  lowering  seawater  pH.’’  Have  scientists  deter-
mined a dangerous level of pH that we need to avoid? 

Answer.  A  report  from  the  German  Advisory  Council  on  Global  Change  (WBGU) 
recommends that the surface seawater pH decrease from preindustrial conditions be 
limited to 0.2 pH units or less on scales of either individual ocean basins or the glob-
al  average  (Schubert  et  al.,  2006).  Estimates  are  that  surface  pH  has  already  de-
creased  by  0.1  since  the  preindustrial  (30  percent  drop  in  H∂ concentration);  a  pH 
drop of 0.2 would result in a 60 percent decline in H∂ concentration. Lower pH in-
creases  the  solubility  of  calcium  carbonate  minerals  (aragonite  and  calcite)  making 
it  more  difficult  for  marine  organisms  to  make  shells,  and  the  rationale  used  by 
Schubert et al., 2006 is that we should avoid a pH drop large enough to drive arago-
nite  understaturated  in  surface  water  (aragonite  is  the  more  soluble  mineral  form 
used  by  corals  and  pteropods).  The  0.2  pH  criteria  is  set  by  the  surface  waters  of 
the Southern Ocean, which are already close to undersaturation. 
R.  Schubert  R.,  H.-J.  Schellnhuber,  N.  Buchmann,  A.  Epiney,  R.  GrieΒhammer, 
M.  Kulessa,  D.  Messner,  S.  Rahmstorf,  J.  Schmid,  2006:  The  Future  Oceans— 
Warming  up,  Rising  High,  Turning  Sour,  Special  Report  from  German  Advisory 
Council  on  Global  Change  (WBGU),  ISBN  3–936191–14–X,  http://www.wbgu.de 
110 pp. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

365 (2003). 

Question 3a. At the current rate of carbon dioxide emissions, how long will it take 

for the oceans to reach a dangerous level of pH? 

71 

Question 3b. Have scientists determined at what level of carbon dioxide concentra-

tions we need to maintain in order to avoid this dangerous level of pH? 

Answer.  Few  model  simulations  have  been  run  with  constant  present-day  emis-
sions so question b) is a little difficult to answer directly. Rather most model simula-
tions have been conducted either with either IPCC scenarios of carbon dioxide emis-
sions or atmospheric carbon dioxide stabilization trajectories. Orr et al., 2005 report 
that  the  0.2  pH  criteria  would  be  reached  and  wide-spread  aragonite  undersatura-
tion would occur in the Southern Ocean with IPCC business as usual emission sce-
narios between 2060–2075. Based on scenarios to stabilize atmospheric carbon diox-
ide  by  2100,  Calderia  and  Wickett  found  that  a  carbon  dioxide  stabilization  target 
of 540 ppm would lead to a global surface pH drop of 0.23, exceeding the 0.2 criteria. 
A  carbon  dioxide  target  of  450  ppm  would  lead  to  a  global  drop  of  0.17  pH  units. 
Caldeira,  K.  and  Wickett,  M.E.  Anthropogenic  carbon  and  ocean  pH.  Nature  425, 

Orr,  J.C.,  V.J.  Fabry,  O.  Aumont,  L.  Bopp,  S.C.  Doney,  R.A.  Feely,  A. 
Gnanadesikan,  N.  Gruber,  A.  Ishida,  F.  Joos,  R.M.  Key,  K.  Lindsay,  E.  Maier- 
Reimer,  R.  Matear,  P.  Monfray,  A.  Mouchet,  R.G.  Najjar,  G.-K.  Plattner,  K.B.  Rod-
gers,  C.L.  Sabine,  J.L.  Sarmiento,  R.  Schlitzer,  R.D.  Slater,  I.J.  Totterdell,  M.-F. 
Weirig, Y. Yamanaka, and A. Yool, 2005: Anthropogenic ocean acidification over the 
twenty-first  century  and  its  impact  on  marine  calcifying  organisms,  Nature,  437, 
681–686, doi: 10.1038/nature04095. 

Question  4.  In  light  of  the  latest  findings  published  last  month  in  the  journal 
Science  in  which  the  biological  consumption  and  remineralization  of  carbon  in  the 
‘‘twilight  zone’’—a  zone  in  the  ocean  where  some  sunlight  reaches  but  not  enough 
for  photosynthesis  to  occur  at  ocean  depths  between  about  660–3300  feet—actually 
reduces  the  efficiency  of  sequestration  (Buesseler,  et  al.,  Science  316,  567,  2007). 
What  does  this  mean  for  the  future  of  carbon  sequestration  in  our  ocean  if  carbon 
is  recycled  back  into  the  surface  ocean  and  atmosphere  faster  than  originally 
thought? 

Answer. Ocean scientists have known for several decades that much of the partic-
ulate  organic  matter  that  sinks  out  of  the  surface  layer  is  consumed  in  the 
mesopelagic  (300–3,300  feet  depth  in  the  ocean).  One  metric  used  to  evaluate  this 
consumption  is  the  respiration  or  remineralization  length-scale,  a  measure  of  how 
vary  down  the  water  column  an  average  particle  sinks  before  it  is  consumed  and 
the organic carbon turned back into dissolved inorganic carbon. The Buesseler et al., 
study  in  Science  magazine  examined  two  regions,  a  low  productivity  region  off  of 
Hawaii and a higher productivity region off Japan. They deployed a new instrument 
(a floating sediment trap) that should reduces biases in estimates of sinking particle 
flux.  The  major  new  contribution  of  the  paper  was  to  better  elucidate  that  the 
length-scale  for  organic  carbon  differs  from  region  to  region.  The  length-scale  near 
Hawaii  was  quite  short  (most  of  the  sinking  material  was  consumed  in  the  upper 
water-column,  while  the  length-scale  off  Japan  was  longer  (a  larger  fraction  of  the 
material sank deeper in the water column). 

So far the experiment has been conducted at two sites and for relatively short pe-
riods of time (a few weeks). The findings do not necessarily imply that organic car-
bon  is  recycled  shallower  in  the  water  column  than  was  previously  thought  as  the 
results  from  the  two  sites  bracket  the  standard  length-scale  estimate  derived  from 
previous  studies.  These  results  do  have  implications  for  ocean  biological  carbon  se-
questration strategies in that in order to compute the effectiveness of a fertilization 
experiment,  one  likely  needs  to  better  understand  both  the  surface  water  and  sub-
surface ecosystems. 

Question  4a.  Do  scientists  know  how  much  carbon  sequestered  to  the  deep  ocean 

is being overestimated? 

Answer.  The  Buesseler  et  al.,  results  do  not  change  global  average  estimates  of 
the carbon consumption rate with depth, which have been computed on large-scales 
(entire  ocean  basins)  by  geochemical  techniques;  the  findings  do  suggest  that  there 
may  be  more  spatial  and  temporal  variability  in  the  effectiveness  of  consumption. 
Question  4b.  How  has  this  changed  what  scientists  think  about  how  long  carbon 
dioxide will be naturally sequestered and how long it will take material to resurface 
from the twilight zone? 

Answer. More field data from a diverse set of locations (and over the full seasonal 
cycle)  will  need  to  be  collected  before  this  question  can  be  addressed  with  any  con-
fidence.  Currently  the  results  bracket  prior  estimates  and  thus  there  is  no  imme-
diate  reason  to  think  that  our  present  understanding  of  the  ocean  carbon  system 
is too greatly wrong. The Buesseler data does suggest that there is great spatial and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

72 

temporal  heterogeneity  in  remineralization  length-scales.  Such  data  may  also  help 
us better characterize the underlying mechanisms driving subsurface organic matter 
consumption,  and  important  factor  if  we  are  to  understand  how  the  ocean  carbon 
system may change with evolving climate. 

Question  5.  It  is  essential  to  start  a  global  research  and  monitoring  program  for 
ocean  acidification.  We  should  be  utilizing  the  observing  systems  already  in  place 
including  the  undersea  research  program.  What  are  your  recommendations  for  uti-
lizing  the  current  infrastructure  of  ocean  observing  systems  and  satellites  to  mon-
itor ocean acidification? 

Answer. The current ocean observing system has only limited capabilities to mon-
itor  ocean  acidification  directly  but  can  be  enhanced  with  targeted  investments.  At 
present  there  is  a  large  in-water  observing  system  to  measure  ocean  physical  vari-
ables.  For  example,  the  Argo  global  array  of  profiling  floats  of  greater  than  2,800 
instruments  now  routinely  measures  temperature  and  salinity  of  the  upper  1,000 
meters (3,300 feet) of the ocean. There is an international network that uses volun-
teer observing ships (cargo freighters, research vessels) and some moorings to meas-
ure  surface  ocean  carbon  dioxide  levels.  But  the  spatial  and  temporal  coverage  is 
much  more  restricted  than  the  physical  observing  network,  any  many  cases  pH  is 
not measured directly, and the measurements are typically limited to the upper few 
meters  of  the  water  column.  The  U.S.  and  international  CLIVAR  CO2 and  Repeat 
Hydrography Program surveys subsurface pH and ocean carbonate variables but on 
only  a  limited  number  of  transects  and  on  a  time-scale  of  one  occupation  of  each 
transect approximately every 10 years. Even larger gaps exist for monitoring pH in 
coastal waters, where the requirements for high density measurements are great be-
cause there are larger variations in space and time. There are pilot efforts underway 
within  NOAA  Coral  Reef  Watch  program  to  instrument  several  coral  reefs  for  rou-
tine that would serve as a model for other regions. Given concerns with ocean acidi-
fication, the ocean network of chemical and biological measurements needs to be ex-
panded in scale (e.g., by using autonomous drifters and profiling floats) and in scope 
by including pH measurements and other relevant variables related to biological re-
sponses  to  acidification  (e.g.,  calcification  rates;  particulate  calcium  carbonate  con-
centrations, etc.). To do this, we need to invest now in the development and testing 
of new sensors to routinely measure seawater chemistry and biology on autonomous 
platforms. 

Satellite remote sensing cannot measure ocean pH directly but does provide a host 
of  valuable  information  for  assessing  ocean  acidification  and  its  biological  impacts 
that complements the information available from in-water sensors. Satellite sensors 
can  be  used  to  locate  and  access  the  size  of  coral  reefs.  Blooms  of  planktonic 
coccolithophores  (a  phytoplankton  group  with  calcium  carbonate  shells)  can  also  be 
measured  from  space  under  some  conditions.  Satellites  provide  a  regional  context 
for  in-water  measurements  because  satellites  often  measure  ocean  properties  over 
a wider window in space and time. Data analysis methods are also being developed 
for  estimating  surface  water  chemistry  based  on  empirical  relationships  with  phys-
ical  and  biological  variables  that  can  be  measured  from  space  (e.g.,  temperature, 
chlorophyll) or estimated from ocean numerical models. The U.S. needs to maintain 
and  extend  the  capability  to  monitor  ocean  trends  from  space  using  satellite-based 
remote  sensing.  For  ocean  biology,  sensors  measuring  ocean  color  have  been  used 
to map the occurance and distribution of coccolithophore blooms from space. We will 
soon  have  10  years  of  data  from  the  NASA  and  GEOEYE  SeaWiFS  sensor.  The  fu-
ture  of  U.S.  ocean  color  remote  sensing  and  other  routine  satellite  ocean  measure-
ments is somewhat in doubt with the transition of many measurements from NASA 
research mode to an operational mode under NPOESS by NOAA and DOD. In par-
ticular, the requirements for long-term climate data records (e.g., consistency across 
time  and  across  satellite  platforms)  can  be  more  demanding  than  those  for  oper-
ational  needs,  and  it  is  not  clear  that  the  appropriate  investments  are  being  made 
within  NPOESS.  We  also  need  to  extend  the  capabilities  of  ocean  remote  sensing 
with  new  sensors  focused  on  detecting  changes  in  the  ecological  community  (which 
species  are  present)  and  plankton  physiology  and  targeting  coastal  and  coral  reef 
environments, which require high spatial resolution. 

Question  5a.  What  information  can  be  gained  from  monitoring  natural  variations 

over a long time period of time and in several different oceanic regions? 

Answer.  Ocean  pH  and  related  environmental  conditions  vary  naturally  in  time 
(event scales such as storms, seasons, year to year variability) and in space (because 
of changes in temperature, upwelling of subsurface carbon rich water, and biological 
photosynthesis  and  carbon  drawdown).  A  better  understanding  of  the  magnitude  of 
those  changes  and  the  resulting  biological  responses  is  critical  to  unraveling  the 
mechanisms  by  which  acidification  impacts  ocean  ecosystems.  Consistent  long  term 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

73 

records of pH trends and biological responses (e.g., calcification rates) would provide 
data  to  evaluate  and  test  the  climate  models  used  to  make  future  forecasts.  More 
robust models would provide increased confidence to the decisionmakers and stake-
holders using these forecasts. Better monitoring also would allow scientists to iden-
tify the environmental conditions under which calcifying organisms grow today and 
the extent to which present acidification and natural variations are already impact-
ing  calcifying  organisms  and  whole  ecosystems.  Together  with  targeted  laboratory 
experiments and field process studies, a monitoring network will help elucidate the 
ability of organisms to adapt to acidification and the changes that will occur to other 
parts of the ocean food web if calcifying organisms are harmed by acidification. 

Question  6.  This  year  I  requested  funding  through  the  Appropriations  Sub-
committee on Commerce, Justice, Science to fund the National Research Council re-
port  on  ocean  acidification  mandated  by  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation 
and  Management  Reauthorization  Act.  Has  NOAA  yet  identified  the  compelling  re-
search needs for this study? 

Answer.  I  am  not  aware  that  NOAA  has  finalized  the  scope  of  the  proposed  Na-
tional  Research  Council  report  on  ocean  acidification,  and  if  they  have  done  so  the 
research needs have not been made widely known to the public. 
Question 6a. If so, what are the research needs for this report? 
Answer. One concern is that if not properly framed the NOAA sponsored NRC re-
port could be too narrowly focused solely on the needs and mission of a single agen-
cy  (NOAA)  and  neglect  the  opportunities  offered  by  an  integrated,  multi-agency 
strategy for ocean acidification. The U.S. scientific community has devoted consider-
able thought and effort into defining the most compelling and urgent research needs 
with  regards  to  ocean  acidification.  These  research  needs  are  well  articulated  in  a 
recent  report  from  a  workshop  sponsored  by  the  NSF,  NOAA,  and  USGS  (Kleypas 
et al., 2006). The recommendations of this report on the major scientific issues that 
should be pursued over the next 5–10 years include: 

ment, by combining laboratory experiments with field studies; 

• ‘‘Determine  the  calcification  response  to  elevated  CO2 in  benthic  calcifiers  such 
as  corals  (including  cold-water  corals),  coralline  algae,  foraminifera,  molluscs, 
and  echinoderms;  and  in  planktonic  calcifiers  such  as  coccolithophores,  forami-
nifera, and shelled pteropods; 
• Discriminate  the  various  mechanisms  of  calcification  within  calcifying  groups, 
through physiological experiments, to better understand the cross-taxa range of 
responses to changing seawater chemistry; 
• Determine  the  interactive  effects  of  multiple  variables  that  affect  calcification 
and  dissolution  in  organisms  (saturation  state,  light,  temperature,  nutrients) 
through  continued  experimental  studies  on  an  expanded  suite  of  calcifying 
groups; 
• Establish  clear  links  between  laboratory  experiments  and  the  natural  environ-
• Characterize  the  diurnal  and  seasonal  cycles  of  the  carbonate  system  on  coral 
reefs,  including  commitment  to  long-term  monitoring  of  the  system  response  to 
continued increases in CO2; 
• In concert with above, monitor in situ calcification and dissolution in planktonic 
and  benthic  organisms,  with  better  characterization  of  the  key  environmental 
controls on calcification; 
• Incorporate  ecological  questions  into  observations  and  experiments;  e.g.,  how 
does  a  change  in  calcification  rate  affect  the  ecology  and  survivorship  of  an  or-
ganism?  How  will  ecosystem  functions  differ  between  communities  with  and 
without calcifying species? 
• Improve the accounting of coral reef and open ocean carbonate budgets through 
combined  measurements  of  seawater  chemistry,  CaCO3 production,  dissolution 
and  accumulation,  and,  in  near-shore  environments,  bioerosion  and  offshelf  ex-
port of CaCO3; 
• Quantify  and  parameterize  the  mechanisms  that  contribute  to  the  carbonate 
system,  through  biogeochemical  and  ecological  modeling,  and  apply  such  mod-
eling to guide future sampling and experimental efforts; 
• Develop protocols for the various methodologies used in seawater chemistry and 

calcification measurements.’’ 

Kleypas, J.A., R.A. Feely, V.J. Fabry, C. Langdon, C.L. Sabine, and L.L. Robbins, 
2006.  Impacts  of  Ocean  Acidification  on  Coral  Reefs  and  Other  Marine  Calcifiers: 
A  Guide  for  Future  Research,  report  of  a  workshop  held  18–20  April  2005,  St.  Pe-
tersburg, FL, sponsored by NSF, NOAA, and the U.S. Geological Survey, 88 pp. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

occurs? 

74 

Question  7.  About  one-third  of  all  man-made  carbon  dioxide  emissions  are  ab-
sorbed into the ocean. However, at a certain point the oceans may no longer be able 
to  absorb  carbon  dioxide  at  the  same  rate.  If  this  happens,  warming  of  the  atmos-
phere  will  increase  even  more  rapidly.  Are  we  close  to  seeing  the  rate  that  the 
oceans absorb carbon dioxide slow down to a point that our global temperatures in-
crease even faster? 

Answer.  Several  factors  may  decrease  the  future  effectiveness  of  the  ocean  sink 
for  anthropogenic  carbon  dioxide.  The  chemical  buffer  capacity  of  seawater  de-
creases  as  the  levels  of  inorganic  carbon  increase.  Warming  reduces  the  solubility 
of carbon dioxide. Surface warming and increased vertical stratification are also ex-
pected  to  slow  ocean  circulation,  which  will  reduce  oceanic  carbon  dioxide  uptake. 
Carbon dioxide uptake would also decline if the ocean deep-water circulation in the 
North Atlantic were to slow dramatically. In numerical models, most of these factors 
decrease  ocean  carbon  dioxide  uptake  rates  gradually  with  time.  Some  effects  are 
already being felt, and their influence will grow with time with global warming and 
rising atmospheric carbon dioxide. 

Question  7a.  How  does  temperature  affect  the  rate  at  which  ocean  acidification 

Answer. The dominant factor in ocean acidification is the increase in the amount 
of  dissolved  inorganic  carbon  in  seawater.  Some  researchers  have  explored  the  im-
pacts  of  climate  change  on  ocean  acidification,  finding  relatively  small  impacts  rel-
ative  to  the  signal  from  increasing  dissolved  inorganic  carbon.  Temperature  plays 
a key role in determining the chemical impact of acidification. The saturation state 
of  carbonate  minerals  in  seawater  depends  on  temperature.  The  saturation  state  of 
colder  waters  starts  off  lower  than  in  warmer  waters  and  will  become  under-satu-
rated with respect to carbonate minerals before warmer waters. 

Question  7b.  The  Arctic  Ocean  is  becoming  warmer  and  fresher  which  may  slow 
down thermohaline circulation. What are the implications of these changes on ocean 
acidification? 

Answer. Climate change is expected to warm and freshen the surface ocean in the 
Arctic and reduce sea-ice cover. The increased vertical stratification will reduce the 
transport of anthropogenic carbon dioxide into intermediate and deep-waters in the 
Arctic,  reducing  the  influence  of  ocean  acidification  in  mid-  to  deep-waters.  In  con-
trast, reduced sea-ice will enhance surface gas exchange, surface water levels of an-
thropogenic carbon dioxide and acidification. 

Question 7c. How does the increase in atmospheric carbon dioxide and subsequent 
warming  affect  atmospheric  and  oceanic  circulation?  Will  the  increase  in  atmos-
pheric and ocean temperatures result in more frequent El Nin˜ o’s and intense hurri-
cane seasons? 

Answer.  This  a  wide-ranging  and  complex  question  at  the  heart  of  a  large  re-
search  effort  on  climate  change  research  within  the  U.S.  and  internationally.  A 
broad-brush  picture  of  the  expected  changes  in  ocean  and  atmosphere  circulation 
are  given  in  the  4th  IPCC  Assessment  Report  that  was  recently  released  (IPCC, 
2007).  A  major  factor  is  that  global  warming  of  the  surface  ocean  will  inject  more 
water  vapor  into  the  atmosphere,  strengthening  the  planetary  water  cycle  and  po-
tentially providing more energy for storms. The Arctic and land surfaces will warm 
faster than the ocean, altering the temperature gradients that drive atmospheric cir-
culation and winds. The Arctic will experience a reduction in sea-ice cover, particu-
larly in summer, and a general warming and freshening of surface waters. Warming 
of  the  upper-ocean  and  inputs  of  additional  freshwater  at  high  latitudes  will  tend 
to  increase  vertical  stratification  of  the  upper  water  column  and  slow  exchange  be-
tween surface and subsurface water masses. Altered wind patterns will also change 
the location and strength of coastal and open-ocean upwelling. 

According  to  the  Summary  for  Policy  Makers  for  Working  Group  I,  the  following 

more specific trends are expected: 

• heat  extremes,  heat  waves  and  heavy  precipitation  events  will  become  more 

likely; 

• tropical  cyclones  (hurricanes  and  typhoons)  will  likely  be  more  intense  with 
larger  peak  wind  speeds;  there  is  still  considerable  debate  about  whether  the 
number of tropical storms will change; 

• the  stormtracks  for  extratropical  storms  are  likely  to  move  poleward,  altering 

precipitation patterns; 

• the  amount  of  precipitation  will  likely  increase  at  high  latitudes  and  decrease 

at subtropical latitudes; the latter may exacerbate subtropical droughts; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

75 

• the meridional overturning circulation and deep water formation in the Atlantic 
will likely decrease but it is very unlikely to undergo an abrupt transition over 
this century. 

There  is  less  confidence  in  predictions  of  expected  changes  in  ocean  and  atmos-
phere circulation on more regional scales because the model forecasts differ from cli-
mate model to climate model. 

Question 7d. Which ocean regions will be first to experience large changes in car-

bonate chemistry? How long before large changes occur? 

Answer.  The  entire  surface  ocean  is  already  experiencing  changes  in  carbonate 
chemistry,  and  these  trends  will  increase  approximately  in  step  with  rising  atmos-
pheric  CO2 concentrations.  When  anthropogenic  CO2 dissolves  in  seawater  it  de-
creases  pH,  increases  the  partial  pressure  of  carbon  dioxide  (pCO2),  and  increases 
the concentration of dissolved inorganic carbon (DIC, the sum of all of the different 
inorganic forms of carbon dioxide, carbonic acid, and its acid-base dissociation prod-
ucts).  Except  in  regions  of  seasonal  and  permanent  ice-cover,  the  positive  trend  in 
surface water pCO2 and DIC appears to approximately track the rise in atmospheric 
CO2 levels  following  solubility  equilibrium  relationships.  The  magnitude  of  the  pH 
change  depends  upon  the  buffering  capacity  of  seawater;  more  rapid  pH  changes 
occur  in  colder  waters  and  waters  with  higher  DIC  and  pCO2 levels  for  the  same 
size incremental addition of carbon dioxide. 

The  penetration  of  the  anthropogenic  carbon  dioxide  signal  into  the  subsurface 
ocean is controlled by ocean circulation. The concentrations of anthropogenic carbon 
and  perturbations  to  pH  tend  to  decrease  as  one  looks  down  the  water-column. 
About  half  of  all  the  anthropogenic  carbon  dioxide  is  found  in  the  upper  400  m 
(∼1,200 feet) of the water column. Elevated levels of anthropogenic carbon are found 
below  that  depth  in  the  lower  thermocline  (400–1000  meters  depth)  below  the  sur-
face water convergence zones of the subtropical gyres and Southern Ocean. Anthro-
pogenic  carbon  is  also  observed  below  the  thermocline  in  and  downstream  of  inter-
mediate  and  deep-water  formation  regions  in  the  northern  North  Atlantic  and 
Southern Ocean. 

Question 8. How will lower calcification rates, due to an increase in ocean acidifi-
cation,  higher  ocean  temperatures,  and  changes  in  nutrients  affect  ocean  carbon 
chemistry and carbon export rates? 

Answer.  Acidification  will  tend  to  reduce  the  calcification  in  the  upper  ocean,  the 
sinking  flux  (export)  of  particulate  inorganic  carbon,  and  the  remineralization  of 
particulate inorganic in the subsurface ocean. The effect of acidification on total bio-
logical  productivity  in  the  surface  ocean  may  be  about  neutral,  as  it  is  likely  that 
non-calcifying  organisms  may  be  able  to  replace  calcifying  phytoplankton  popu-
lations  that  are  diminished  due  to  acidification.  Organic  carbon  export  to  the  sub-
surface  ocean  via  sinking  particles  is  not  directly  proportional  to  biological  produc-
tivity, but depends upon the composition of the food web. Organic matter has a den-
sity similar to seawater, and there is evidence indicating that heavier ballast mate-
rials,  such  as  carbonate  shells,  increase  organic  matter  sinking  rates.  The  impact 
of reduced calcification on the export of organic carbon in the open ocean is less cer-
tain, but may also result in a reduction in export. 

Reduced inorganic export has the opposite effect as reduced organic carbon export 
on surface water chemistry and air-sea carbon fluxes. The formation of organic mat-
ter  lowers  seawater  dissolved  inorganic  carbon  (DIC)  and  lowers  the  partial  pres-
sure of carbon dioxide (pCO2), which governs the air-sea gas exchange of carbon di-
oxide.  A  reduction  in  organic  matter  export,  therefore,  would  reduce  the  effective-
ness  of  the  biological  pump  and  act  to  increase  surface  water  and  atmospheric  CO2 
thus  accelerating  climate  change.  The  formation  of  calcium  carbonate  (CaCO3)  or 
calcification  in  surface  waters  lowers  both  seawater  DIC  and  alkalinity  (a  measure 
of  the  acid-base  balance  of  seawater).  For  each  mole  of  CaCO3 removed,  DIC  drops 
by  1  mole  and  alkalinity  drops  by  2  moles.  Somewhat  counter  intuitively,  calcifi-
cation  increases  pCO2 because  the  effect  of  the  alkalinity  change  outweighs  that  of 
DIC.  Therefore  reduced  carbonate  export  would  act  to  decrease  surface  water  and 
atmospheric CO2 thus helping to ameliorate climate change. Preliminary model sim-
ulations, however, suggest that the calcification-alkalinity feedback mechanism pro-
vides only a small brake on increasing atmospheric carbon dioxide due to fossil fuel 
combustion. 

Question  9.  What  are  the  expected  changes  to  the  biological  pump—the  process 
which  transports  carbon  throughout  the  ocean—due  to  the  increase  in  carbon  diox-
ide and what will be the consequences of these changes? 

Answer. Rising atmospheric carbon dioxide has two major effects on the ocean bio-
logical  pump,  altered  ocean  physics  and  ocean  acidification.  The  impact  of  ocean 
acidification  is  addressed  in  the  answer  to  question  8  above.  Ocean  physics  will  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

76 

altered  because  of  carbon  dioxide  induced  global  warming  and  other  changes  in 
physical  climate.  Surface  warming  globally  and  larger  freshwater  inputs  at  mid-  to 
high-latitudes will increase the vertical stratification of the water column. 

Many  areas  of  the  tropical  and  subtropical  ocean  are  nutrient  limited,  and  in-
creased vertical stratification may decrease the supply nutrients to the upper ocean. 
In  these  areas,  biological  productivity  and  the  sinking  of  organic  particles,  which 
drives  the  biological  pump,  may  drop  because  of  the  reduced  nutrient  supply.  One 
possible  complication  is  nitrogen  fixation;  most  organisms  cannot  use  nitrogen  gas, 
but  a  small  number  can  convert  nitrogen  gas  into  an  organic  form  that  is  broadly 
usable.  Nitrogen  fixation  is  enhanced  in  warm,  stratified  waters  and  may  increase 
in  the  future  under  climate  warming.  Phytoplankton  in  some  regions  at  mid-  to 
high-latitude is currently light-limited because of deep mixing. Biological production 
and  particle  export  may  be  enhanced  in  these  areas  because  warming  and  fresh-
water inputs will reduce vertical mixing rates and thus light limitation. Model pro-
jections suggest that global ocean productivity may not change substantially. 

Question  10.  Fossil-fuel  use  is  also  increasing  the  amounts  of  nitric  and  sulfuric 
acid deposition in the oceans. How will these elements alter surface seawater alka-
linity and pH? 

Answer. Fossil fuel combustion releases reactive nitrogen and sulfur to the atmos-
phere.  Some  fraction  is  deposited  to  the  surface  ocean  as  nitric  and  sulfuric  acid, 
which  reduces  surface  seawater  alkalinity.  Agriculture  releases  reactive  nitrogen 
that  is  deposited  to  the  ocean  as  ammonia.  Because  of  biogeochemical  trans-
formations,  the  ammonia  input  also  leads  to  a  reduction  in  ocean  alkalinity.  The 
changes in surface seawater chemistry will lead to lower seawater pH levels. 

Question  10a.  Will  the  impacts  of  these  elements  differ  in  coastal  waters  versus 

open ocean and how may they affect marine ecosystems? 

Answer. The effects depend upon the deposition rates of reactive nitrogen and sul-
fur,  which  are  highest  in  coastal  regions  and  open-ocean  areas  downwind  of  the 
major source regions in eastern North America, western Europe, and south and east 
Asia. The effects of acidification from reactive nitrogen and sulfur deposition will be 
similar  to  that  caused  by  oceanic  uptake  of  fossil-fuel  carbon  dioxide.  Coastal  re-
gions may be more vulnerable to elevated acidification because of other human per-
turbations (local pollution, nutrient runoff, overfishing). Reactive nitrogen deposited 
from  the  atmosphere  will  also  stimulate  ocean  photosynthesis  because  nitrate  and 
ammonia are nutrients. Similar to excess nitrogen from river and groundwater run-
off, the resulting nutrient fertilization (eutrophication) may lead to low oxygen zones 
and blooms of harmful algae. 
Question 11. During the hearing a question was raised regarding the global aver-
age  increase  in  ocean  temperature  of  0.04°  C.  It  is  well  known  that  the  largest  in-
creases  in  ocean  temperature  are  in  the  surface  waters  and  this  plays  a  large  role 
in the Earth’s heat budget. Can you please explain how significant the warming has 
been  in  the  surface  waters  and  what  the  implications  have  been  for  increased  sea 
surface temperature as it relates to hurricane intensity, El Nin˜ o, drought, and other 
extreme weather events? Can you highlight different regions that have experienced 
large increases in surface water temperature and how much the surface waters have 
warmed? 

Answer. Ocean warming is indeed concentrated in the upper part of the water col-
umn.  The  global  average  temperature  increase  of  0.037  deg.  C  reported  by  Levitus 
et  al.,  2005  applies  to  a  depth  range  from  the  surface  to  3,000m  (∼10,000  feet)  for 
time  interval  of  (1994–98)  relative  to  (1955–59).  In  their  analysis,  they  also  report 
an  average  temperature  increase  almost  5  times  as  large  (0.171  deg.  C)  for  the 
upper water column 0–300m (∼1,000 feet) over the time period 1955–2003. As shown 
in a table below, Atlantic temperatures in the 0–300m depth range increased faster 
than the global trend. 

Sea surface temperature also increased at a rate comparable to or faster than the 
0–300m trend. Hansen et al., (2005) present a spatial map of the change in sea sur-
face temperature for the period (2001–2005) relative to a base period of 1951–1980. 
They find significant areas of the Atlantic, Indian Ocean and tropical Pacific where 
the sea surface temperature increased by between 0.4 to 0.8 deg. C. Examining mod-
ern  (2001–2005)  sea  surface  temperature  changes  relative  to  preindustrial  condi-
tions  (1870–1900)  reveals  warmer  sea  surface  temperatures  almost  everywhere  in 
the ocean, with larger regions showing temperature increases of more than 0.5 deg. 
C. 

Higher  sea  surface  temperatures  increase  the  transfer  of  heat  and  moisture  from 
the  ocean  to  the  atmosphere.  Higher  sea  surface  temperatures  have  been  proposed 
as  a  mechanism  for  strengthening  the  intensity  of  tropical  cyclones  (typhoons  and 
hurricanes),  and  variations  in  sea  surface  temperature  have  been  linked  to  periods 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

77 

of both drought and flooding on land. Future climate model projections suggest that 
increasing  sea  surface  temperature  and  climate  warming  will  drive  increased  pre-
cipitation  at  high  latitude,  decreased  precipitation  in  the  subtropics  (and  possible 
droughts)  and  a  general  increase  in  the  frequency  of  extreme  precipitation  events. 
The link between sea surface temperature and El Nin˜ o is somewhat more subtle as 
El Nin˜ o conditions in the tropical Pacific themselves results in elevated sea surface 
temperatures  in  the  tropical  Pacific  and  along  the  West  Coast  of  North  America. 
Through atmospheric teleconnections, El Nin˜ o events also alter sea surface tempera-
tures over much of the world ocean. 

Levitus,  S.,  J.  Antonov,  and  T.  Boyer  (2005),  Warming  of  the  world  ocean,  1955– 

2003, Geophys. Res. Lett., 32, L02604, doi: 10.1029/2004GL021592. 

Hansen,  J.,  M.  Sato,  R.  Ruedy,  K.  Lo,  D.W.  Lea,  and  M.  Medina-Elizade,  2006: 
Global temperature change, Proceedings of the National Academy of Science, 103, 

14288–14293, doi: 10.1073/pnas.0606291103. 

Table T1. Change in ocean mean temperature (deg. C) as determined by the linear 
trend for the world ocean and individual basins. (Levitus et al., 2005; supplementary 
material). 

Ocean basin 

Change in mean temperature 
0–300 m (1955–2003) (deg. C) 

World Ocean 

N. Hem. 
S. Hem. 

Atlantic 
N. Atl. 
S. Atl. 

Pacific 

N. Pac. 
S. Pac. 

Indian 

N. Ind. 
S. Ind. 

0.171 
0.188 
0.159 
0.297 
0.354 
0.233 
0.112 
0.093 
0.127 
0.150 
0.125 
0.154 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

RICHARD A. FEELY, PH.D. 

Question 1. I am pleased to learn that NOAA has been working with other agen-
cies, including NASA and NSF, to formalize a Federal research effort, including re-
search on ocean acidification. Could you describe the current Federal interagency re-
search program and how it might be strengthened? 

Answer.  While  there  is  no  formal  Federal  interagency  research  program,  NOAA 
and  other  Federal  agencies  (e.g.,  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  (USGS),  the  National 
Science Foundation (NSF), and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration 
(NASA))  are  currently  in  the  process  of  developing  a  formal  research  and/or  moni-
toring program to address ocean acidification. Over the past two decades, a number 
of  large-scale  international  ocean  research  programs  have  documented  global  in-
creases  in  the  amount  of  carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  in  the  world’s  oceans.  These  pro-
grams,  co-sponsored  by  NSF,  NOAA  and  the  Department  of  Energy,  include  the 
World  Ocean  Circulation  Experiment  (WOCE),  the  Joint  Global  Ocean  Flux  Study 
(JGOFS)  Global  CO2 Survey  and  the  CLIVAR/CO2 Repeat  Hydrography  Program. 
The increase in ocean CO2 concentrations and corresponding decreases in pH levels 
(ocean acidification) occur in direct response to rising levels of atmospheric CO2 and 
will  affect  some  of  the  most  fundamental  processes  of  the  sea  in  coming  decades. 
In recent years, the rapidly emerging issue of ocean acidification has garnered con-
siderable interest across the scientific community, and NOAA, NSF and NASA have 
been working to identify what existing capabilities can be better tailored to monitor 
and understand ocean acidification. NOAA and NSF have played an important joint 
role  in  identifying  the  current  extent  of  ocean  acidification  through  ocean  observa-
tions. NOAA has also been involved in using environmental models to forecast ocean 
acidification  levels  over  the  coming  century  under  a  variety  of  CO2 emission  sce-
narios,  and  has  begun  investigating  the  possible  ecosystem  consequences  through 
research studies. 

Detailed  in  the  following  discussion  is  an  overview  of  various  NOAA  programs, 
technologies,  and  research  efforts  that  have  yielded  findings  deemed  relevant  to 
ocean acidification or have recently been initiated with the intent of addressing the 
many  remaining  uncertainties  identified  by  the  scientific  community.  These  exam-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

78 

ples  include  some  description  of  current  Federal  interagency  efforts,  as  well  as  col-
laboration with non-Federal/academic institutions. 
NOAA Collaborative Workshops 

In  2005,  NOAA,  USGS,  and  NSF  jointly  sponsored  a  workshop  focused  on  ocean 
acidification, which resulted in a report entitled Impacts of Increasing Ocean Acidifi-
cation on Coral Reefs and Other Marine Calcifiers: A Guide for Future Research. The 
workshop  sought  to  summarize  existing  knowledge  on  ocean  acidification,  identify 
the  most  pressing  scientific  issues,  and  identify  future  research  strategies  over  the 
next 10 years. The report concluded that ocean acidification will significantly impact 
biological systems in the upper ocean with adverse responses being observed in most 
organisms  studied  that  rely  on  calcium  carbonate  to  build  their  skeletal  structures 
(calcifying  organisms  or  calcifiers;  e.g.,  corals).  The  report  also  identified  an  exten-
sive  list  of  remaining  knowledge  gaps  and  research  needs  with  regards  to  ocean 
acidification.  Among  the  list  offered  by  the  workshop  report  was  a  recommendation 
to better characterize the carbon chemistry on coral reefs, including long-term moni-
toring of the response of these sensitive ecosystems to ocean acidification. 
Observations Relevant to Ocean Acidification 
Global CO2 Surveys 

NOAA  has  contributed  to  several  international  and  national  research  programs 
that have offered important findings relevant to ocean acidification. These programs 
include  the  World  Ocean  Circulation  Experiment  (WOCE),  the  Joint  Global  Ocean 
Flux  Study  (JGOFS),  the  joint  NOAA/NSF  CLIVAR/CO2 Repeat  Hydrography  Pro-
gram, the Tropical Atmosphere Ocean (TAO) array, and the Global Ocean Observing 
System  (GOOS),  as  well  as  data  collected  through  NOAA-supported  hydrostations, 
mooring  stations,  and  vessel  observations.  These  research  programs  provide  the 
most  accurate  and  comprehensive  view  of  the  global  ocean  carbon  cycle  to  date. 
NOAA  funded  a  5-year  WOCE/JGOFS  data  analysis  effort  that  culminated  in 
NOAA’s  Pacific  Marine  Environmental  Lab  (PMEL)  lead-authoring  two  important 
Science  articles  highlighting  ocean  acidification  in  July  2004.  While  one  article  de-
tailed  the  ocean’s  role  as  an  important  sink  for  anthropogenic  carbon  dioxide, 
(Sabine  et  al.,  2004),  the  other  described  the  impact  that  this  additional  carbon  ex-
erts  on  the  ocean’s  chemistry  and  its  potential  long-term  consequences  for  marine 
ecosystems (Feely et al., 2004). 

Sabine  et  al.  (2004)  inventoried  the  amount  of  anthropogenic  CO2 (i.e.,  fossil-fuel 
and  cement-manufacturing  emissions  of  carbon  dioxide)  that  has  been  absorbed  by 
the  world’s  oceans.  Results  from  the  inventory  demonstrated  that  about  120  billion 
metric  tons  of  carbon  as  CO2 (roughly  half  of  the  fossil-fuel  CO2 released  since  the 
1800s)  has  been  absorbed  by  the  ocean.  Much  of  this  added  carbon  has  remained 
concentrated  in  surface  waters  as  the  mixing  rate  of  the  oceans  is  on  the  order  of 
several thousand years. 

In addition to the WOCE/JGOFS studies, NOAA, together with the Japan Agency 
for  Marine-earth  Science  and  Technology  and  France’s  L’Institut  de  recherche  pour 
le  de´veloppment,  has  jointly  funded  the  TAO  array.  The  TAO  array  consists  of  ap-
proximately  70  moorings  in  the  tropical  Pacific  Ocean  and  is  an  important  part  of 
the Global Ocean Observing System (GOOS). These oceanic hydrostations and moor-
ing systems provide temporal data that helps NOAA discern important seasonal and 
decadal  variability.  To  better  ascertain  the  spatial  variability  in  oceanic  carbon  up-
take,  NOAA  has  collaborated  with  academic  partners  since  1985  to  outfit  research 
and  commercial  vessels  with  automated  CO2 sensors.  The  intent  of  these  observa-
tions  has  primarily  been  to  derive  estimates  of  CO2 exchange  between  the  atmos-
phere and the surface waters of the ocean. 
Fixed Buoys 

As mentioned above, the TAO array consists of approximately 70 moorings in the 
Pacific  Ocean  that  transmit  ocean  and  climate  data  in  real-time  for  the  purposes 
of  tracking  El  Nin˜ o  events.  NOAA’s  Pacific  Marine  Environmental  Laboratory 
(PMEL) has worked closely with the Monterey Bay Aquarium Research Institute to 
outfit several of these moorings with CO2 sensors. While the coverage of these buoys 
is  limited  to  the  Pacific  Ocean,  and  therefore  do  not  fully  capture  the  broad  and 
complex system of global CO2 absorption in the ocean, they provide consistent data 
that  helps  NOAA  discern  important  variability  season-to-season  and  decade-to-dec-
ade. 

In  response  to  the  2005  ocean  acidification  workshop,  NOAA  deployed  a  series  of 
fixed  buoys  and  augmented  existing  monitoring  stations  to  accommodate  CO2 sen-
sors  deployed  at  a  handful  of  U.S.  coral  reefs.  The  NOAA  Coral  Reef  Conservation 
Program, together with researchers at the NOAA Atlantic Oceanographic and Mete-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

79 

orological  Laboratory  (AOML)  and  the  University  of  Miami,  has  experimented  with 
the  deployment  of  commercially  available  CO2 sensors  on  NOAA  Integrated  Coral 
Observing Network (ICON) stations at two locations in the Caribbean. NOAA PMEL 
has  also  developed  an  advanced  CO2 mooring  system,  of  which  four  have  been  de-
ployed in coastal waters. While these observing systems are preliminary, they have 
offered  important  insight  into  the  CO2 variability  of  these  waters  which  contrast 
sharply  to  that  of  offshore  waters.  The  CO2 measurements  at  one  of  the  Hawaii 
moorings  have  been  compared  against  those  recorded  offshore  at  a  long-term 
hydrostation.  Similarly,  observations  made  in  Puerto  Rico  have  been  compared 
against  offshore  estimates  derived  using  remote  sensing.  In  both  cases,  the  varia-
bility of CO2 levels in waters overlying coral reefs is shown to be considerably high-
er on daily, seasonal, and interannual scales than in offshore waters that have typi-
cally been the focus of ocean acidification models. Furthermore, these coastal waters 
consistently  have  higher  CO2 levels  than  that  of  offshore  waters,  suggesting  these 
systems  may  exceed  critical  levels  of  CO2 sooner  than  has  been  demonstrated  in 
most  ocean  acidification  models.  What  those  precise  thresholds  might  be  is  an  area 
of  continued  investigation  within  the  scientific  community  and  NOAA  will  need  to 
collect additional data necessary to achieve any firm conclusion on the matter. 
Satellite Observations 

Other  observing  efforts  being  advanced  at  NOAA  with  important  relevance  to 
ocean acidification include the application of satellite remote sensing to supplement 
ship  and  buoy  observations  of  surface  ocean  carbon  chemistry.  While  ship  observa-
tions  provide  reliable  and  accurate  measurements  of  surface  ocean  CO2,  and  offer 
considerably  greater  spatial  coverage  than  that  provided  by  moored  instruments, 
they  lack  the  temporal  resolution  of  fixed  platforms  (i.e.,  observations  over  time  in 
one location) and provide relatively limited regional coverage. Such observations can 
be  supplemented  by  satellite  remote  sensing.  NOAA  has  worked  to  derive  algo-
rithms relating environmental parameters that can be remotely sensed to in situ ob-
servations  of  carbon  measurements.  NOAA  continues  to  work  to  improve  the  reli-
ability  and  accuracy  of  these  models  and  improve  the  data  delivery  to  the  commu-
nity.  Such  models  are  being  experimentally  coupled  to  NOAA’s  ICON  station  CO2 
monitoring  network  in  the  hopes  of  deriving  a  tool  for  coral  reef  management  to 
monitor the response of coral reefs to ocean acidification. 

All  of  these  observing  networks  and  platforms  have  not  been  designed  to  specifi-
cally address ocean acidification per se, which demands a more comprehensive meas-
urement  of  ocean  carbon  chemistry.  Measurement  of  ocean  acidity  requires  in  situ 
technology,  which  NOAA  is  currently  testing.  Such  advanced  observations  are  re-
quired to fully model the magnitude, rate and severity of ocean acidification. 
Research Efforts and Ocean Acidification 
Northwest 

NOAA’s  Northwest  Fisheries  Science  Center  (NWFSC)  has  begun  collaborating 
with the University of Washington on ocean acidification research relevant to Pacific 
fisheries.  In  September  2006,  the  NWFSC  began  some  initial  modeling  studies  of 
possible  consequences  of  ocean  acidification  on  food  webs.  Two  ongoing  research 
projects  are  focused  in  Puget  Sound  and  the  Northeast  Pacific  shelf.  Both  projects 
are investigating how likely changes in calcifier populations at all trophic levels will 
impact  the  food  web.  Many  organisms  are  expected  to  be  affected,  including 
coccolithophores  (phytoplankton  made  of  calcium  carbonate),  pteropods  (a  form  of 
shelled zooplankton), cold-water corals, and echinoderm larvae (e.g., sea urchins and 
sea  stars).  From  past  research  on  acid  rain  there  is  also  evidence  of  acidification’s 
effect on animal behavior and homing, an area where the NWFSC has also initiated 
some  preliminary  fisheries-related  lab  studies.  Further  investigations  could  include 
questions  of  how  changing  ocean  chemistry  could  impact  how  pollutants  are  taken 
up by the ocean, their chemical form, and their impact on ocean life. 
Alaska 

NOAA’s Alaska Fisheries Science Center (AKFSC) has started research on the ef-
fects of decreased pH on red king crab larval growth and survival. This project was 
a pilot study designed to test the ability to culture crab larvae under experimentally 
manipulated  pH  conditions.  Preliminary  results  showed  ∼15  percent  reduction  in 
growth  and  ∼67  percent  reduction  in  survival  when  pH  was  reduced  0.5  units.  Lab 
work to determine pH effects on the calcium content of exoskeletons is ongoing. 
Southwest 

NOAA’s  Southwest  Fisheries  Science  Center  (SWFSC),  as  part  of  the  U.S.  Ant-
arctic Marine Living Resource (AMLR) Program, also collected water and zooplank-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

80 

ton  samples  to  investigate  effects  of  ocean  acidification  in  the  Southern  Ocean  dur-
ing its 2007 krill biomass survey. These samples comprise the beginning of NOAA’s 
research  to  understand  the  impact  of  changing  pH  in  the  South  Shetland  Islands. 
Given  that  in  the  foreseeable  future  CO2 levels  are  likely  to  rise,  the  degree  of 
supersaturation for both aragonite and calcite (two calcium carbonate (CaCO3) poly-
morphs)  will  decline.  This  could  impact  both  invertebrate  and  vertebrate  commu-
nities. Aragonite and calcite are the building blocks for skeletal material and shells 
of many organisms and lower concentrations of the building blocks of these minerals 
in seawater will increase the energy needed by organisms to form their skeletal and 
shell  structures.  This  increased  energy  need  can  stress  the  organisms’  physiology. 
Our  data  collection  and  analysis  efforts  will  provide  information  necessary  for  the 
development  of  mitigation  options.  This  work  is  being  completed  in  collaboration 
with scientists from NOAA PMEL and California State University San Marcos, who 
will provide the analytical capacity lacked by the AMLR Program. 
National 

NOAA  Sea  Grant  serves  as  a  unifying  mechanism  within  NOAA  to  engage  top 
universities  to  assist  NOAA  in  meeting  its  mission  goals  and  responsibilities.  Sea 
Grant  conducts  research,  extension,  education,  and  communication  activities,  with 
a  goal  to  achieve  a  sustainable  environment  and  to  encourage  the  responsible  use 
of America’s coastal, ocean, and Great Lakes resources. Sea Grant has supported re-
search on the affects of ocean acidification on coral reefs in Hawaii. 
Ocean Acidification Modeling 

NOAA’s  Geophysical  Fluid  Dynamics  Laboratory  (GFDL)  works  cooperatively 
throughout the agency to advance its expert assessment of changes in national and 
global climate through research, improved models, and products. GFDL participated 
in the 1995 Ocean-Carbon Cycle Model Intercomparison Project (OCMIP), which de-
veloped  an  international  collaboration  to  improve  the  predictive  capacity  of  ocean- 
carbon  cycle  models  through  evaluation  and  intercomparison.  After  a  3-year  pilot 
study  with  4  models  (OCMIP–1),  a  second  phase  of  study  (OCMIP–2;  1998–2002) 
involved 13 international modeling groups and data specialists taking on a more de-
tailed effort. The models developed by these groups were used to forecast how ocean 
chemistry  could  change  under  the  ‘business-as-usual’  scenario  (as  defined  by  the 
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change) for future emissions of anthropogenic 
carbon  dioxide.  Under  such  a  scenario,  the  models  predict  that  the  surface  waters 
of the Southern Ocean will become chemically unfavorable to some forms of calcium 
carbonate  by  the  year  2050  (i.e.,  the  pH  of  the  surface  waters  will  be  too  low  to 
allow  solid  calcium  carbonate  to  form).  By  2100,  such  conditions  could  extend 
throughout  the  entire  Southern  Ocean  and  into  the  subarctic  Pacific  Ocean  (Orr  et 
al.,  2005).  When  live  pteropods  were  subjected  to  chemical  conditions  predicted  by 
these models, their shells (calcium carbonate) began to dissolve. The findings of the 
study  concluded  that  conditions  detrimental  to  high-latitude  ecosystems  could  de-
velop within decades. 

NOAA  can  strengthen  the  existing  efforts  by  improving  its  understanding  of  the 
climate-ecosystem linkages to better predict ecosystem (and living marine resource) 
impacts  and  adaptations  to  climate  change.  Specifically,  NOAA  can  enhance  its 
monitoring of living marine resource population demographics, distributions, migra-
tions, and health. 

Additionally, NOAA can translate climate information from global to regional lev-

els to facilitate management of ecosystem issues at the regional level. 

Question  2.  Are  there  international  efforts  currently  underway  or  in  development 
to address the issue of ocean acidification and is the United States involved in such 
efforts? 

Answer. In addition to the efforts detailed in response to Question 1 (above), over 
the past year NOAA scientists have been interacting with their colleagues from Eu-
rope  and  Asia  on  the  development  of  international  cooperative  research  efforts  on 
ocean  acidification.  At  the  international  level,  research  on  ocean  acidification  is 
being  implemented  through  the  Integrated  Marine  Biogeochemistry  and  Ecosystem 
Research  project  and  Surface  Ocean  Lower-Atmosphere  Study.  Senior  NOAA  and 
academic  scientists  have  been  invited  by  their  European  counterparts  to  contribute 
to the planning and implementation of the European Project on Ocean Acidification. 
Similar negotiations are presently underway with colleagues from Japan and Korea. 
Question 3. Coral reefs are not just critical habitat for fish. In my state of Hawaii, 
they  are  also  an  economic  engine  supporting  both  fishing  and  tourism.  Is  ocean 
acidification  or  the  increase  in  sea  temperature  the  more  pressing  issue  for  pro-
tecting  and  preserving  Hawaii’s  coral  reefs  and  other  marine  resources  and  why? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

81 

Answer.  While  our  present  understanding  of  coral  bleaching  and  ocean  acidifica-
tion is at an early stage of development, the research results thus far indicate that 
increases  in  sea  surface  temperature  and  changes  in  ocean  chemistry  both  present 
considerable  risk  to  the  future  sustainability  of  coral  reef  habitat  and  the  eco-serv-
ices  they  provide  to  Hawaii.  Both  surface  temperature  and  ocean  chemistry  are  re-
lated  to  changes  in  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  concentrations  (directly  in  the  case 
of  ocean  acidification)  and  so  the  two  issues  are  inextricably  linked.  The  prevailing 
expectation of the scientific community is that, should sea surface temperatures con-
tinue  to  rise,  coral  bleaching  will  continue  to  occur  with  greater  frequency  and  in-
tensity. The resilience of reefs against threats posed by rising temperatures is likely 
to be compromised by their declining ability to build reefs as a result of ocean acidi-
fication. While there is much that remains unknown with regards to how these two 
processes interact, it is likely the impact of the two threats together will be greater 
than the sum of the two separate impacts. 

Question 4. How can we incorporate actions to address these issues into an overall 

management strategy for protecting Hawaii’s corals and other marine resources? 

Answer.  NOAA  is  committed  to  an  ecosystem  approach  to  resource  management 
that  addresses  the  many  simultaneous  pressures  affecting  ecosystems.  The  various 
effects  of  climate  change  on  wildlife  and  oceans  are  interrelated.  While  the  strate-
gies  outlined  in  the  2006  publication  A  Reef  Manager’s  Guide  to  Coral  Bleaching 
(produced  by  NOAA,  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  the  Australian  Great 
Barrier Reef Marine Park Authority, and the International Union for the Conserva-
tion of Nature) were designed to address coral bleaching in Hawaii and other feder-
ally-protected coral reef ecosystems, many of the strategies in the guide will support 
reef  resilience  in  the  face  of  ocean  acidification.  Additional  research  is  needed  to 
fully  characterize  the  threat  of  ocean  acidification  to  coral  reef  communities  and  to 
identify and devise specific adaptive management strategies. 

Once  identified,  adaptive  strategies  that  plan  for  climate  change  impacts  can  be 
applied  to  the  ocean  and  coastal  environment  through  a  variety  of  mechanisms,  in-
cluding  incentives  and  disincentives,  policies  and  regulations,  and  public  outreach 
and education. A number of NOAA’s research programs have also begun to consider 
how climate change, and specifically ocean acidification scenarios, may impact many 
regulated  species—particularly  bivalve  mollusks,  crustaceans,  and  species  depend-
ent  on  shallow-water  coral  reefs.  Over  50  percent  of  the  value  of  U.S.  fisheries  de-
rives from clams, scallops, and oysters, and various species of shrimp, crab, and lob-
ster.  These  shellfish  are  thought  to  be  particularly  vulnerable  to  the  effects  of  re-
duced  levels  of  calcium  carbonate  building  blocks  in  the  oceans  due  to  increasing 
acidity.  NOAA’s  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  has  initiated  a  few  pilot  studies 
to attempt to understand these impacts. 

Question  5.  Dr.  Feely,  under  a  ‘‘business  as  usual’’  scenario  of  greenhouse  gas 
emissions,  what  do  you  project  will  be  the  impacts  on  coral  reefs  and  other  marine 
resources? 

Answer.  The  recently  released  Summary  for  Policy  Makers  in  the  Intergovern-
mental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  Fourth  Assessment  Report  on  Impacts, 
Vulnerability  and  Adaptation  to  Climate  Change  found  that  under  a  business  as 
usual scenario: 

• The  resilience  of  many  ecosystems  is  likely  to  be  exceeded  this  century  by  an 
unprecedented  combination  of  climate  change,  associated  disturbances  (e.g., 
flooding,  drought,  ocean  acidification),  and  other  global  change  drivers  (e.g., 
land use change, pollution, over-exploitation of resources). 
• For  increases  in  global  average  temperature  exceeding  1.5–2.5°  C  and  in  con-
comitant  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  concentrations,  there  are  projected  to  be 
major  changes  in  ecosystem  structure  and  function,  species’  ecological  inter-
actions,  and  species’  geographic  ranges,  with  predominantly  negative  con-
sequences  for  biodiversity,  and  ecosystem  goods  and  services,  e.g.,  food  supply. 
As  described  in  the  response  to  Question  1,  NOAA’s  Geophysical  Fluid  Dynamics 
Laboratory  contributed  to  the  Ocean-Carbon  Cycle  Model  Intercomparison  Project. 
The  models  that  resulted  from  this  project  were  used  to  forecast  how  ocean  chem-
istry  could  change  under  the  ‘business-as-usual’  scenario  (as  defined  by  the  Inter-
governmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change)  for  future  emissions  of  anthropogenic  car-
bon  dioxide.  Under  such  a  scenario,  the  models  predict  that  the  surface  waters  of 
the  Southern  Ocean  will  become  chemically  unfavorable  to  some  forms  of  calcium 
carbonate  by  the  year  2050.  By  2100,  such  conditions  could  extend  throughout  the 
entire Southern Ocean and into the subarctic Pacific Ocean. 

Recent  work  indicates  that  corals  in  the  21st  century  will  have  to  adapt  to  tem-
perature  increases  of  at  least  0.4  degrees  Fahrenheit  per  decade  to  survive  the  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

82 

creasing  frequency  and  intensity  of  coral  bleaching  that  we  expect  in  the  next  few 
decades  (Donner  et  al.,  2005).  Unfortunately,  ongoing  studies  have  not  yet  shown 
that  corals  have  the  ability  to  make  physiological  or  evolutionary  changes  at  that 
rate. Limited latitudinal expansion of coral distributions is possible and may be oc-
curring in one case (Precht and Aronson, 2006). However, corals in higher latitudes 
are  likely  to  encounter  lower  pH  waters  (ocean  acidification)  and  their  skeletal 
growth rate may be depressed (Guinotte et al., 2003; Guinotte et al., 2006). 

Question  6.  What  if  we  stabilized  our  greenhouse  gas  concentrations  at  between 

445 and 710 parts per million? 

Answer. According to the 4th Assessment Report by the Intergovernmental Panel 
on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  Working  Group  II,  the  mitigation  measure  of  reducing 
anthropogenic  greenhouse  gas  emission  can  reduce  a  number  of  projected  climate 
change  impacts.  Reducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions  below  445  ppm  would  specifi-
cally act to: 

plankton and shellfish. 

• Reduce  the  level  of  ocean  acidification  affecting  coral  reefs  and  other  calcifying 
• Reduce the severity of coral bleaching events. 
Note  that  even  reducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions  to  445  ppm  is  projected  only 
to  reduce  the  severity  of  coral  bleaching  events,  as  opposed  to  preventing  those 
events. In addition, because of the inertia in the climate system, it would take sev-
eral decades before any benefits from mitigation efforts materialize. According to the 
IPCC,  even  if  complete  mitigation  were  put  into  place  immediately  (meaning  even 
if  anthropogenic  carbon  dioxide  emissions  were  immediately  reduced  to  zero),  be-
cause  of  existing  carbon  dioxide  in  the  system,  we  are  committed  to  a  0.6°  C  tem-
perature change over the next 50 years. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

RICHARD A. FEELY, PH.D. 

Question  1.  In  your  testimony,  you  discussed  the  potential  impacts  that  ocean 
acidification might have on coldwater species in the Bering Sea. Along much of the 
West Coast, we are wrestling with the recovery of endangered salmon. Salmon are, 
of  course,  both  commercially  and  culturally  important,  and  they’re  also  a  critical 
part of the food web for the endangered Puget Sound Southern Resident Orca. From 
your research, will ocean acidification place these species in further jeopardy? If so, 
specifically how might this occur? 

Answer.  Our  understanding  of  the  connections  between  ocean  acidification  and 
the  marine  food  chain  is  in  a  very  early  stage  of  development.  Scientists  have  ob-
served  a  reduction  in  the  ability  of  marine  algae  and  free-floating  plants  and  ani-
mals  to  produce  protective  carbonate  shells  when  exposed  to  decreasing  pH  (Feely 
et al., 2004; Orr et al., 2005). These organisms are important food sources for other 
marine  species.  One  type  of  free-swimming  mollusk  called  a  pteropod  is  eaten  by 
organisms  ranging  in  size  from  tiny  krill  to  whales.  In  particular,  pteropods  are  a 
major food source for North Pacific juvenile salmon, and also serve as food for mack-
erel, pollock, herring, and cod. Other marine calcifiers, such as coccolithophores (mi-
croscopic  algae),  foraminifera  (microscopic  protozoans),  and  mollusks  (snails,  clams, 
and  mussels)  also  exhibit  a  general  decline  in  their  ability  to  produce  their  shells 
with  decreasing  pH  (Kleypas  et  al.,  2006).  The  concern  among  scientists  is  that  as 
the  food  sources  for  the  salmon  and  whales  are  reduced  in  abundance,  those  popu-
lations will also decline. 

Question  2.  The  most  rigorous  mitigation  goal  in  the  recent  summary  report  by 
the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  is  to  stabilize  atmospheric  green-
house gas levels between 445 and 710 parts per million by 2030. But given that the 
current concentrations of atmospheric carbon are estimated at 380 parts per million, 
shouldn’t  this  target  be  set  at  a  much  lower  level  if  we  are  to  effectively  address 
climate  change?  What  is  the  expected  temperature  increase  of  this  range?  What 
would  be  the  impacts  on  our  ocean  resources  if  we  were  to  reach  these  emissions 
levels? 

Answer. According to the 4th Assessment Report by the Intergovernmental Panel 
on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  Working  Group  II,  the  mitigation  measure  of  reducing 
anthropogenic  greenhouse  gas  emission  can  reduce  a  number  of  projected  climate 
change  impacts.  Reducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions  below  445  ppm  would  specifi-
cally act to: 

• Limit temperature increase to 2.0–2.4° C 
• Reduce the future severity of drought in the U.S. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

83 

plankton and shellfish. 

• Reduce  the  level  of  ocean  acidification  affecting  coral  reefs  and  other  calcifying 
• Reduce  the  severity  of  coral  bleaching  events  (e.g.,  a  1–3°  C  increase  in  global 
temperature  would  result  in  more  bleaching  events  with  small  recovery  times, 
whereas an increase of 2.5–3.0° C could result in widespread mortality). 

Because of the inertia in the climate system, it would take several decades before 
any benefits from mitigation efforts materialize. According to IPCC, even if complete 
mitigation  were  put  into  place  immediately  (meaning  if  anthropogenic  carbon  diox-
ide emissions were immediately reduced to zero), because of existing carbon dioxide 
in  the  system,  we  are  committed  to  a  0.6°  C  temperature  change  over  the  next  50 
years. In addition, it is important to note that the IPCC summary does not explicitly 
predict  the  magnitude  and  timing  of  consequences  because  these  depend  on  the 
amount  and  rate  of  CO2 emissions  and  subsequent  warming,  and,  in  some  cases, 
on society’s ability to adapt. 

Question 3. What are the potential impacts of some of the currently proposed cli-
mate change mitigation strategies on the marine environment—such as iron stimu-
lated plankton blooms or injection of CO2 into sea sediments? 

Answer.  The  broad  potential  impacts  of  climate  change  mitigation  strategies  are 
discussed  in  answer  to  question  2  (above).  In  2005  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on 
Climate  Change  (IPCC)  published  a  special  report  on  Carbon  Dioxide  Capture  and 
Storage  (http://www.ipcc.ch/activity/srccs/index.htm),  but  the  IPCC  report  does 
not address biological approaches for carbon capture and storage in the ocean, such 
as iron-stimulated plankton blooms. There have been several small research projects 
that  have  demonstrated  that  iron  fertilization  can  cause  a  phytoplankton  bloom  in 
certain  regions  of  the  ocean.  However,  current  scientific  evidence  indicates  that 
large-scale  iron  fertilization  will  not  significantly  increase  carbon  transfer  into  the 
deep ocean or lower atmospheric CO2. Furthermore, there may be negative impacts 
of iron fertilization including dissolved oxygen depletion, altered trace gas emissions 
that  affect  climate  and  air  quality,  changes  in  biodiversity,  and  decreased  produc-
tivity in other oceanic regions. 

In 2005 the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) special report on 
Carbon  Dioxide  Capture  and  Storage,  one  chapter  is  devoted  to  ocean  storage  of 
CO2.  This  report  noted  that  deep  ocean  injection  is  technically  possible  and  would 
isolate  the  CO2 from  the  atmosphere  for  several  hundreds  of  years.  The  fraction  of 
CO2 retained in the ocean over time generally tends to be longer with deeper injec-
tion, but the cost of placing the CO2 deeper is also higher. Injection of a few billion 
metric  tons  of  CO2 would  produce  a  measurable  change  in  ocean  chemistry  in  the 
region surrounding the injection, whereas injection of hundreds of billions of metric 
tons of CO2 would eventually produce measurable changes over the entire ocean vol-
ume. Deep-ocean CO2 injection would introduce anthropogenic CO2 to regions of the 
deep ocean that have not yet been exposed to elevated CO2. In particular, the areas 
around the injection sites would experience CO2 levels far in excess of anything that 
would result from the natural uptake of anthropogenic CO2. 

Question 4. Given your understanding of ocean acidification, does using the ocean 
to  store  CO2 make  good  policy  sense,  or  would  we  just  be  creating  additional  prob-
lems?  Are  there  safe  and  effective  ways  to  use  the  ocean  to  mitigate  the  effects  of 
excess carbon dioxide in the atmosphere? 

Answer. The IPCC report mentioned in answer to the question above (Carbon Di-
oxide Capture and Storage: http://www.ipcc.ch/activity/srccs/index.htm) gives sev-
eral examples of viable carbon storage options, such as the injection of CO2 into geo-
logical reservoirs. These options appear to have potentially longer storage times and 
fewer  potential  environmental  impacts  than  purposeful  ocean  carbon  storage.  The 
oceans  will  continue  to  take  up  anthropogenic  CO2 for  at  least  the  next  few  thou-
sand  years,  thus  acting  as  a  natural  mitigation  pathway.  This  natural  uptake  will 
have  environmental  consequences  that  we  are  still  trying  to  understand.  At  this 
point, it does not seem to make sense scientifically to exacerbate this by accelerating 
the  process  and  potentially  introduce  additional  unknown  oceanographic  and  eco-
logical  consequences  to  this  valuable  resource.  Many  scientists  are  also  concerned 
that such fertilization experiments may have the unintended consequence of causing 
harmful algal blooms, sometimes known as ‘‘red tides.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

84 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

RICHARD A. FEELY, PH.D. 

Question  1.  According  to  NOAA,  about  4,000  species  of  fish,  including  approxi-
mately  half  of  all  federally-managed  fisheries,  depend  on  coral  reefs  and  related 
habitats for a portion of their life cycles, and the National Marine Fisheries Service 
estimates that the value of U.S. fisheries from coral reefs exceeds $100 million. Will 
corals and plankton be able to survive or adapt to more acidic waters in our oceans? 
Answer. Increasing ocean acidification has been shown to significantly reduce the 
ability  of  reef-building  corals  to  produce  their  skeletons,  affecting  growth  of  indi-
vidual corals and making the reef more vulnerable to erosion (Kleypas et al., 2006). 
By  mid-century,  coral  reefs  may  erode  faster  than  they  can  be  rebuilt  potentially 
making them less resilient to other environmental stresses (e.g., disease, bleaching). 
This  threat  to  coral  reefs  could  compromise  the  long-term  viability  of  these  eco-
systems,  perhaps  impacting  the  thousands  of  species  and  over  one  billion  people 
that depend on coral reefs. Decreased calcification rates, as a result of ocean acidifi-
cation  (decreased  pH),  may  also  compromise  the  fitness  or  success  of  these  orga-
nisms and could shift the competitive advantage toward organisms that are not de-
pendent on calcium carbonate (CaCO3). Carbonate structures are likely to be weaker 
and  more  susceptible  to  dissolution  and  erosion  as  a  result  of  ocean  acidification. 
In  long-term  experiments,  corals  that  have  been  grown  under  lower  pH  conditions 
for periods longer than 1 year have not shown any ability to adapt their calcification 
rates to the low pH levels. 

With  respect  to  planktonic  calcifiers  (free-floating  organisms  that  rely  on  calcium 
carbonate),  including  the  coccolithophores,  foraminifera,  and  pteropods,  each  group 
has  been  shown  to  respond  negatively  to  increases  in  CO2 levels.  However,  most 
studies  of  the  impacts  of  ocean  acidification  have  been  performed  on  bloom-forming 
coccolithophores, and there are very limited observations of other planktonic groups. 
If  reduced  calcification  rates  contribute  to  a  decrease  in  a  calcifying  organism’s  fit-
ness  or  survivorship,  then  such  calcareous  species  may  undergo  shifts  in  their  lati-
tudinal distributions and/or vertical depth ranges as the CO2 chemistry of seawater 
changes. Long-term impacts of elevated CO2 on reproduction, growth, and survivor-
ship of planktonic calcifying organisms have not been investigated. Existing studies 
on  the  impacts  of  ocean  acidification  on  calcareous  plankton  have  been  short-term 
experiments,  ranging  from  hours  to  weeks.  Chronic  exposure  to  increased  CO2 may 
have  complex  effects  on  the  growth  and  reproductive  success  of  CaCO3-secreting 
plankton. 

Question  1a.  If  they  cannot,  what  are  the  implications  for  other  marine  species 

and the ocean’s food chain? 

Answer.  The  loss  of  corals  and  other  calcifying  species  could  have  dramatic  con-
sequences  to  marine  ecosystems  and  the  human  systems  that  depend  on  them. 
Many  reef  organisms  are  dependent  on  coral  reefs  for  their  livelihood  (Kleypas  et 
al.,  2006).  Organisms  that  die  out  locally  during  coral  bleaching  events  are  likely 
to  be  lost.  Others  will  suffer  population  drops  as  erosion  of  reefs  reduces  or  elimi-
nates  the  habitats  in  which  they  live.  Changes  in  ocean  pH  may  also  affect  repro-
ductive  success  of  commercially  important  species  by  reducing  demersal  egg  adhe-
sion or the fertilization success of eggs broadcast into the ocean. 

Some  calcifying  planktonic  species  affected  by  ocean  acidification  are  key  food 
sources  for  commercially-targeted  fish,  such  as  juvenile  salmon,  mackerel,  pollock, 
herring  and  cod.  Therefore,  ocean  acidification  may  reduce  the  abundance  of  food 
for  these  key  species  at  the  base  of  the  food  chain.  The  concern  among  scientists 
is  that  as  the  food  sources  for  the  salmon  and  whales  are  reduced  in  abundance, 
those populations will also decline. 

The  economic  implications  of  these  types  of  losses  will  likely  be  similar  to  those 
during coral bleaching events. A study discussed in A Reef Manager’s Guide to Coral 
Bleaching  (Cesar  et  al.,  2002)  indicates  that  the  1998  bleaching  in  the  western  In-
dian  Ocean  cost  U.S.  $71.5  million  to  the  Seychelles,  U.S.  $47.2  million  to  Kenya, 
and U.S. $39.9 million to Zanzibar (in Tanzania). 

Question  1b.  Species  have  migrated  in  response  to  ocean  temperature  changes. 

Will marine organisms migrate to avoid acidification? 

Answer.  Shallow-water  corals  are  generally  limited  by  water  temperatures  and 
visibility  (as  clear  water  is  necessary  to  allow  sunlight  to  penetrate  for  photosyn-
thesis). It is possible that corals will expand poleward as long as proper substrates, 
temperatures,  and  clear  water  are  present.  Unfortunately,  it  takes  hundreds  to 
thousands  of  years  for  reefs  to  develop.  Additionally,  many  corals  grow  at  much 
slower  speeds  (spreading  through  sexual  reproduction  and  larval  transport)  than 
others  coral  species.  The  result  is  that  non-reef  building  invading  organisms  may 
take  over  reefs,  while  slower  growing  corals  that  can  be  the  most  important  reef- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

85 

builders are not able to keep pace with the growth of the non-reef building species. 
However,  even  if  corals  move  poleward,  it  is  the  higher  latitudes  that  are  most  af-
fected by ocean acidification. While advancing to high latitudes might stave off ther-
mal  stress  for  a  select  set  of  low  productivity  corals,  these  systems  would  likely  be 
subjected  to  even  slower  rates  of  reef  building  due  to  ocean  acidification.  Modern 
reef  systems  do  not  extend  to  high  latitudes  in  part  due  to  the  relatively  low  pH 
of these high latitude waters (Guinotte et al., 2003). 

Question  2.  There  have  been  ocean  acidification  events  in  the  past  that  have  re-
sulted  in  the  disappearance  of  marine  organisms,  including  corals.  What  does  the 
fossil  record  reveal  about  the  adaptation  of  marine  organisms  to  changes  in  ocean 
acidification? How long did it take for corals and other marine organisms to recover 
from the acidification events in the past? 

Answer.  Paleontological  studies  of  coral  reef  communities  before  and  after  these 
periods show that many species of corals went extinct during periods of high atmos-
pheric  and  oceanic  carbon  dioxide.  For  example,  studies  indicate  that  98  percent  of 
coral  species  were  lost  during  the  extinction  at  the  end  of  the  Triassic  and  corals 
did not reappear in the fossil record for 8–10 million years (Stanley, 2006). 

The  few  surviving  species  took  millions  of  years  to  evolve  to  fill  the  niches  left 
open by the loss of so many corals during these events. Even then, most reefs were 
dominated by bivalves (clam-like organisms) that later went extinct during the next 
high carbon dioxide period. That next extinction lasted 17 million years. 

Question  3.  You  indicate  in  your  statement  that  ‘‘the  atmospheric  concentration 
of carbon dioxide is now higher than experienced on Earth for at least 800,000 years 
and is expected to continue to rise . . . the oceans are absorbing increasing amounts 
of carbon dioxide . . . and the chemical changes in seawater resulting from the ab-
sorption  of  carbon  dioxide  are  lowering  seawater  pH.’’  Have  scientists  determined 
a dangerous level of pH that we need to avoid? 

Answer.  In  order  to  prevent  disruption  of  the  calcification  of  marine  organisms 
and  the  resultant  risk  of  fundamentally  altering  marine  food  webs,  the  German 
Council  on  Global  Change  (2006)  recommended  that  the  pH  of  near  surface  waters 
should  not  drop  more  than  0.2  units  below  the  pre-industrial  average  value  in  any 
large ocean region. While that may seem like a small change, it is important to note 
that  pH  units  are  on  a  logarithmic  scale.  This  means  each  whole  pH  value  below 
7  is  ten  times  more  acidic  than  the  next  higher  value.  For  example,  pH  4  is  ten 
times  more  acidic  than  pH  5  and  100  times  more  acidic  than  pH  6.  A  pH  drop  of 
0.2  units  would  correspond  to  an  increase  in  the  hydrogen  ion  (H∂)  concentration 
of  around  60  percent  compared  to  pre-industrial  values.  The  decrease  in  pH  so  far 
of  0.11  units  since  industrialization  corresponds  to  a  rise  of  the  H∂ concentration 
of  around  30  percent.  The  present  average  pH  value  of  the  ocean  surface  layer  is 
8.07. 

Question 3a. At the current rate of carbon dioxide emissions, how long will it take 

for the oceans to reach a dangerous level of pH? 

Answer.  At  the  present  rate  of  carbon  dioxide  emissions,  we  will  see  a  pH  drop 
of  0.2  units  from  the  pre-industrial  values  by  about  2050  (500  ppm  CO2 in  the  at-
mosphere). According to simulations by Caldeira and Wickett (2005), a stabilization 
of  the  atmospheric  CO2 concentration  of  540  ppm  by  the  year  2100  would  lead  to 
a  global  average  surface  ocean  pH  decrease  of  0.23  compared  to  the  pre-industrial 
level. Thus, an atmospheric CO2 concentration of 540 ppm would already exceed the 
acidification limit of 0.2 units. 

Question 3b. Have scientists determined at what level of carbon dioxide concentra-

tions we need to maintain in order to avoid this dangerous level of pH? 

Answer.  As  stated  in  Question  3  above,  the  German  Council  on  Global  Change 
(2006) recommended that the pH of near surface waters should not drop more than 
0.2 units (<500 ppm CO2 in the atmosphere) below the pre-industrial average value 
in any large ocean region. 

The largest threat to marine organisms due to ocean acidification is related to the 
solubility of calcium carbonate, which affects the presence of the carbonate minerals 
calcite and aragonite. Calcite and aragonite are needed for the construction of shells 
and  skeletal  structures.  Calcifying  marine  organisms  are  important  components  of 
marine  ecosystems,  so  their  endangerment  would  have  a  large  impact  on  economi-
cally  and  socially  important  marine  resources.  The  German  Council  on  Global 
Change  (2006)  states  ‘‘If  the  concentration  of  carbonate  ion  falls  below  the  critical 
value  of  66  μmol  per  kilogram,  then  the  seawater  is  no  longer  saturated  with  re-
spect to aragonite, and marine organisms can no longer build their aragonite shells’’ 
(Schubert  et  al.,  2006).  The  danger  of  undersaturation  for  aragonite  is  especially 
present  in  the  high  northern  and  southern  latitudes,  and  in  strong  upwelling  re-
gions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

86 

Question  4.  In  light  of  the  latest  findings  published  last  month  in  the  journal 
Science  in  which  the  biological  consumption  and  remineralization  of  carbon  in  the 
‘‘twilight  zone’’—a  zone  in  the  ocean  where  some  sunlight  reaches  but  not  enough 
for photosynthesis to occur at ocean depths between about 660–3,300 feet—actually 
reduces  the  efficiency  of  sequestration  (Buesseler,  et  al.,  Science  316,  567,  2007). 
What  does  this  mean  for  the  future  of  carbon  sequestration  in  our  ocean  if  carbon 
is  recycled  back  into  the  surface  ocean  and  atmosphere  faster  than  originally 
thought? 

Answer. The significance of the Buesseler et al. (2007) article is that much of the 
carbon  that  is  sequestered  in  marine  organic  matter  in  the  surface  euphotic  zone 
is  remineralized  in  the  twilight  zone  and  returned  to  the  atmosphere  at  some  later 
date  due  to  upwelling.  The  farther  down  in  the  ocean  this  organic  carbon  remin-
eralization occurs, the longer it takes for the CO2 to be returned back to the atmos-
phere. Consequently, the approach of using iron-fertilization as a mechanism for se-
questering  organic  carbon  in  the  oceans  may  be  less  inefficient  than  previously 
thought because of this remineralization mechanism. 

Question  4a.  Do  scientists  know  how  much  carbon  sequestered  to  the  deep  ocean 

is being overestimated? 

Answer.  At  the  present,  this  is  an  area  of  active  scientific  research  because  the 
present  carbon  reminearlization  estimates  have  very  large  uncertainties.  In  the 
study  discussed  above  (Buesseler  et  al.)  point  out  that  the  uncertainty  in  the  esti-
mates  of  carbon  remineralization  is  as  high  as  3  Pg  C  year¥1,  which  is  more  than 
our best estimate of the anthropogenic carbon uptake at the surface! 

Question  4b.  How  has  this  changed  what  scientists  think  about  how  long  carbon 
dioxide will be naturally sequestered and how long it will take material to resurface 
from the twilight zone? 

Answer.  The  Buesseler  et  al.  (Science  316,  567,  2007)  article  points  to  the  need 
for  more  research  on  the  nature  and  rates  of  organic  matter  remineralization  proc-
esses  in  the  twilight  zone.  We  need  to  know  if  ocean  acidification  will  enhance  the 
process of remineralization in shallow waters by causing calcium carbonate (CaCO3) 
shells, and their associated organic carbon (ballast carbon), to dissolve higher up in 
the water column. This is potentially one of the most important positive ocean feed-
back mechanisms for enhancing the return of CO2 back to the atmosphere. 

Question  5.  It  is  essential  to  start  a  global  research  and  monitoring  program  for 
ocean  acidification.  We  should  be  utilizing  the  observing  systems  already  in  place 
including  the  undersea  research  program.  What  are  your  recommendations  for  uti-
lizing  the  current  infrastructure  of  ocean  observing  systems  and  satellites  to  mon-
itor ocean acidification? 

Answer. As technology develops, our current ocean observation infrastructure may 
be  enhanced  by  including  additional  specific  sensors  to  monitor  ocean  acidification. 
For  example,  NOAA  scientists  and  partners  recently  launched  the  first  operational 
buoy  with  a  new  sensor  to  monitor  ocean  acidification  in  the  Gulf  of  Alaska.  This 
is the first system specifically designed to monitor ocean acidification, and is a new 
tool for researchers to examine how ocean circulation and ecosystems interact to de-
termine  how  much  carbon  dioxide  the  North  Pacific  Ocean  absorbs  each  year.  The 
addition  of  similar  carbon  system  sensors  onto  current  observation  platforms,  such 
as the OceanSites moored arrays (funded by NOAA and the National Science Foun-
dation  and  Coral  Reef  Metabolic  Monitoring  Network)  could  provide  an  excellent 
foundation for a global monitoring program to monitor ocean acidification in the At-
lantic and Pacific and to validate models of future changes. 

Question  5a.  What  information  can  be  gained  from  monitoring  natural  variations 

over a long time period of time and in several different oceanic regions? 

Answer.  These  data  sets  provide  information  on  long-term  natural  and  anthropo-
genic  variability  of  the  carbon  system  in  the  oceans.  They  are  critical  for  under-
standing the future impacts on biological systems via ocean acidification. 

Question  6.  This  year  I  requested  funding  through  the  Appropriations  Sub-
committee on Commerce, Justice, Science to fund the National Research Council re-
port  on  ocean  acidification  mandated  by  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation 
and  Management  Reauthorization  Act.  Has  NOAA  yet  identified  the  compelling  re-
search needs for this study? 

Answer.  Yes,  NOAA  has  identified  key  issues  associated  with  ocean  acidification 
and fisheries, and how the National Academy of Science’s Ocean Studies Board can 
help  prioritize  future  research  and  monitoring  to  address  this  significant  issue. 
NOAA  and  other  agencies  must  collaborate  to  design  appropriate  field  and  labora-
tory studies that will allow more precise forecasts of the impacts of ocean acidifica-
tion on fisheries and the ecosystems that support them. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

87 

Question 6a. If so, what are the research needs for this report? 
Answer.  NOAA  believes  that  the  National  Academy  can  provide  an  important 
bridge between the academic community and Federal agencies in designing and im-
plementing appropriate long-term monitoring studies and experiments to determine 
how  fisheries  species  and  ecosystems  may  respond  to  acidifying  oceans.  The  Na-
tional Academy study, to be conducted through its Ocean Studies Board (OSB), will 
be  used  to  help  design  long-term  studies  to  monitor  pH  changes  in  vulnerable  ma-
rine ecosystems of the United States, and as a method to collaborate internationally. 
The  OSB  will  determine  the  methods,  frequency  and  placement  of  monitoring  sen-
sors  and  oceanographic  sensing  to  track  ocean  acidification  over  time,  and  in  rela-
tion to changes in atmospheric CO2. 

Currently  about  51  percent  of  the  value  of  United  States  fisheries  landings  is 
made  up  of  bivalve  mollusks  and  crustaceans.  As  these  species  contain  high  levels 
of  calcium  carbonate  as  shell  material,  they  are  thought  to  be  particularly  vulner-
able  to  ocean  acidification.  Ocean  plankton,  the  base  of  shallow-water  marine  food 
chains, include species that also incorporate calcium carbonate into their shells and 
are  thus  likely  to  be  influenced  by  acidification.  Other  species,  contributing  about 
5  percent  of  the  value  of  U.S.  fisheries,  occur  in  shallow  water  tropical  coral  eco-
systems  that  are  highly  sensitive  to  pH  variations  and  temperature  changes.  Fi-
nally, deep-sea coral ecosystems are also likely to be impacted by ocean acidification 
and  these  species  are  now  regulated  under  the  newly  re-authorized  Magnuson-Ste-
vens Fishery Conservation and Management Act. The National Academy study will 
determine  which  of  these  biological  communities  are  most  at  risk,  and  will  design 
appropriate field and laboratory studies of the physiological responses of these orga-
nisms to ocean acidification. 

In  addition  to  the  National  Academy  study,  which  will  focus  on  monitoring  and 
research  strategies  and  priorities  for  the  U.S.,  NOAA  will  also  coordinate  inter-
national  ocean  acidification  science  with  the  International  Council  for  the  Explo-
ration  of  the  Sea  and  the  Pacific  Marine  Science  Organization.  These  two  groups, 
in  particular,  coordinate  marine  science  among  countries  in  the  North  Atlantic  and 
North  Pacific,  and  can  assure  that  U.S.  research  priorities  integrate  with  research 
conducted by other nations. 

Question  7.  About  one-third  of  all  man-made  carbon  dioxide  emissions  are  ab-
sorbed into the ocean. However, at a certain point the oceans may no longer be able 
to  absorb  carbon  dioxide  at  the  same  rate.  If  this  happens,  warming  of  the  atmos-
phere  will  increase  even  more  rapidly.  Are  we  close  to  seeing  the  rate  that  the 
oceans absorb carbon dioxide slow down to a point that our global temperatures in-
crease even faster? 

2-),  and  carbonic  acid  (H2CO3

Answer.  The  uptake  of  anthropogenic  CO2 is  controlled  by  the  carbon  chemistry 
at the surface and the rate at which surface waters, laden with anthropogenic CO2, 
are  moved  into  the  ocean  interior  and  replaced  with  deeper  waters  that  have  not 
been exposed to higher atmospheric CO2 concentrations. The rate at which the sur-
face waters can take up CO2 depends on the difference in CO2 concentration in the 
air  and  sea  surface,  and  the  amount  of  CO2 that  is  converted  to  other  ionic  species 
(such  as  bicarbonate  (HCO3),  carbonate  (CO3
-)  in  sea-
water.  As  CO2 concentrations  in  the  ocean  increase,  the  percentage  of  CO2 that  is 
converted to these other ionic species decreases, and the water becomes less efficient 
at  taking  up  CO2.  This  is  already  happening—the  surface  water  of  the  oceans  has 
already  become  less  efficient  at  taking  up  CO2.  However,  even  with  the  ocean’s  de-
creased efficiency with regard to taking up CO2, the exponential increase in atmos-
pheric CO2 concentration up to this point has made it such that today’s oceans take 
up more CO2 each year than they have in the past. That being said, there are many 
things  that  can  change  this  situation  because  the  rate  at  which  the  ocean  absorbs 
CO2 is  a  balance  between  a  number  of  processes.  For  example,  if  the  rate  at  which 
CO2 is  moved  from  the  surface  ocean  into  the  interior  ocean  slows  because  of 
changes  in  thermohaline  circulation,  then  the  rate  of  CO2 absorption  will  also  de-
crease. If the rate at which CO2 is rising into the atmosphere slows, then the ocean 
uptake rate will also decrease. Predicting when and how these processes, and others 
not  listed  here,  will  change  is  difficult.  According  to  Chapter  5  of  the  4th  Assess-
ment  Report  by  the  International  Panel  on  Climate  Change  Working  Group  I,  the 
fraction  of  the  net  CO2 emissions  taken  up  by  the  ocean  (the  uptake  fraction)  was 
37 percent ±7 percent during the period from 1980 to 2005, compared to 42 percent 
±7  percent  during  the  1750  to  1994  period.  The  errors  in  this  estimate  are  still  too 
large to determine if these rates are different. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

88 

Question  7a.  How  does  temperature  affect  the  rate  at  which  ocean  acidification 

occurs? 

Answer.  CO2 is  less  soluble  in  warm  water,  so  as  the  oceans  warm  they  will  be-
come less efficient at taking up CO2 from the atmosphere. In addition, as you warm 
a body of water but keep the total amount of dissolved carbon the same or greater, 
then  the  proportion  of  carbonic  acid  (H2CO3,  the  acidic  form  of  carbon  dioxide)  in 
the  water  will  increase,  and  the  pH  of  the  warmer  water  will  therefore  be  lower. 
Thus, rising ocean temperatures will tend to accelerate ocean acidification. 

However,  temperature’s  impact  on  the  rate  at  which  ocean  acidification  occurs  is 
small relative to the impact of rising atmospheric CO2 levels. As CO2 concentration 
continues  to  increase  in  the  atmosphere,  the  ocean  will  continue  to  take  up  larger 
quantities of CO2, thereby exacerbating ocean acidification. 

Question  7b.  The  Arctic  Ocean  is  becoming  warmer  and  fresher  which  may  slow 
down thermohaline circulation. What are the implications of these changes on ocean 
acidification? 

Answer. The Arctic Ocean is one of the oceanic regions that will experience major 
changes  in  carbonate  saturation  due  to  ocean  acidification  over  the  next  40–50 
years. This is primarily due to the extremely low temperatures of the surface waters 
and lowered alkalinities due to the ice melting. 

Question 7c. How does the increase in atmospheric carbon dioxide and subsequent 
warming  affect  atmospheric  and  oceanic  circulation?  Will  the  increase  in  atmos-
pheric and ocean temperatures result in more frequent El Nin˜ o’s and intense hurri-
cane seasons? 

Answer.  The  oceans  and  the  atmosphere  constitute  intertwined  components  of 
Earth’s  climate  system.  Evaporation  from  the  ocean  transfers  huge  amounts  of 
water  vapor  to  the  atmosphere,  where  it  travels  aloft  until  it  cools,  condenses,  and 
eventually precipitates in the form of rain or snow. Changes in ocean circulation or 
water properties can disrupt this hydrological cycle on a global scale, causing flood-
ing and long-term droughts in various regions. 

Higher temperatures caused by increases in atmospheric carbon dioxide could add 
fresh water to the northern North Atlantic by increasing precipitation and by melt-
ing  nearby  sea  ice,  mountain  glaciers,  and  the  Greenland  ice  sheet.  This  influx  of 
fresher and warmer water could reduce the sea surface salinity and density, leading 
to a slow down of the global hydrological cycle (thermohaline circulation). 

According  to  all  models  used  in  the  4th  Assessment  Report  by  the  Intergovern-
mental Panel on Climate Change Working Group I, the strength of the atmospheric 
overturning  circulation  decreases  as  the  climate  warms  (Held  and  Soden,  2006; 
Vecchi  and  Soden,  2006),  in  a  manner  consistent  with  theoretical  arguments  (Betts 
and  Ridgeway,  1989;  Betts,  1998;  Knutson  and  Manabe,  1995;  Held  and  Sodden, 
2006).  The  models  project  that  this  weakening  should  occur  preferentially  to  the 
east-west  overturning  of  air  near  the  Equator,  known  as  the  Walker  circulation. 
Such  a  weakening  of  the  Walker  circulation,  in  turn,  would  lead  to  a  reduction  in 
near-surface wind-driven currents in the near-equatorial oceans (Vecchi and Soden, 
2007). Long-term records of atmospheric sea-level pressure indicate that weakening 
of the Walker circulation may already be underway, and this weakening is partially 
attributable  to  increases  in  greenhouse  gases  (Vecchi  et  al.,  2006;  Zhang  and  Song, 
2006). However, long-term changes of oceanic conditions are mixed, with some stud-
ies showing changes inconsistent with a slowing circulation (Cane et al., 1997; Han-
sen  et  al.,  2006)  and  other  studies  showing  changes  more  consistent  with  the  slow-
ing circulation (Cobb et al., 2001, 2003). 

The El Nin˜ o-Southern Oscillation (ENSO) system is a naturally occurring climate 
phenomenon  that  leads  to  major  fluctuations  in  global  climate  patterns  at  approxi-
mately  3–7  year  intervals.  There  is  scientific  debate  over  the  influence  that  rising 
globally-averaged  temperatures  has  had  and  will  have  on  the  frequency  and  inten-
sity  of  ENSO  fluctuations.  What  is  certain  is  that  natural  fluctuations  in  tempera-
ture  lead  to  warmer  and  cooler  years  than  normal.  If  the  average  temperature  is 
rising, as it has in the 20th century and is expected to in the 21st century (Guinotte 
et al., 2003), the warm temperatures during natural oscillations periods will be even 
hotter  than  those  of  the  past.  How  the  mechanisms  responsible  for  controlling  the 
timing  and  intensity  of  El  Nin˜ o’s  will  likely  change  in  a  warming  climate  is  still 
not  clear  (van  Oldenborgh  et  al.,  2005).  Therefore,  it  is  difficult  to  say  whether 
warming  will  result  in  more  frequent  El  Nin˜ o’s.  We  do  know,  however,  that  El 
Nin˜ o’s  have  a  dramatic  impact  on  the  ability  of  the  oceans  to  take  up  CO2,  so  if 
the frequency of ENSO events does change then it will definitely impact ocean acidi-
fication. 

It is likely that some increase in tropical cyclone peak wind-speed and rainfall will 
occur if the climate continues to warm (IPCC, 2007). However, there is no firm con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

89 

clusion on whether there is currently a global warming signal in the tropical cyclone 
climate record to date. Models also project that storm tracks should move poleward 
in  a  warming  world  (Yin,  2005),  and  that  the  northern  edge  of  the  sinking  branch 
of  the  equator-subtropics  overturning  of  air—known  as  the  Hadley  circulation— 
should  move  polewards,  with  an  associated  poleward  movement  of  dry  regions  (Lu 
et al., 2006). 

Question 7d. Which ocean regions will be first to experience large changes in car-

bonate chemistry? How long before large changes occur? 

Answer.  According  to  the  modeling  studies  of  Orr  et  al.,  (2005,  2006),  the  Arctic 
and  Southern  Oceans  will  become  undersaturated  with  respect  to  aragonite  in  the 
second half of this century. During this period, the Southern Ocean’s aragonite satu-
ration horizon shoals from its present average depth of 730m all the way to the sur-
face.  Similar  large  migrations  of  the  aragonite  saturation  horizon  are  projected  for 
the North Atlantic. In the North Pacific, portions of the subarctic Pacific will under-
go undersaturation (with respect to aragonite) by the end of the century. In the Orr 
et  al.  (2005)  modeling  study,  the  concentration  of  carbonate  ions  that  corals  use  to 
build  their  skeletons  (the  reef)  will  become  inadequate  to  support  reefs  around  the 
middle of the century. 

Question 8. How will lower calcification rates, due to an increase in ocean acidifi-
cation,  higher  ocean  temperatures,  and  changes  in  nutrients  affect  ocean  carbon 
chemistry and carbon export rates? 

Answer.  As  indicated  in  the  answer  to  Question  4b  above,  the  Buesseler  et  al. 
(2007)  article  points  to  the  need  for  more  research  on  the  nature  and  rates  of  or-
ganic  matter  remineralization  and  carbon  export  processes  in  the  upper  water  col-
umn. We do not know if ocean acidification will enhance the process of remineraliza-
tion in shallow waters by causing calcium carbonate shells, and their associated or-
ganic carbon (ballast carbon), to dissolve higher up in the water column. This is po-
tentially an important positive ocean feedback mechanism for enhancing the return 
of CO2 back to the atmosphere. 

Question  9.  What  are  the  expected  changes  to  the  biological  pump—the  process 
which  transports  carbon  throughout  the  ocean—due  to  the  increase  in  carbon  diox-
ide and what will be the consequences of these changes? 

Answer. Calcium carbonate particles play a significant role in the transport of or-
ganic  matter  to  the  deep  ocean  by  acting  as  a  ballast  mineral  particle,  absorbing 
organic  matter  at  shallow  depths  and  carrying  it  downward  as  the  particles  settle 
to deeper depths and dissolve. 

Calcium  carbonate  dissolution  at  increasingly  shallower  depths  in  the  oceans 
could  possibly  decrease  the  depth  of  remineralization  of  organic  matter,  causing  a 
reduction  in  the  ocean  uptake  of  CO2.  This  process  needs  to  be  quantitatively  as-
sessed for changing pH conditions in the oceans. 

Question  10.  Fossil-fuel  use  is  also  increasing  the  amounts  of  nitric  and  sulfuric 
acid deposition in the oceans. How will these elements alter surface seawater alka-
linity and pH? 

Answer.  Anthropogenic  nitrogen  and  sulfur  deposition  to  the  ocean  surface  alter 
surface  seawater  chemistry,  leading  to  acidification  and  reduced  total  alkalinity. 
The acidification effects, though not as large globally as those of anthropogenic CO2 
uptake, could be significant in coastal ocean regions. 

Question  10a.  Will  the  impacts  of  these  elements  differ  in  coastal  waters  versus 

open ocean and how may they affect marine ecosystems? 

Answer.  According  to  a  recent  paper  by  Doney  et  al.  (in  press,  Proceedings  of  the 
National  Academy  of  Science,  2007),  the  deposition  of  anthropogenic  nitrogen  and 
sulfur  has  a  relatively  small  effect  on  changes  in  open-ocean  surface  water  chem-
istry,  relative  to  the  effect  of  CO2 increases  due  to  the  oceanic  uptake  of  anthropo-
genic  CO2.  However,  the  impacts  of  nitrogen  and  sulfur  are  more  substantial  in 
coastal  waters,  where  the  ecosystem  responses  to  ocean  acidification  could  have  se-
vere implications for coastal inhabitants. 
Question 11. During the hearing a question was raised regarding the global aver-
age  increase  in  ocean  temperature  of  0.04°  C.  It  is  well  known  that  the  largest  in-
creases  in  ocean  temperature  are  in  the  surface  waters  and  this  plays  a  large  role 
in the Earth’s heat budget. Can you please explain how significant the warming has 
been  in  the  surface  waters  and  what  the  implications  have  been  for  increased  sea 
surface temperature as it relates to hurricane intensity, El Nin˜ o, drought, and other 
extreme weather events? 
Answer.  Based  on  historic  and  paleoclimatic  records,  the  global  mean  land  and 
ocean  surface  temperature  has  increased  by  0.8±0.2°  C  (1.4±0.3°  F)  since  the  last 
half  of  the  nineteenth  century,  and  global  mean  surface  temperatures  increased  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

90 

a  rate  of  about  0.2°  C/decade  over  the  last  few  decades.  Present  temperatures  are 
the warmest on record going back through at least the last 1,000 years, and we will 
likely  soon  be  experiencing  temperatures  warmer  than  at  any  time  in  the  last  mil-
lion  years  (Hansen  et  al.,  2006).  Subsurface  ocean  temperatures  down  to  3,000  m 
(10,000 feet) depth are also on the rise. More than 80 percent of the added heat re-
sides  in  the  ocean.  The  impacts  of  the  increased  heat  content  are  described  below. 
• Hurricane  Intensity:  It  is  likely  that  some  increase  in  tropical  cyclone  peak 
wind-speed  and  rainfall  will  occur  if  the  climate  continues  to  warm;  however, 
there is no firm conclusion on whether there is currently a global warming sig-
nal in the tropical cyclone climate record to date. 

• El Nin˜ o: The El Nin˜ o-Southern Oscillation (ENSO) system is a naturally occur-
ring climate phenomenon that leads to major fluctuations in global climate pat-
terns  at  approximately  3–7  year  intervals.  There  is  scientific  debate  over  the 
influence  that  rising  globally-averaged  temperatures  has  had  and  will  have  on 
the  frequency  and  intensity  of  ENSO  fluctuations.  What  is  certain  is  that  nat-
ural  fluctuations  in  temperature  lead  to  warmer  and  cooler  years  than  normal. 
If  the  average  temperature  is  rising,  as  it  has  in  the  20th  century  and  is  ex-
pected  to  in  the  21st  century,  the  warm  temperatures  during  natural  oscilla-
tions periods will be even hotter than those of the past. 

• Drought:  Droughts  have  increased,  consistent  with  acceleration  in  the  water 
cycle  and  greater  evaporation  and  transport  of  water  vapor  at  the  scale  of  con-
tinents. Observed changes in sea surface temperatures, circulation patterns and 
decreased snowpack and snow cover are also linked to drought. 

Question 11a. Can you highlight different regions that have experienced large in-
creases  in  surface  water  temperature  and  how  much  the  surface  waters  have 
warmed? 

Answer. According to the 4th Assessment Report by the Intergovernmental Panel 
on Climate Change (IPCC) Working Group I, the oceans are warming. Recent warm-
ing  is  strongly  evident  at  all  latitudes  in  sea  surface  temperatures  (SST)  over  each 
of  the  oceans:  there  are  inter-hemispheric  differences  in  warming  in  the  Atlantic; 
the  Pacific  is  punctuated  by  El  Nin˜ o  events  (discussed  in  detail  in  answer  to  ques-
tion above) and Pacific decadal variability that is more symmetric around the equa-
tor; while the Indian ocean exhibits steadier warming throughout. These character-
istics  lead  to  important  differences  in  regional  rates  of  surface  ocean  warming,  and 
understanding  of  the  variability  and  trends  in  different  oceans  is  still  developing. 
A  full  discussion  of  observations  and  oceanic  climate  change  and  sea  level  is  in-
cluded in Chapters 3 and 5 of the IPCC Working Group I report. 

Estimating  regional  SST  increases  is  more  difficult  than  estimating  global  ocean 
temperature  increases,  due  to  uncertainties  in  how  missing  data  points  are  dealt 
with  and  in  correcting  for  systematic  errors  in  measurements.  These  uncertainties 
are  all  amplified  at  the  smaller  scale  (e.g.,  regional  vs.  global)  and  the  further  we 
go back in time. 
Given the uncertainties indicated above, following is a list of linear trends in SST 
in  the  tropics,  computed  over  the  period  1880–2006,  in  units  of  °C  per  100  years— 
to get the total rise of the linear trend, multiply by 1.27: 

• Averaged  across  the  tropics,  sea  surface  temperatures  have  increased  at  a  rate 
of 0.35–0.45° C per 100 years since the 1880s. 
• The  largest  tropical  warming  in  the  20th  century  has  occurred  in  the  northern 
Indian  Ocean  (0.46–0.73°  C  per  100  years)  and  the  southern  tropical  Atlantic 
(0.56¥0.77° C per 100 years) since 1880. 
• For  the  northern  tropical  Atlantic,  the  range  is  between  0.24–0.52°  C  per  100 
• In  the  tropics,  the  greatest  uncertainty  in  temperature  trend  is  in  the  eastern 
equatorial  Pacific,  where  sparse  data  and  strong  natural  year-to-year  fluctua-
tions  associated  with  El  Nin˜ o/La  Nin˜ a  make  estimating  the  long-term  trend 
more  problematic  than  in  other  regions,  the  observationally-based  estimates 
range from 0.12–0.5° C per 100 year since 1880. 

years since 1880. 

These  trends  are  based  on  the  Kaplan  et  al.,  (1998),  Rayner  et  al.,  (2003),  and 
Smith  and  Reynolds  (2004)  SST  datasets,  and  are  computed  over  the  period  1880– 
2006. The exact regions used to calculate these trends: 

• Tropics: Global, 30° S–30° N. 
• Northern Indian Ocean: 50° E–100° E, 0° N–20° N. 
• South Atlantic: 40° W–10° E, 20° S–0° N. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

91 

• North Atlantic: 80° W–30° W, 5° N–20° N. 
• Eastern Equatorial Pacific: 150° W–90° W, 5° S–5° N. 

Literature Cited 

Betts,  A.K.  (1998)  Climate-convection  feedbacks:  some  further  issues.  Climatic 

Change. 39: 35–38. 

Betts,  A.K.,  and  W.  Ridgway.  (1989)  Climatic  Equilibrium  of  the  Atmospheric 
Convective  Boundary  Layer  over  a  Tropical  Ocean.  Journal  of  Atmospheric  Science. 
46(7), 2621–2641. 

Caldeira,  K.  and  Wickett,  M.E.  (2005)  Ocean  model  predictions  of  chemistry 
changes  from  carbon  dioxide  emissions  to  the  atmosphere  and  ocean.  Journal  of 
Geophysical Research—Oceans. 110: C09S4, doi: 10.1029/2004JC002671. 

Cane, M.A., A.C. Clement, A. Kaplan, Y. Kushnir, D. Pozdnyakov, R. Seager, S.E. 
Zebiak,  and  R.  Murtugudde.  (1997)  20thCentury  Sea  Surface  Temperature  Trends. 
Science. 275: 957–960. 

Cesar,  H.;  L.  Pet-Soede,  S.  Westmacott,  S.  Mangi,  and  A.  Aish.  (2002)  Economic 
Analysis  of  Coral  Bleaching  in  the  Indian  Ocean—Phase  II.  In:  Linden,  O.;  Souter, 
D.;  Wilhelmsson,  D.;  and  Obura,  D.  (eds),  Coral  degradation  in  the  Indian  Ocean: 
Status  Report  2002.  CORDIO,  Department  of  Biology  and  Environmental  Science, 
University of Kalmar, Kalmar, Sweden, 251–262. 

Cobb, K.M., C.D. Charles, and D.E. Hunter. (2001) A central tropical Pacific coral 
demonstrates Pacific, Indian, and Atlantic decadal climate connections. Geophysical 
Research Letters. 28(11): 2209–2212. 

Cobb,  K.M.,  C.D.  Charles,  H.  Cheng,  and  R.L.  Edwards.  (2003)  El  Nin˜ o/Southern 
Oscillation  and  tropical  Pacific  climate  during  the  last  millennium.  Nature.  424: 
271–276. 

Costanza,  R.;  R.  d’Arge,  R.  de  Groot,  S.  Farber,  M.  Grasso,  B.  Hannon,  K.  Lim-
burg,  S.  Naeem,  R.V.  O’Neill,  J.  Paruelo,  R.G.  Raskin,  P.  Sutton,  and  M.  van  den 
Belt. (1997) The value of the world’s ecosystem services and natural capital. Nature. 
387: 253–260. 

Doney,  S.C.,  N.  Mahowald,  I.  Lima,  R.A.  Feely,  F.T.  Mackenzie,  J.-F.  Lamarque, 
and P.J. Rasch. (2007) The impact of anthropogenic atmospheric nitrogen and sulfur 
deposition on ocean acidification and the inorganic carbon system. Proceedings of the 
National Academy of Science [in press]. 

Donner,  S.D.,  W.J.  Skirving,  C.M.  Little,  M.  Oppenheimer,  O.  Hoegh-Guldberg. 
(2005) Global assessment of coral bleaching and required rates of adaptation under 
climate change. Global Change Biology. 11: 1–15. 

Feely,  R.A.,  C.L.  Sabine,  K.  Lee,  W.  Berelson,  J.  Kleypas,  V.J.  Fabry,  and  F.J. 
Millero.  (2004)  Impact  of  anthropogenic  CO2 on  the  CaCO3 system  in  the  oceans. 
Science. 305(5682): 362–366. 

Guinotte, J.M., R.W. Buddemeier, and J.A. Kleypas. (2003) Future coral reef habi-
tat  marginality:  temporal  and  spatial  effects  of  climate  change  in  the  Pacific  basin. 
Coral Reefs. 22: 551–558. 

Guinotte,  J.M.,  J.  Orr,  S.  Cairns,  A.  Freiwald,  L.  Morgan,  and  R.  George.  (2006) 
Will  human-induced  changes  in  seawater  chemistry  alter  the  distribution  of  deep- 
sea bioherm-forming scleractinians? Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 4(3): 
141–146. 

Hansen, J., Mki. Sato, R. Ruedy, K. Lo, D.W. Lea, and M. Medina-Elizade. (2006) 
Global  temperature  change.  Proceedings  of  the  National  Academy  of  Science.  103, 
14288–14293, doi: 10.1073/pnas.0606291103. 

Held,  I.M.  and  B.J.  Soden.  (2006)  Robust  responses  of  the  hydrological  cycle  to 

global warming. Journal of Climate. 19: 5686–5699. 

Kaplan,  A.,  M.  Cane,  Y.  Kushnir,  A.  Clement,  M.  Blumenthal,  and  B. 
Rajagopalan. (1998) Analyses of global sea surface temperature 1856–1991. Journal 
of Geophysical Research. 103: 18,567–18,589. 

Kleypas, J.A., R.A. Feely, V.J. Fabry, C. Langdon, C.L. Sabine, and L.L. Robbins. 
(2006)  Impacts  of  ocean  acidification  on  coral  reefs  and  other  marine  calcifiers:  A 
guide  to  future  research.  Report  of  a  workshop  held  18–20  April  2005,  St.  Peters-
burg, FL, sponsored by NSF, NOAA, and the U.S. Geological Survey, 88 pp. 

Knutson, T.R., and S. Manabe, 1995: Time-mean response over the tropical Pacific 
to  increased  CO2 in  a  coupled  ocean-atmosphere  model.  Journal  of  Climate.  8(9): 
2181–2199. 

Lu,  J.,  G.A.  Vecchi  and  T.  Reichler.  (2007)  Expansion  of  the  Hadley  cell  under 
global  warming.  Geophysical  Research  Letters.  34:  L06805.  doi:  10.1029/ 
2006GL028443. 

Orr,  J.C.,  V.J.  Fabry,  O.  Aumont,  L.  Bopp,  S.C.  Doney,  R.A.  Feely,  A. 
Gnanadesikan,  N.  Gruber,  A.  Ishida,  F.  Joos,  R.M.  Key,  K.  Lindsay,  E.  Maier- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

92 

Reimer,  R.  Matear,  P.  Monfray,  A.  Mouchet,  R.G.  Najjar,  G.-K.  Plattner,  K.B.  Rod-
gers,  C.L.  Sabine,  J.L.  Sarmiento,  R.  Schlitzer,  R.D.  Slater,  I.  Totterdell,  M.-F. 
Weirig, Y. Yamanaka, and A. Yool (2005): Anthropogenic ocean acidification over the 
twenty-first century and its impact on calcifying organisms. Nature. 437(7059): 681– 
686. 

Orr,  J.C.,  L.G.  Anderson,  N.R.  Bates,  L.  Bopp,  V.J.  Fabry,  E.  Jones,  D. 
Swingedouw.  (2006)  Arctic  Ocean  Acidification.  Eos,  Transactions  of  the  American 
Geophysical Union. 87(36): Ocean Science Meeting Supplement Abstract OS14B–01. 
Precht W.F. and R.B. Aronson. (2006) Death and resurrection of Caribbean reefs: 
a palaeoecological perspective. In: Coˆte´ I., Reynolds J. (eds) Coral reef conservation. 
Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, pp 40–77. 

Sabine,  C.L.,  R.A.  Feely,  N.  Gruber,  R.M.  Key,  K.  Lee,  J.L.  Bullister,  R. 
Wanninkhof,  C.S  Wong,  D.W.R.  Wallace,  B.  Tilbrook,  F.J.  Millero,  T.-H.  Peng,  A. 
Kozyr,  T.  Ono,  and  A.F.  Rios.  (2004)  The  oceanic  sink  for  anthropogenic  CO2. 
Science. 305(5682): 367–371. 
Schubert  R.,  H.-J.  Schellnhuber,  N.  Buchmann,  A.  Epiney,  R.  GrieΒhammer,  M. 
Kulessa, D. Messner, S. Rahmstorf, J. Schmid, 2006: The Future Oceans—Warming 
up,  Rising  High,  Turning  Sour,  Special  Report  from  German  Advisory  Council  on 
Global Change (WBGU), ISBN 3–936191–14–X, http://www.wbgu.de 110 pp. 

Stanley,  G.D.  (2006)  Photosymbiosis  and  the  Evolution  of  Modern  Coral  Reefs. 

Science. 312: 857–858. 

Rayner,  N.A.,  D.E.  Parker,  E.B.  Horton,  C.K.  Folland,  L.V.  Alexander,  D.P. 
Rowell, E.C. Kent and A. Kaplan. (2003) Global analyses of sea surface temperature, 
sea  ice,  and  night  marine  air  temperature  since  the  late  nineteenth  century.  Jour-
nal of Geophysical Research. 108(D14): 4407, doi: 10.1029/2002JD002670. 

Smith,  T.M.,  and  R.W.  Reynolds.  (2004)  Improved  Extended  Reconstruction  of 

SST (1854–1997). Journal of Climate. 17: 2466–2477. 

van  Oldenborgh,  G.J.,  S.Y.  Philip,  and  M.  Collins.  (2005)  El  Nin˜ o  in  a  changing 

climate: a multi-model study. Ocean Science. 1: 81–95. 

Vecchi,  G.A.,  B.J.  Soden,  A.T.  Wittenberg,  I.M.  Held,  A.  Leetmaa,  M.J.  Harrison. 
(2006) Weakening of Tropical Pacific Atmospheric Circulation due to Anthropogenic 
Forcing. Nature. 441(7089): 73–76. doi: 10.1038/nature04744. 

Vecchi,  G.A.,  and  B.J.  Soden.  (2007)  Global  warming  and  the  weakening  of  trop-

ical circulation. Journal of Climate (in press). 

Yin, J.H. (2005) A consistent poleward shift of the storm tracks in simulations of 
21st  century  climate.  Geophysical  Research  Letters.  32:  L18701,  doi:  10.1029/ 
2005GL023684. 

Zhang,  M.  and  H.  Song.  (2006)  Evidence  of  deceleration  of  atmospheric  vertical 
overturning  circulation  over  the  tropical  Pacific.  Geophysical  Research  Letters.  33: 
L12701, doi: 10.1029/2006GL025942. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

DR. LARA J. HANSEN 

Question 1. Coral reefs are not just critical habitat for fish. In my state of Hawaii, 
they  are  also  an  economic  engine  supporting  both  fishing  and  tourism.  Is  ocean 
acidification  or  the  increase  in  sea  temperature  the  more  pressing  issue  for  pro-
tecting  and  preserving  Hawaii’s  coral  reefs  and  other  marine  resources  and  why? 
Answer. You can not prioritize one of these issues over the other. They share the 
same  root  cause  and  will  both  dramatically  affect  our  Nation’s  coral  reefs.  Increas-
ing  atmospheric  CO2 is  increasing  global  temperatures,  including  the  ocean’s  tem-
peratures.  This  same  CO2 is  being  absorbed  by  our  oceans  and  lowering  their  pH. 
They  are  inextricably  linked;  prevent  one  and  you  prevent  both,  and  if  you  fail  to 
prevent either it will result in an increase in global as well as ocean temperatures. 
Unfortunately,  we  are  already  seeing  the  manifestation  of  both.  It  is  possible  that 
ocean  acidification  is  the  more  ominous  as  we  do  not  know  all  of  the  effects  it  will 
have,  owing  to  our  long  believe  that  the  ocean’s  vast  buffering  capacity  prevents 
such  things  in  our  timeframe.  It  exacerbates  the  ongoing  adverse  effects  we  have 
been  seeing  due  to  increasing  water  temperature  for  the  past  several  decades.  We 
must do everything we can to limit both. 

Question 2. How can we incorporate actions to address these issues into an overall 

management strategy for protecting Hawaii’s corals and other marine resources? 

Answer.  There  are  four  general  steps  that  WWF  feels  are  crucial  to  improving 
management  in  the  face  of  climate  change.  First,  you  must  assess  where  your  re-
sources are and ensure that those which are naturally more resilient are protected. 
Where possible you manage along climatological gradients so that these ecosystems 
can  respond  accordingly.  Second,  you  must  limit  all  of  the  non-climate  stresses  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

93 

levels where climate change’s added stress does not exacerbate them, or vice versa. 
This  includes  further  reducing  acceptable  levels  of  habitat  loss  and  fragmentation, 
pollutants,  invasive  species,  disease/pests,  and  over-  or  destructive  harvest.  Third, 
we  need  to  start  implementing  these  approaches  as  soon  as  possible,  in  a  do-no- 
harm manner, start monitoring them, adjust as necessary and share lessons widely. 
Fourth,  we  must  reduce  the  rate  and  extent  of  climate  change.  This  means  to  rap-
idly reduce greenhouse gas emissions. 

Question  3.  Dr.  Hansen,  could  you  tell  me  what  adaptation  and  mitigation  steps 
you  think  the  United  States  needs  to  take  to  address  the  threats  that  climate 
change and ocean acidification pose to our ocean resources? 

Answer. First and foremost we need to get serious about reducing greenhouse gas 
emissions. Nothing we have done to date gets close to what we must do to save our 
national  and  global  economy,  natural  resources,  biodiversity  and  well-being.  We 
need  to  do  this  as  quickly  as  possible.  This  means  taking  action  to  improve  con-
servation of energy (fuel economy, reduced use of long-distance transmission of elec-
tricity, real standards on appliances), switch to renewable energies that produce no 
greenhouse  gases  and  finally,  decommission  those  sources  of  power  generation  that 
do. 

Second,  we  need  to  recognize  that  we  are  already  committed  to  a  certain  level  of 
climate change, likely about 2 degrees Celsius (I believe that even this is too much). 
We  must  also  recognize  that  this  will  have  serious  impacts  on  our  oceans,  our  citi-
zens,  our  forests,  our  freshwater  systems,  our  highway  systems,  our  wastewater 
treatment  facilities,  and  our  agricultural  system.  We  need  to  rethink  every  piece  of 
legislation,  and  assess  whether  or  not  it  is  prepared  for  climate  change.  Are  we 
making  bad  investments  because  they  are  vulnerable  to  the  effects  of  climate 
change?  We  need  to  think  proactively  now  because  the  climate  is  changing  rapidly. 
There  is  a  book  about  the  Arctic  climate  experience  called  ‘‘The  World  is  Faster 
Now’’. It is and we must be prepared. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DR. LARA J. HANSEN 

Question  1.  The  most  rigorous  mitigation  goal  in  the  recent  summary  report  by 
the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  is  to  stabilize  atmospheric  green-
house gas levels between 445 and 710 parts per million by 2030. But given that the 
current concentrations of atmospheric carbon are estimated at 379 parts per million, 
shouldn’t  this  target  be  set  at  a  much  lower  level  if  we  are  to  effectively  address 
climate change? What is the expected temperature increase of this range? 

Answer. 2.0 to 4.0° C 
Question  1a.  What  would  be  the  impacts  on  our  ocean  resources  if  we  were  to 

reach these emissions levels? 

Answer.  Allowing  emissions  levels  to  reach  the  upper  end  of  this  range  is  still 
unfathomable.  For  the  past  650,000  years  we  have  stayed  between  about  180  and 
300  ppm.  To  now  be  at  384  ppm  and  say  we  are  headed  to  710  should  be  seen  by 
this planet’s inhabitants as unacceptable. That amount of warming would mean un-
precedented  coral  bleaching,  loss  of  many,  if  not  most  coral  species,  altered  marine 
food webs as species shift their ranges or simply disappear (imagine if you will what 
the  loss  of  krill,  the  base  of  the  marine  food  web,  would  mean  for  life  on  Earth?), 
changes in the dominant phytoplankton species (these are what produce most of our 
oxygen), loss of most of the world’s terrestrial ice causing massive sea level rise, al-
tered  ocean  currents  and  even  more  heating  as  the  planet  becomes  less  reflective. 
All  of  these  changes  will  cause  unprecedented  responses  in  human  communities, 
such as movement of climate refuges, famine, and disease. In all honesty, this level 
of warming is not something that ecologists like to ponder; it may be one of the most 
cataclysmic scenarios that I can ponder. 

Question  1b.  Do  you  think  that  policymakers  should  specifically  take  ocean  im-

pacts into account when setting emissions reductions targets? 

Answer. Absolutely. The oceans provide myriad services that we take for granted 
but  they  sustain  life  on  this  planet.  We  must  also  recognize  that  the  more  CO2 we 
put  in  the  atmosphere,  the  greater  the  ocean  acidification  commitment,  which  is 
something that we do not fully understand the consequences of. 

Question 1c. Do current emissions reduction targets sufficiently consider ocean im-

pacts? 

Answer. Most certainly not. 
Question 1d. How do you think policymakers should incorporate ocean impact con-

cerns when setting emissions reduction targets? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

94 

Answer. Yes, please see above. 
Question 2. Dr. Hansen, I understand that you were part of a team that produced 
NOAA’s publication titled ‘‘A Reef Managers Guide To Coral Bleaching’’. This hand-
book  acknowledges  that  climate  change  is  outside  of  the  immediate  control  of  most 
managers,  and  recommends  that  the  best  management  strategy  is  often  to  reduce 
stressors  that  are  within  local  control—such  as  reducing  pollution  or  overfishing. 
What  can  managers  facing  ocean  acidification  learn  from  this  approach?  What  are 
some  concrete  steps  in  the  short-term  and  long-term  that  can  be  taken  to  adapt  to 
these impacts? 

Answer.  Perhaps  the  most  daunting  challenge  is  to  develop  adaptation  strategies 
in response to ocean acidification. It ranks up there with how to protect sea ice de-
pendent  creatures  in  a  world  without  ice.  The  only  short-term  strategy  that  my 
team has developed is working to limit all of the other stresses so that systems can 
try  to  keep  up  with  this  change  without  it  being  exacerbated  by  other  challenges. 
Unfortunately  one  of  the  key  stresses  that  can  aggravate  this  is  warming  waters. 
The same actions that cause acidification cause warming. 

Question 2a. Aside from reducing emissions, what other steps should policymakers 
be  taking  to  address  the  impact  of  climate  change  and  ocean  acidification  on  the 
oceans? 

Answer.  We  should  start  doing  everything  we  can  to  make  ocean  systems  more 
robust,  by  reducing  all  of  the  other  insults  we  have  sent  their  way.  But  really,  the 
only solution, the only lifeline for the oceans, is for us to stop dumping CO2 in them, 
which is exactly what we do when we dump it into the atmosphere. 

Question 3. What are the potential impacts of some of the currently proposed cli-
mate change mitigation strategies on the marine environment—such as iron stimu-
lated plankton blooms or injection of CO2 into sea sediments? 

Answer. Storing CO2 in the world’s oceans, either through direct injection or stim-
ulating  phytoplankton  assimilation  is  risky  business.  You  are  trading  one  environ-
mental  disaster  for  another.  There  may  be  some  merit  to  storing  carbon  in  old  oil 
and gas deposits since they are presumably not environmentally sensitive locations, 
but this is not true of the ocean. In the case of injection, you are damaging the deep 
ocean communities which are very sensitive to such changes in pH and gas composi-
tion as they are extremely stable systems (very little variability in any physical pa-
rameters).  You  are  also  acidifying  the  oceans  from  the  bottom  up,  rather  than  the 
top  down.  In  the  case  of  ocean  ‘‘fertilization’’  you  are  increasing  ocean  productivity, 
which  can  have  negative  consequences  as  well  as  the  desired.  You  will  change  the 
species  composition  of  the  phytoplankton  community,  selecting  for  species  that  are 
iron  limited.  These  phytoplankton,  in  their  current  composition,  provide  many  eco-
system services. Will the new set do so as well? We don’t know. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

JAMES D. WATKINS 

Question 1. Admiral Watkins, what are the most important steps that the United 
States  should  take  to  address  the  threats  we  are  learning  about  today,  in  terms  of 
research  and  monitoring,  outreach  and  education,  and  adaptation  and  mitigation 
measures?  Can  you  identify  some  specific  actions  that  Congress  should  take  to 
strengthen Federal efforts in the area of ocean impacts of climate change? 

Answer.  This  reply  is  to  questions  1  and  3  from  Chairman  Inouye.  Earlier  this 
summer  JOCI  consulted  with  leading  experts  in  ocean  and  climate  change  science 
and  policy  regarding  the  development  of  recommendation  for  incorporating  oceans 
as part of climate change legislation under consideration by Congress. The Initiative 
suggests  that  Congress  address  the  link  between  oceans  and  climate  change  by  ad-
dressing needs in two key areas: governance reform and science. Clearly, additional 
funding will be necessary to make sustained progress in both areas. A more detailed 
discussion  of  our  recommendations  is  included  in  the  attached  paper,  which  was 
sent  to  leaders  in  the  House  and  Senate,  as  well  as  the  Administration.  I  request 
that the entire text of the paper be included as part of my reply to the Committee’s 
follow-up questions. 

Below is brief summary of the key recommendations from the paper. 

Governance Reform 

Climate  change  involves  complex  and  dynamic  interactions  of  the  atmosphere, 
ocean,  land,  their  related  ecosystems,  and  human  activities.  The  complexity  and 
breadth  of  issues  associated  with  efforts  to  understand,  mitigate,  and  adapt  to  cli-
mate change, the scale of its impacts from the local to the global level, and the need 
to  understand  the  relationship  between  natural  variability  and  climate  change, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

95 

make  it  essential  that  the  Nation  have  a  coherent  and  comprehensive  strategy  to 
address this new challenge. This will require the establishment of a Climate Change 
Response Office to guide the development and implementation of a National Climate 
Change Response Strategy. 

Ocean science and management must be recognized as key elements of such a na-
tional response strategy. Actions that would help ensure this occur include codifying 
the  White  House  Committee  on  Ocean  Policy  and  charging  it  with  supporting  a 
broader National Climate Change Response Strategy. Another beneficial step would 
be  to  codify  and  strengthen  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
(NOAA),  which  is  the  key  Federal  agency  providing  climate-related  services  and 
ocean  management  information.  Finally,  Congress  should  require  a  biennial  inte-
grated  assessment  of  the  Nation’s  progress  toward  mitigating  and  adapting  to  cli-
mate  change  impacts.  An  integrated  assessment  evaluating  the  collective  effort  of 
Federal  programs  and  activities  will  provide  a  baseline  from  which  to  measure 
progress  and  will  help  ensure  the  Nation  is  maximizing  the  use  of  available  data 
and information to improve the caliber of forecasts and to evaluate the effectiveness 
of management actions. 

1.  Charge  the  National  Academy  with  recommending  a  process  and  strategy  to 
respond to climate change, including consideration of the organization and func-
tions of a National Climate Change Response Office responsible for guiding Fed-
eral programmatic and budgetary climate change activities. 
2. Codify and strengthen the White House Committee on Ocean Policy, and give 
it a key role in supporting the activities of the Climate Change Response Office. 
3. Codify and strengthen the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration 
(NOAA),  realigning  the  agency’s  organizational  structure  to  enhance  and  focus 
its  capacity  to  provide  climate-related  services  and  improve  ocean  and  coastal 
management. 
4.  Require  a  biennial  integrated  assessment  of  the  Nation’s  progress  toward 
meeting  its  objectives  to  mitigate  and  adapt  to  impacts  associated  with  climate 
change and variability. 
5.  Require  the  submission  of  an  integrated  budget  to  consolidate  and  highlight 
priorities  established  by  the  National  Climate  Change  Response  Office  that 
would accompany the President’s annual budget request. 

Science Requirements 

Credible  and  timely  scientific  information  will  be  essential  as  the  Nation  begins 
the process of responding to the challenges associated with climate change. A much 
more comprehensive and robust science enterprise that incorporates a better under-
standing of the ocean’s role in climate change is required to forecast more accurately 
the magnitude and intensity of this change at multiple scales, as well as to evaluate 
options for mitigation and adaptation. Unfortunately, the existing ocean and coastal 
science  enterprise  supporting  climate  change  research,  observations,  data  manage-
ment, and socioeconomic analysis is limited. 

The  status  of  infrastructure  supporting  ocean  science,  such  as  ship,  satellites, 
buoys, cabled observatories, planes, and other monitoring hardware, is bleak. Addi-
tionally,  support  for  shore-side  lab  work,  where  data  for  the  observing  systems  is 
analyzed,  quality-controlled,  synthesized,  and  integrated,  has  eroded.  Further  un-
derlying these weaknesses is a lack of capability to transmit large amounts of ocean 
data in real time and a disjointed data management system that prevents scientists 
from fully utilizing the data that are being collected now. 

Congress  can  begin  to  remedy  this  situation  by  calling  on  the  administration  to 
prioritize  and  request  full  funding  to  implement  its  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan 
and Implementation Strategy (ORPPIS). ORPPIS provides a solid blueprint to guide 
research on the ocean’s role in climate. It is the first comprehensive research strat-
egy  developed  by  the  Administration  with  input  from  the  ocean  community  and 
should be used by Congress to guide its ocean science funding priorities. 

Congress  should  also  authorize  and  fund  the  implementation  of  an  Integrated 
Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS),  with  the  system  being  driven  by  a  cooperative 
interagency  process  that  incorporates  expertise  from  outside  the  Federal  system. 
Sustained research and operational monitoring and analyses programs supported by 
enhanced  data  collection,  management,  and  synthesis  capabilities  are  the  founda-
tion of an observation system that can refine climate change models and reduce the 
level of uncertainty associated with their projections. 

Finally,  Congress  should  support  research  and  science  programs  focused  on  ana-
lyzing  the  potential  impact  various  greenhouse  gas  mitigation  strategies  may  have 
on  ocean  and  coastal  processes  and  ecosystem  health.  Recommendations  for  carbon 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

96 

sequestration in the oceans will require particularly careful review, given our grow-
ing  concern  about  the  sensitivity  of  marine  ecosystems  to  changes  in  the  biogeo-
chemistry  of  ocean  waters  as  a  result  of  increased  absorption  of  carbon  dioxide,  in 
particular ocean acidification. 

1.  Request  prioritization  of  and  provide  funding  to  implement  the  Administra-
tion’s  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy,  with  a 
focus on developing a science enterprise that is responsive to societal and envi-
ronmental concerns. 
2. Enact legislation authorizing the implementation of an Integrated Ocean Ob-
serving System, incorporating both coastal and global components. 
3.  Fund  major  ocean  observation  research  and  monitoring  infrastructure  sys-
tems and supporting science and data management programs, such as an Inte-
grated  Ocean  Observing  System,  the  Ocean  Observatories  Initiative,  research 
vessels, and remote sensing programs. 
4. Enhance funding support for transitioning ocean and atmospheric data collec-
tion  and  synthesis  programs  from  research  to  operational  status,  with  ongoing 
engagement  of  the  ocean  science  community  in  the  operation,  evaluation,  and 
evolution of the programs. 
5. Support research to evaluate the impact of greenhouse gas mitigation policies 
on  coastal  and  ocean  processes  and  ecosystem  health  (e.g.,  oceanic  carbon  se-
questration, biofuel production). 

Question  2.  Do  you  believe  that  the  current  Federal  budget  to  address  the  ocean 

impacts of climate change is sufficient? 

Answer.  Clearly,  the  answer  is  no,  as  I  responded  when  Senator  Stevens  asked 
a similar questions during the hearing. The short- and long-term implications of cli-
mate  change  are  significant  in  relationship  to  the  impact  on  the  environmental 
health  of  marine  ecosystems  and  the  economic  vitality  of  coastal  communities.  In 
the  recent  Joint  Initiative  report  to  Congress,  ‘‘From  Sea  to  Shining  Sea,’’  we  iden-
tify  $750  million  in  high  priority  funding  needs  to  support  the  recommendations  of 
the  two  Commissions.  Much  of  the  funding  identified  in  this  report  would  directly 
contribute  to  improving  our  understanding  of  the  oceans  role  in  climate  processes, 
as  well  as  strengthen  coastal  community’s  capacity  to  adapt  to  the  changes  accom-
panying  these  shifts.  For  example,  we  support  enhancing  ocean  governance  and 
coastal  management,  such  as  improving  interagency  collaboration,  expanding  re-
gional  coordination,  and  strengthening  programs  that  focus  on  system-wide  water-
shed activities, such as the Coastal Zone Management Program and USDA and U.S. 
Army Corps of Engineer programs. 

In  the  science  realm  we  call  for  oceans  to  be  incorporated  into  the  President’s 
American Competitiveness Initiative, for the expansion of ocean research and explo-
ration initiatives, and building a strong Integrated Ocean Observing System to mon-
itor,  observe,  map,  and  analyze  changes  in  our  oceans,  coasts,  and  Great  Lakes.  A 
final  area  that  demands  attention,  but  always  seems  to  be  ignored,  is  support  of 
education and outreach, for without an informed public there will be a lack of polit-
ical  will  and  scientific  expertise  to  move  us  toward  more  sustainable  management 
strategies.  Again,  I  would  refer  Members  of  the  Committee  and  Committee  staff  to 
our  ‘‘From  Sea  to  Shining  Sea’’  report  for  more  detailed  funding  recommendations. 

Addressing Oceans and Climate Change in Federal Legislation 

ATTACHMENT 

July 2007 

Introduction 

The  purpose  of  this  paper  is  to  provide  Congress  with  information  and  rec-
ommendations  to  support  the  enactment  of  legislation  that  incorporates  ocean 
science, management, and education into a national initiative to mitigate and adapt 
to  climate  change.  This  initiative  must  complement  ongoing  efforts  to  understand, 
monitor,  and  forecast  changes  associated  with  natural  variability,  such  as  El  Nin˜ o 
and the Pacific Decadal Oscillation, since anthropogenic climate change will also im-
pact  the  frequency,  pattern,  and  severity  of  these  natural  processes.  The  goal  is  to 
improve  our  collective  understanding  of  the  role  of  the  oceans  in  climate  change  in 
order  to  inform  policies  and  strategies  intended  to  reduce  the  vulnerability  of  and 
increase the resiliency of our economic and ecological systems to impacts associated 
with  climate  change.  It  is  the  Joint  Ocean  Commission  Initiative’s  view  that  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

97 

goal  can  best  be  met  through  a  broad  national  climate  change  response  strategy 
that includes an emphasis on the oceans role in climate-related processes. 

After  consultation  with  leading  experts  in  ocean  and  climate  change  science  and 
policy,  the  Joint  Ocean  Commission  Initiative  suggests  that  Congress  address  the 
link between oceans and climate change by addressing needs in two key areas: gov-
ernance  reform  and  science.  Clearly,  additional  funding  will  be  necessary  to  make 
sustained  progress  in  both  areas.  The  actions  recommended  by  the  Joint  Ocean 
Commission  Initiative  are  summarized  below  and  discussed  in  more  detail  in  the 
pages that follow. 
Governance Reform 

1.  Charge  the  National  Academy  with  recommending  a  process  and  strategy  to 
respond to climate change, including consideration of the organization and func-
tions of a National Climate Change Response Office responsible for guiding Fed-
eral programmatic and budgetary climate change activities. 
2. Codify and strengthen the White House Committee on Ocean Policy, and give 
it a key role in supporting the activities of the Climate Change Response Office. 
3. Codify and strengthen the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration 
(NOAA),  realigning  the  agency’s  organizational  structure  to  enhance  and  focus 
its  capacity  to  provide  climate-related  services  and  improve  ocean  and  coastal 
management. 
4.  Require  a  biennial  integrated  assessment  of  the  Nation’s  progress  toward 
meeting  its  objectives  to  mitigate  and  adapt  to  impacts  associated  with  climate 
change and variability. 
5.  Require  the  submission  of  an  integrated  budget  to  consolidate  and  highlight 
priorities  established  by  the  National  Climate  Change  Response  Office  that 
would accompany the President’s annual budget request. 

Science Requirements 

1.  Request  prioritization  of  and  provide  funding  to  implement  the  Administra-
tion’s Ocean Research Priorities Plan and Implementation Strategy, with a focus 
on  developing  a  science  enterprise  that  is  responsive  to  societal  and  environ-
mental concerns. 
2. Enact legislation authorizing the implementation of an Integrated Ocean Ob-
serving System, incorporating both coastal and global components. 
3.  Fund  major  ocean  observation  research  and  monitoring  infrastructure  sys-
tems and supporting science and data management programs, such as an Inte-
grated  Ocean  Observing  System,  the  Ocean  Observatories  Initiative,  research 
vessels, and remote sensing programs. 
4. Enhance funding support for transitioning ocean and atmospheric data collec-
tion  and  synthesis  programs  from  research  to  operational  status,  with  ongoing 
engagement  of  the  ocean  science  community  in  the  operation,  evaluation,  and 
evolution of the programs. 
5. Support research to evaluate the impact of greenhouse gas mitigation policies 
on  coastal  and  ocean  processes  and  ecosystem  health  (e.g.,  oceanic  carbon  se-
questration, biofuel production). 

The Role of Oceans in Climate Change 

Increasing  awareness  and  concerns  about  climate  change  have  elevated  the  ur-
gency  to  take  action  to  mitigate  its  causes  and  make  preparations  to  adapt  to  its 
anticipated  economic  and  environmental  impacts.  At  continental,  regional,  and 
ocean  basin  scales,  numerous  long-term  changes  in  climate  have  been  observed. 
These  include  changes  in  arctic  temperatures  and  ice,  as  well  as  widespread 
changes in, ocean salinity, wind patterns, the quantity of precipitation, and various 
aspects  of  extreme  weather.1 As  Congress  moves  forward  in  developing  climate 
change policies, the accompanying legislation should recognize the fundamental role 
oceans  play  in  governing  climate  change  and  Earth-related  processes.  Some  impor-
tant facts regarding the relationship between oceans and climate change include the 
following: 

1 Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. 2007. Report of Working Group I The Physical 

Science Basis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

98 

depth. 

• Oceans  cover  71  percent  of  the  Earth’s  surface  and  average  over  12,200  feet  in 
• Water  holds  approximately  1,000  times  the  amount  of  heat  as  air,  and  the 
interaction  between  ocean  circulation  and  the  global  distribution  of  heat  is  the 
primary driver of climatic patterns. 
• The oceans are warming, particularly since 1950s, with global mean sea surface 
temperature  having  increased  roughly  one  degree  Fahrenheit  in  the  20th  cen-
tury.2 
• Sea levels rose 7 inches during the 20th century and nearly 1.5 inches between 
• Oceans are a major carbon sink and have absorbed fully half of all fossil carbon 
released  to  the  atmosphere  since  the  beginning  of  the  Industrial  Revolution.2 
• The absorption of carbon has resulted in increasing ocean acidification, impact-
ing  the  health  of  marine  ecosystems  and  species,  including,  but  not  limited  to, 
those with carbonate-based skeletons (e.g., corals), as well as influencing the im-
portant role ocean plays in the global cycling of carbon. 

1993 and 2003 alone.2 

• Little to no Arctic sea ice is expected in the summers by 2100.2 
Governance Reform to Address Oceans and Climate Change 

Climate  change  involves  complex  and  dynamic  interactions  of  the  atmosphere, 
ocean,  land,  their  related  ecosystems,  and  human  activities.  The  complexity  and 
breadth  of  issues  associated  with  efforts  to  understand,  mitigate,  and  adapt  to  cli-
mate change, the scale of its impacts from the local to the global level, and the need 
to understand the relationship between natural variability and climate change make 
it essential that the Nation have a coherent and comprehensive strategy to address 
this new challenge. 

Unfortunately,  there  is  general  agreement  in  the  scientific  community  that  the 
current Federal climate change governance regime is too limited in scope and must 
be  expanded  if  it  is  to  be  truly  comprehensive.  A  Climate  Change  Response  Office 
is  required  to  guide  the  development  and  implementation  of  a  National  Climate 
Change Response Strategy. Such an office must have the authority to direct the ac-
tivities  of  multiple  Federal  agencies  and  have  a  strong  role  in  the  budget  formula-
tion process. This will require designing and implementing a strategy that balances 
the  need  to  conduct  basic  and  applied  research,  monitoring  and  analysis,  and  mod-
eling  and  forecasting,  with  the  goal  of  translating  data  into  information  products 
that  can  be  used  to  develop  sound  policies  to  mitigate  and  adapt  to  environmental 
and socioeconomic impacts stemming from climate change. 

Ocean science and management must be recognized as key elements of a national 
response  strategy.  Thus,  the  existing  interagency  coordination  process  operating 
under the White House Committee on Ocean Policy 3 should be codified and charged 
with supporting the effort to institutionalize a broader National Climate Change Re-
sponse  Strategy.  An  additional  action  needed  to  strengthen  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s  capacity  to  respond  to  climate  change  is  to  codify  and  strengthen  the  Na-
tional  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA).  As  a  key  provider  of  cli-
mate-related  services  and  ocean  management  information,  and  as  one  of  the  prin-
ciple  agencies  investigating  the  ocean’s  role  in  climate  variability,  NOAA  plays  a 
lead role in matters related to climate change. However, an outdated organizational 
structure and the lack of resources have limited NOAA’s ability to fulfill its multiple 
mandates. The opportunity is ripe for Congress to reevaluate NOAA’s organizational 
structure and realign programs along its core functions: environmental assessment, 
prediction,  and  operations;  scientific  research  and  education;  and  marine  resource 
and  area  management.  Strengthening  NOAA  and  realigning  its  functions  would 
greatly enhance its capacity to provide climate-related services and facilitate the im-
plementation of proactive management measures to mitigate anticipated impacts on 
coastal economies and ecosystems. 

Finally, Congress should require a biennial integrated assessment of the Nation’s 
progress  toward  mitigating  and  adapting  to  climate  change  impacts.  An  integrated 
assessment  evaluating  the  collective  effort  of  Federal  programs  and  activities  will 
provide a baseline from which to measure progress and will help ensure the Nation 
is  maximizing  the  use  of  available  data  and  information  to  improve  the  caliber  of 
forecasts  and  to  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  management  actions.  An  additional 
step that would facilitate better integration of Federal programs would be a require-
ment for the submission of an integrated budget that clearly identifies priorities es-

2 Doney, Scott. 2006. The Dangers of Ocean Acidification. Scientific American (March). 
3 Executive Order 13366, 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

99 

tablished by the proposed National Climate Change Response Office and how those 
priorities  relate  to  and  complement  efforts  directed  at  understanding  the  ocean’s 
role  in  climate  change.  Congressional  oversight  of  the  Federal  budget  is  its  most 
powerful tool, but Congress’ capacity to help guide a response to an issue as complex 
as  climate  change  is  compromised  when  information  is  dispersed  throughout  the 
President’s budget. 
Ocean and Coastal Science Requirements 

Credible  and  timely  scientific  information  will  be  essential  as  the  Nation  begins 
the  process  of  responding  to  the  challenges  associated  with  climate  change.  Better 
science,  when  linked  with  improved  risk  management  and  adaptive  management 
strategies,  will  help  guide  a  process  that  must  deal  with  the  relatively  high  levels 
of uncertainty related to mitigation alternatives and the range of impacts associated 
with climate change and variability. A much more comprehensive and robust science 
enterprise  that  incorporates  a  better  understanding  of  the  ocean’s  role  in  climate 
change  is  required  to  forecast  more  accurately  the  magnitude  and  intensity  of  this 
change at multiple scales, as well as to evaluate options for mitigation and adapta-
tion.  This  process  must  also  include  strengthening  capacity  in  the  social  sciences, 
whose contributions will influence risk and adaptive management strategies signifi-
cantly given the immense economic impact climate change will have on coastal com-
munities. 

Unfortunately,  the  existing  ocean  and  coastal  science  enterprise  supporting  cli-
mate  change  research,  observations,  data  management,  and  socioeconomic  analysis 
is limited. Despite the unprecedented opportunities to capitalize on technological ad-
vances, future capacity is compromised due to a lack of fiscal support for key infra-
structure  and  science  programs.  For  example,  the  U.S.  commitment  to  constructing 
an  observing  system  focused  on  studying  physical  ocean  processes  is  only  half  com-
plete, while satellite systems responsible for generating invaluable data across large 
areas  of  oceans  are  aging.  The  construction  of  replacement  systems  are  behind 
schedule, over budget, and as currently configured, may have less capacity than the 
systems  they  are  replacing.  The  status  of  infrastructure  supporting  on  and  under-
water ocean science, such as ship, buoys, cabled observatories, planes, and other un-
derwater  monitoring  hardware,  is  bleak.  Additionally,  support  for  shore-side  lab 
work,  where  data  for  the  observing  systems  is  analyzed,  quality-controlled,  syn-
thesized, and integrated, has eroded. Further underlying these weaknesses is a lack 
of  capability  to  transmit  large  amounts  of  ocean  data  in  real-time  and  a  disjointed 
data  management  system  that  prevents  scientists  from  fully  utilizing  the  data  that 
are being collected now. Stagnant funding supports only bare-bones research, moni-
toring,  modeling,  and  analysis  enterprises  that  have  difficulty  providing  the  quan-
tity and quality of data needed to generate information with the relatively high lev-
els of confidence demanded by decisionmakers facing difficult policy choices. 

Congress  can  begin  to  remedy  this  situation  by  taking  the  following  series  of 
steps. First, it should call on the administration to prioritize and request full fund-
ing  to  implement  its  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy 
(ORPPIS).  ORPPIS  provides  a  solid  blueprint  to  guide  research  on  the  ocean’s  role 
in  climate,  including  the  development  of  a  comprehensive  observing  system  and 
other  ocean-related  research  priorities  that  will  improve  our  ability  to  enhance  the 
resiliency  of  marine  ecosystems  and  coastal  economies  to  climate-induced  changes. 
Particularly  noteworthy  in  ORPPIS  is  its  emphasis  on  using  improved  under-
standing  to  provide  better  and  timelier  policy  and  resource  management  decisions, 
relying  on  much  stronger  support  for  social  and  economic  research.  It  is  the  first 
comprehensive  research  strategy  developed  by  the  Administration  with  input  from 
the  ocean  community  and  should  be  used  by  Congress  to  guide  its  ocean  science 
funding priorities. 

Congress  should  also  authorize  and  fund  the  implementation  of  an  Integrated 
Ocean Observing System (IOOS). Support for the implementation of the coastal and 
global IOOS should be driven by a cooperative interagency process that incorporates 
expertise from outside the Federal system. Congressional support should also extend 
to major observing initiatives supported by the National Science Foundation, as well 
as  to  remote  sensing  satellite  programs  supported  by  NASA’s  Earth  Science  pro-
gram.  As  noted  earlier,  the  loss  or  diminishment  of  remote  sensing  capabilities,  in 
addition  to  the  lack  of  support  for  transitioning  ocean  and  atmospheric  data  collec-
tion  and  synthesis  program  from  research  to  operational  status,  has  significantly 
compromised  our  Nation’s  capacity  to  monitor  the  vast  expanse  of  the  ocean.  Sus-
tained research and operational monitoring and analyses programs supported by en-
hanced  data  collection,  management,  and  synthesis  capabilities  are  the  foundation 
of an observation system that can refine climate change models and reduce the level 
of uncertainty associated with their projections. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

100 

Finally,  Congress  should  support  research  and  science  programs  focused  on  ana-
lyzing  the  potential  impact  various  greenhouse  gas  mitigation  strategies  may  have 
on  ocean  and  coastal  processes  and  ecosystem  health.  Recommendations  for  carbon 
sequestration in the oceans will require particularly careful review, given our grow-
ing  concern  about  the  sensitivity  of  marine  ecosystems  to  changes  in  the  biogeo-
chemistry  of  ocean  waters  as  a  result  of  increased  absorption  of  carbon  dioxide,  in 
particular  ocean  acidification.  Similarly,  increased  biofuel  production  will  generate 
additional runoff of nutrients, herbicides, and pesticides, further exacerbating pollu-
tion and nutrient enrichment problems in coastal waters. 

Given  their  immense  size,  fundamental  role  as  a  driver  of  climate  processes,  and 
critical social and economic importance, it is imperative that Congress focus greater 
attention  and  resources  on  improving  our  understanding  and  management  of  our 
oceans,  coasts,  and  Great  Lakes.  The  actions  recommended  above  are  important 
steps  that  will  lay  the  foundation  for  making  great  advances  in  ocean  science  and 
allow  meaningful  progress  toward  improved  stewardship  of  one  of  nation’s  greatest 
natural resources. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

JAMES D. WATKINS 

Question  1.  Admiral  Watkins,  do  you  think  that  policymakers  should  specifically 
take ocean impacts into account when setting emissions reductions targets? Do cur-
rent  emissions  reduction  targets  sufficiently  consider  ocean  impacts?  How  do  you 
think  policymakers  should  incorporate  ocean  impact  concerns  when  setting  emis-
sions reduction targets? 

Answer.  I  cannot  say  how  much  consideration  climate  scientist  and  policymakers 
are  giving  to  impacts  on  ocean-related  chemistry  and  ecology  as  they  evaluate  var-
ious emission reduction scenarios. However, I strongly suspect that it is inadequate, 
particularly  in  light  of  the  testimony  presented  at  the  hearing  suggesting  that  at-
mospheric carbon dioxide levels in excess of 450 ppm may have the potential of suf-
ficiently  increasing  the  acidity  of  surface  ocean  water  to  levels  that  would  begin  to 
jeopardize phytoplankton productivity and the capacity of other carbonate-extracting 
species from forming shells and skeletons. 

It is this concern and others that are driving the Joint Initiative’s effort to elevate 
awareness  of  the  role  of  oceans  in  climate  processes.  In  order  for  policymakers  to 
make  informed  and  balanced  decisions  regarding  the  incorporation  of  ocean-related 
concerns in the emission reduction targeting process, they should pursue two strate-
gies.  First,  they  should  support  additional  ocean  science  to  get  a  better  under-
standing of natural variability in the system, and how the accumulation of human- 
generated  emissions  are  exacerbating  this  variability  and  driving  other  changes. 
Second,  given  the  fact  that  acquiring  this  information  will  take  some  time,  policy-
makers should strongly consider taking a precautionary approach in the target set-
ting process. By this I mean taking a prudent, balanced approach that acknowledges 
the vulnerability of the ocean ecosystem to dramatic increases in carbon-based emis-
sions,  while  also  recognizing  the  multiple  economic  benefits  and  services  provided 
by  our  oceans,  coasts,  and  Great  Lakes.  As  more  information  become  available,  the 
framework developed should be flexible and capable of adapting to new information. 
I  remain  very  concerned  about  the  short-sightedness  of  prior  policies  that  contrib-
uted  to  the  degradation  of  our  oceans  and  coasts  and  strongly  encourage  a  new 
strategy that incorporates full consideration of the health of our oceans and coastal 
communities into the decisionmaking process. 

Finally, given the increased focus on identifying technologies capable of capturing 
carbon  dioxide  and  other  greenhouse  gases;  it  is  imperative  that  support  for  these 
efforts  include  funding  to  study  the  potential  impact  of  storing  these  gases  in  or 
under our oceans. We now have a much better appreciation for the sensitive ecologi-
cal  balance  in  our  oceans  and  must  take  great  care  not  to  further  exacerbate  exist-
ing problems by assuming our oceans are capable of further degradation. 

Question  2.  Admiral  Watkins,  how  can  we  improve  our  ocean  and  Earth  observa-
tion programs to ensure understanding of the impacts of global climate change and 
ocean acidification on the marine environment? 

Answer.  Perhaps  the  single  most  important  step  we  can  make  is  to  implement 
and  fully  fund  an  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS).  The  Joint  Initiative 
reiterates  this  point  in  its  recent  climate  change  and  oceans  paper,  which  I  ref-
erence  in  my  response  to  Chairman  Inouye’s  questions,  as  well  as  in  our  report  to 
Congress,  ‘‘From  Sea  to  Shining  Sea.’’  The  IOOS  system,  as  conceived  by  the  ocean 
science community, covers the spectrum of observations. This system includes a pro-
gression of activities and programs, starting with studying and understanding ongo-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

101 

ing  physical,  chemical,  and  biological  processes  occurring  in  the  oceans  and  along 
our coasts, to gain a better knowledge of how various components within the system 
operate  and  interact.  The  second  element  of  the  strategy  includes  developing  and 
implementing  systematic  and  sustainable  observation  systems,  consisting  of  remote 
(satellite), in situ (buoys, stationary sensors), and mobile platforms (vessels, SUVs), 
that provide a steady accounting of changes in system processes. The third element 
is to use this information to refine climate and ocean models, increasing their capac-
ity  to  provide  credible  and  accurate  forecasts  of  changes  in  the  functioning  of  nat-
ural systems. 

There are significant infrastructure costs associated with establishing such a sys-
tem,  as  well  as  support  for  the  synthesis  and  integration  of  the  wealth  of  informa-
tion  generated  by  the  system.  However,  the  costs  associated  with  this  effort  are 
minimal  given  the  significant  fiscal  benefits  resulting  from  the  improved  accuracy, 
credibility,  and  reliability  a  comprehensive  earth  observation  system  will  provide. 
The information provided by a fully operational IOOS will be invaluable as Congress 
and  other  policymakers  wrestle  with  difficult  policy  decisions  that  have  significant 
socioeconomic  impacts,  not  the  least  of  which  will  be  determining  an  appropriate 
target for emission reductions. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Mar 20, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\79908.TXT JACKIE

